I said in the introduction to this course that you saw in the catalog that this is probably the most difficult archetype of configuration for most men. I say for most men, not all men. Some of you in the room here tonight are probably artists or people who shoot up with this thing. It's where you live. You don't find it so difficult to get in touch with this thing at all. You're a little different from a lot of other men. Most men have difficulty with it in the other ways. They have a hard time trying to figure out what this energy is like, or it frightens them a lot. In any case, we men are wonderful at getting into trouble with this one. More of us men get into trouble with this archetype of configuration than with most of the others. We'll be seeing why that is in a little bit. But let me begin. Before the break, I want to just lay out this geography and talk about how the lover interacts with these other archetypal configurations so you can get a sense of the psychological assumptions upon which I work and my understanding about the importance of Jungian psychology and looking at these things.

Let me just jumpinto that, then we'll take a break at eight o'clock, short break, stretch your legs, and then we'll come back and we'll get into all this phenomenology of the lover and try to get a feel for this thing. But let me just jump in now and say that it's been said by a scholar recently that there are two ways really to be related to Carl Jung psychologically today, really, in terms of popular movements within what we call the Jungian community. One, which we often refer to today as the post-Jungians, take Jung as a starting point, and then move on to do other things which are quite different from Jung's work and have quite different assumptions than Jung had. That's one wing. That's not the wing that I am in. The other wing is made up of individuals who take their standpoint in Jung and try to continue developing the vision which Jung started. That is to say, I don't consider myself a post-Jungian. I consider myself a Jungian because I do not move away in any significant way, I think, from the fundamental theoretical assumptions about the structure of the psyche, which Jung had.

Let me just say a little bit about that. You hear all these other tapes. This is laid out in some detail in other places. But for those of you who have not heard that, let me just say a few key points. First of all, Jung is the key to understanding the uniqueness of Jung's system is understanding the idea of the collective unconscious. That is, Jung, following the great anthropologist Adolf Bosseian, saw human beings as having a fundamental psychic unity underneath all their differences. There was a fundamental psyche unity. This was grounded in what he called the objective psyche. Now, this objective psyche is what I like to call in your hardware. This is not in the software. This is in the hardware, in computer ease. That is, there are a lot of differences, which we would call cultural differences, differences in the cultural unconscious, differences in the family unconscious, we could talk about if we had a lot of time, differences in the personal unconscious. But at the deepest roots of the psyche, Jung believed there to be a collective unconscious. Now, the assumption is that these unconscious structures in the psyche form potentials for human functioning.

I personally, along with Anthony Stevens, view these as grounded in neurophysiology. If you're not familiar with Anthony Stevens' work, I suggest that you'll look at his books, particularly his book, archetypes and natural history of the self. They had a feel for a contemporary reflection on evidence for the psyche as having archetypal deep structures. Now, this assumption differentiates Jung from all other psychologists. Most psychologists operating today do not assume this deep structures in the psyche. A great number of psychologies end up being ego psychologies, which tend to reduce everything to your personal unconscious, if they even treat an unconscious at all. So to the question, why study archetypes? It's not an antiquary an interest. You do it because these structures represent potentials, which if you have some clues to how they operate, you can get some clues about the potentials that you have as a human animal, psychologically and spiritually speaking. Not only that, if you believe that the ego, the human eye, has to form a conscious relationship to these structures in order to be mature, then you have to have some sense of how you would know one of them when you saw it.

How would you recognize this structure in order to form a conscious relationship with it? In other words, how would you know when an individual was possessed by a warrior archetype? Unless you knew what the qualities of that archetype of configuration were. It's not just an antiquarian matter, and it's not just a matter of Jungians wanting to be cute by finding a fairy tale to preface their essay. Let's get a fairy tale, and then we'll have our fairy tale, and then we'll talk psychology. Or we'll have a myth, and then we'll talk psychology. In other words, there's a reason for studying those things. The key reason in terms of psychoanalysis is that these configurations are impersonal. And to the extent that you have not disidentified with these configurations and made them conscious, you're being lived by impersonal patterns. And don't know it. What is individuation to Jung? Becoming an individual. Sounds easy. Not so easy. Because in order to become a person, you have to disidentify from impersonal archetypal structures. And all of these configurations are impersonal archetypal structures. Now, my work for the last 15 years has been in trying to get a little clearer about the deep structures of the archetype, what Jungians have called the archetypal self.

In my work, I've come to believe that the archetypal self is structured both in men and women in this way. There's an eight-fold structure to the archetypal self in you and it's the same in men and women. This is what Jung referred to as the mystery of Conjunctionis or the Hyras, Gamas, the royal couple within. You see it in his alchemical text. You see plates of it. I want to give you a little sense for the different spaces that open out. If you understand this stuff, you understand that the task of the human ego is to learn to differentiate how one feels and thinks when one is in a king or queen space, how one feels or thinks when one is in a warrior space in the psyche. This is inner space. I got called a cartographer of the psyche recently. Okay. How it feels when you're in a magus or magician space, or how it feels when you're in a lover space. Let me just briefly run through these. You can get the tapes, which draw these out in more detail. The space, the emotional space of the King and Queen archetype is the space of just order.

This is the psychological resource configuration, the potential for establishing a center in the psyche, being in touch with what the great historian of religion, Merce Iliadi, called the axis-mundi, the center of the world. If you have a lot of anxiety states, if you have tremendous energy, but you're very frantic, you're not well enough connected to this. It is through connecting with this archetype of the king or queen. It's the way you get that deep tap root, put down the tap root in the psyche so that you can experience a sense of calmness and order. Without that, we'll be seeing later. Without that, the energies of these other configurations do not bring you a sense of peace and connectedness. You also feel cut off from a source of good. You very likely be very depressed if you're cut off from that because you'll feel like an orphan. Howtink how many times when you're depressed, you feel like an orphan. If you look in world mythology, you see a lot of these motifs about the child whose parents are really a royal couple. But they have somehow gotten separated from this royal couple, and the longing is to be rediscovered by that royal couple that is related to this configuration.

So all around the outside of this, you see this in world mythology, is chaos. When this center is put down, that's the cross in Christianity. That's the Kaban in Islam. This is the bow tree in Buddhism. It's the tree of life and world symbolisms of all kinds, the symbolisms of the center. You can get Merce Iliadi's book, Cosmos and History, and he lays out a lot of the imagery around this. Warrior energy, warrior space. When you're in the warrior energy, everything is struggle. If you're not very well connected to the warrior energy, you don't have the focus you need in your life. You don't have the stamina you need. You don't have the capacity to strategize. You don't have the capacity to forget how uncomfortable you are, so that you can do the job. For the warrior configuration in the psyche, everything is the mission. Everything is the task. Everything is subjugated to a transpersonal task. The commission. All the language you've heard about vocation, someone's vocation in the deepest sense of that is related to that configuration. The space is the plane, you might say the plane of Armageddon. This is the archetype of configuration behind the Muslim concept of the mujahin.

Mujahin means one who struggles for God. The interesting thing is that when you get into this space, you will have an enemy. There's a great book that I've talked about in the warrior course entitled The Old enemy. It's written by a man by the name of Forsight. It's about the combat myth and about the way in which when you get into this space, I like to put the warrior couple... The warrior couple in search of and in defense of Cosmos on this sign. You see that across the space, they are faced by the warrior couple, serving chaos. And there's your Worldwide combat myths. In that book, The Old enemy, he lays out a chart showing all the combat myths and how they parallel each other around cross-world culture. So if you're a workaholic, this is your archetypal configuration where you live. Everything is subjugated to the task, and you don't have really the time for a lover. When you have sex, it's more like, Wham, blam, thank you, ma'am, or is in that country song, the woman sings, My baby thinks he's a train. He makes the whistle stop and he's gone again. That's the warrior man trying to be a lover.

We'll think as we go about the way men who are dominated by these different configurations, how they try to be lovers, because it's radically different energy depending on what's dominant. So the warrior, he just doesn't have time. He thinks he ought to be able to read the manual and get it down right. Okay. The Magus, this is the magician, and the magician is the one who interprets everything. In the best times, if it moves, the king will bless it and nurture it, try to bring it into being. If it moves, the warrior will fight it or shoot it. If it moves, the magician will fight it. The magician will interpret it. When a man who's dominated by the magician, as we'll see later, tries to get close to the lover stuff, what does he do? Think about it. Yeah, he does disappear. That's right. That's good. He's skezoid, really. So he becomes a voyeur. All voyeurs are people who are dominated by this Magus configuration. And when they try to get in touch with a lover, they become a psychotherapist and listen to everybody else talk about their sex life. Where did you put that again?

Tell me again. Sex lies in videotape. That's right. Sex lies in videotape. That's right. You can think about it. If you tend to be a real heady person, dominated by the magician energy, there's a lot of voyerism in that, a lot of detachment. In fact, one of the things when we get further into this, it's really fascinating to look at the way in which the traditional understandings of the forms of love parallel to these archetypal structures. Just as a little preview, let me do that for you right now. Okay. Somebody who studied a little bit about all that New Testament theology on the different forms of love. Tell me what the three forms of love that they talk about are. Okay, Aros. Aros, Philia, Agape. Storgas, also for Bowie. And Nothing for Magus. And nothing for Magus. You get it? It's very interesting. We'll get more into this. When that king energy is dominant, it's Agate. And we'll get into that more later. Warriors have a lot of erotic connection, but it is in that tilia form, comrade and arms. There are many men who have known love most intensely right there. There is absolutely no way to understand masculine psyche when it comes to this lover business if you don't get that.

A lot of the attraction of sports to the male psyche has to do with the amount of love they can get in under the guise of beating the hell out of each other. That's true. You see it really clearly when you get that sense of the relatedness of men in these warrior-like context. I just saw this interesting recent thing that Richard Geere did, this internal affairs, in which he plays a sociopath. And if you want a little picture of the shadow lover that has some punch. Go see Internal Affairs. I'll give you some assignments of movies to see in a little while. But what I wanted you to notice when you see that Internal Affairs is the movie is very frank in portraying this touch between men who've been through warrior training together. There is an enormous amount of affection that you can see portrayed in this film between these men, but it's in this warrior mode. You can see it really clearly. The Magus essentially is detached. The Magus thinks up ways to make atomic bombs so we can blow all this shit up so all these other people won't be getting off so much.

I'm not making that up. You need to read some of the interesting work that was done back in the '60s by Markousa and Norman Brown about the necrophilia. We're going to talk about necrophilia. The Magus, who has no direct connection with the lover, is going to be a necrophiliac. He's going to think of ever more creative ways to destroy it all so they can't have it. Yeah, I can't have it. I'm going to think about it. I'm going to study the hell out of you until I can destroy you by knowing you. And then after that, we'll figure out some way that we can just wipe it all out. We can deforest the entire planet. We'll get in later and we'll get into the ecological dimensions of this. The ecology is directly related to this archetypal configuration. The capacity to care about ecology is directly related to the Lover configuration. The Lover space, traditionally in imagery, is the garden. It's the Garden of Eden and it's the Garden of Gethsemane. It is passion in all its forms. It is the space. This is not a space of doing. Get this clear. When you get into the space of the lover, it's not a matter of doing.

It's a matter of being. It is not work. Not worried about making a living, not into career, Not into studying sex manuals. I was thinking about country music. One of the things we'll do at the beginning after the break is to call on our saints, have a little communion of saints. One I want to name here tonight in the context of the lover is Hank Williams, senior. If you listen to the lyrics of Hank Williams senior, you get a little sense for the lover. He died when he was 29, drank himself to death. He knew about this lover archetype. He had a song called, If you got the money, honey, I got the time. You think about that. Now that's the lover archetype talking. If you got the money, I got the time. The lover has time. It's a radical different feeling about time. Didn't you write, She got the gold mine, I got the chef.? No. No. We'll have a quiz next week. Us 99. So anyway, some people have an idea that maturation in the psyche is like a soup. You integrate, you put all this stuff together and stir it up. I don't really believe that's the way it works.

As maturation develops in the ego, the individual is able to access these spaces as appropriate and needed in the psyche in a way that you can think about. It's like the maturing ego gets the keys to the kingdom. You can think about the kingdom as having all these different spaces, and you can't just mix them up. It'll become very clear when you think about it in some depth. If you're trying to get something finished, you don't want to be too aware of your love or archetype. You don't want to have it to have too much influence on you because it will make you very aware of your body, and you'll be aware of how tired you are, and you'll be aware of how much you need to drink, or or whatever comes to you in that space. So it's not that you want to mix all these things up. You want to be able to access them according to the particular adaptive task that you're trying to deal with. There is a certain capacity for cross-fertilization in these things that enables you to realize the fullness or the potential of each of these configurations, and it does require and some of the power, some of the energy off of each one of them to be able to realize the fullness of each.

But you don't mix the spaces up. The spaces don't get to where they're just run soup. This is one of the things which later on, the last evening, we talked a little bit about contemporary sex therapies, for example, in this context. Basically, what they try to do is to help you get into the garden, get into this space, and to totally take a very different approach to space, time, perception, the body, all sorts of things like that. We'll talk about that some. Now let me stop there for a minute and let me see if you have any questions about what I presented here as the structure of the psyche. This is, as I understand it, the structure of the self. Pretty soon I've given a course on this that the institute has tapes on, and I'll be publishing a book on this before very long. But the male ego needs to be built on the king side of this eightfold structure, the female ego on the queen side. And as you know in Jungian psychology, we all have a contra-sexual side. It's called the anima, the animus. The way I understand the anima, the anima contains all of these in a man.

The animus in a woman contains all of these. We'll think a little bit together about as you mature, how you need to be able... A man needs to be able to relate to the female side of these things as well. But in this course, we're talking about the male experience, the masculine side of the lover. Comments, questions, yes.

You mentioned some positive things that each archetype did. The only thing you said for Magus is interpretation,

ritual leadership. The question is, what are some other positive things about the magician archetype? It is the archetype of awareness. In Robert Johnson's book, inner work, this is the archetype of inner work. It's also the archetype of ritual leadership, the capacity to serve as a ritual elder for others. For example, in most of human history, the role of ritual elder was not the province of only one or two very select individuals in the tribe. When a man became a man, he had ritual responsibilities to younger men and others in the tribe. This Magus has the potential for understanding — it's the root of the word hermeneutics — understanding and interpretation, awareness. It's what you have to have if you're going to understand all this psychic plumbing.

You got to get your magician cranked up if you're going to get these things into perspective and get an idea about when you need a little bit more of one and a little bit less of the other, that thing about St. Peter being given the keys to the kingdom, that's Magus archetype. The Magus is very important. It helps you understand how your love is disordered and something about perhaps what to do about it, the inner Merlin. It's very important. It is the archetype under which all psychotherapy operates.

Could you say something about the fact that chaos is on the feminine side of their screen and the Cosmos is on the male side?

Men tend to experience the feminine that's associated with chaos, and there are some... It's a very historical thing, and in order to understand the male psyche, you have to get some idea about why that is. There's a lot of research coming out now about differences in male and female development, which lends some insight into why men tend to associate chaotic things with femininity, and it has to do with the asymmetric nature of developmental challenges between males and female. Charterau's work, recent work, gets into that.

But it's not just feminine. This is a male and female warrior of chaos. The mythology of Satan is the most dominant Western mythology. You might argue that the most dominant images of the warriors of chaos are masculine. You'll see that if you look at that book, The Old enemy, most of the agents of chaos are seen as masculine. But my sense is that it's a couple, archetypically speaking. You get the warrior couple who serve chaos, and you get the warrior couple who serve Cosmos. That's the archetypal struggle. But it's not inaccurate when you're trying to understand masculine psychology. It's not inaccurate to note that men do and have historically tended to demonize the feminine, particularly because of their experienceexperience of, in their experience, connection with the feminine often leads to chaotic emotional states. Yeah. Isn't that the Bible? Still a patient? Yeah. Yeah. There are a lot, he says, isn't there a Biblical motive of Eve being the source of chaos? There are a lot-a lot of different images that present the feminine sources of chaos. I mean, you see this in all sorts of imagery, and for men, it's a very typical imagery. We'll be talking about some of the masculine experiences which may give rise to some of that.

It's very difficult. Frankly, here's the way you got to think about that. I mean, it's like men, contrary to what a lot of people think, often don't experience themselves as equal to the feminine in power. A great deal of problems, as we'll get into this when we talk about the psychopathology of the lover, a great deal of men's problems with being a lover has to do with fear of the feminine. I mean, completely immobilizing, terrifying fear of the feminine. In my book, you show me someone who has been a battering masculine, a man who has battered his wife or girlfriend. I'll show you a man who is terrified of the feminine, and is into getting into the shadow warrior and having pre-emptive strikes on the feminine to try to control it. The therapy for a person like that is to help them strengthen their own warrior side. Anyone who acts out violently like that is insufficiently connected to the warrior. It's very interesting, as we'll get to see later. This is true for women as well as men. It's very interesting. If you're not connected strongly and adequately enough to your warrior, you will not be capable of intimacy unless the intimacy is very destructive, masochistic for you.

Did you get that? You must have the warrior side protecting you from abuse, or you will either choose to stay away, or you will choose to connect in a masochistic way, which will then swing into a sadistic form. So contrary to what a lot of people think, very often men who are violent with their lovers are not men who are really warriors at all. They're men who are not convinced that they can protect themselves.

Does that go for psychological and verbal abuse too?

I would think so. The question is, does that go for psychological and verbal abuse as well as physical abuse? I think so. You need to think about this. Look at how often men who have difficulties in this area regress into rages and distancing. Narcissistic rages usually accompany verbal abuse in men or women. And you show me somebody that's in a narcissistic rage. I'll show you somebody that has felt violated and who feels very, very much in danger. Their selfhood feels in danger. If yourself is in danger every time someone that you care about gets angry with you, then you're very likely to regress into self-preservation modes, which include heavy firepower.

So basically, here's the litmus test. If you lose your temper a lot with your lover, it's because you're afraid of them. You're afraid that yourself cannot sustain this intimacy, this connection. It will fragment. So you must drive them away in order to protect the integrity of the self. It's a strange paradox. What you try to do is to get that inner knight online. The knight is not going to be too good at making love with the armor on, but that's not what he's for. You station the knight right here at the gate. You put him there, and you tell the knight, this is true for men as well as women. You tell the knight, Now, some asshole comes along here and tries to abuse me, take him out. In. But if you hear me moaning, at least check out and see whether I'm being abused or not before you take them out. You got to have a discerning knight who knows when to come into the garden.

How does he discern what moans those are?

Well, he has to know. Needs to study a little bit with a magician. Moans 101. How we know... I'm just half-kitting.

I mean, the point of it is that the knight, this psychological reality has to be on line to protect this space. It's very interesting because if you're a workaholic, your warrior is not protecting you well. If you're a workaholic, your warrior is not seeing to it that you get your time in the garden undisturbed. Your warrior needs to learn to stand at the door and say, No, you cannot see him. You cannot see her now. No. You'll have to wait. If you're a nice good king or a nice good queen and you're trying to make sure everybody is nurtured, you're a good social worker, psychotherapist, clergy type, Oh, well, I've just got to have this agapé. I'm going to love all these people. Well, you will never have time in the garden. You've got to see the way in which all these different potentials have to be there for you. But in terms of this thing we're talking about tonight, it's very distinct, and it has to be protected because it's very fragile. It's a very fragile thing. It's a very delicate thing, that space. If you ever lost an erection, you know how delicate it is.

You know how delicate this space is. Other questions, comments before we take a break? Yeah, David.

These are not all the archetypes. No, no. The question is, why is these four that you have here as what constitutes the self?

All right. Question is, these are not all the archetypes. Absolutely right. Why do these... Why are these four or these eight, I would say, chosen? I say this is the structure of the... This is the inner structure of the self. This is the forms that the archetypal self will break down into if you start splitting, and I'll explain more about that later. I don't know why they are. I just know that they are. I simply look at the different ways in which you see these things manifest in archetypal materials in history, culture, and folklore. It's no accident that you see these four figures in practically all forms of cultural materials. I'm a Jungian. I'm a Jungian's view looking at cultural materials as a form of empirical research. These are not the only archetypes, there are many others. They are the things that form the structural pillars of the adult, mature psyche. Now, there are immature forms of these which have other roles.

For example, the boy magician is the trickster. The immature warrior is the hero. A lot of people conflate the hero and the warrior, but the hero and the warrior are not the same thing at all. It's very, very different. The divine child is the child's king, the advent, Christ in the manger. And there are female counterparts to that. The edible child that you see so often in forms like Adonis, the boy lover of the great-mother, is the immature form of the lover. Freud's whole psychology is based on a psychology of the boy lover and the girl lover, not the man and woman lover. The whole ediple thing is a study of the role of the boy and girl lovers in human psychopathology. The. So basically, when you look at this, you look at the way in which the images of maturity, and masculinity and femininity are portrayed in different human cultures cross-culturally. I will submit to you that if you will look, this is what you will find. Cross-culturally in any human culture, you will find essentially these four structures in both the images of the male and the female. Other comments or questions before we stop?

Yes. I think on that energy thing between king and warrior. For King, you said lots of energy, but frantic. For the warrior, you said lots of energy but poorly connected, no focus.

No, you got it backwards there. The king is very centered. Calmness, the peace that passes understanding. If it went wrong, if it went wrong, that's right, if it went wrong. If the warrior energy is not connected with it properly, you will get a lot, a lot of fiery energy. A lot of fiery energy. Mars. This is the space of Mars, Aries. A lot of fiery energy, but it shakes a lot, vibrates a lot. It's the workaholic space. There's a whole shadow side that emerges when these energies are too dominant, any of them are too dominant. You can think about it as four pillars. If any of them are weak, then you get some pathological expression. As we will see later, in human religion, the images of God often include all these together. I think that's the way you think about the archetypal self, and we'll get into that after the break. You can... You can see in discussions of various gods, you can see it's like a jewel, which you turn the jewel, it has different facets.

You will notice that you can think of the God, and you can see traditions in any religion. You can see the traditions about the God, which view them in each of these configurations. The qualities of the God are radically different depending on which side of the jewel you're looking at. We'll get into that more after the break. Yes. Is there a positive side to chaos? Or is that usually- Well, in terms of human mythology, chaos is not seen as a positive thing. A lot of people get confused. They confuse chaos with liminality or the space of dissolution. But when we study anthropology, we find that transformative space is not chaotic. It is structured. It's just a different structure. If you study Victor Turner's work, his work on, particularly in the book, The Ritual Process, his work on liminality. This is the space of liminality. So transformative space, which would be the closest thing to what people would call chaos, is not at all chaotic. You get chaos when there's no containment, where there's no ritual leadership, you get chaos. And so in the history of the human race, chaos is seen as associated with evil.

You'll look, for example, at the book called Anthropology and Evil, and it lays that thing out, that and the old enemy book. Chaos is associated with destruction of human worlds. I don't know. I think it's totally totally true. I think it's totally true. I think it's totally true. I think it's totally true. Well, there are people that romanticize it, and they associate, for example, the death side in a death-rebirth cycle with chaos. But in my personal view, that's a misunderstanding of the human experience of ritual process. The dissolution phase in the psyche, if you'll study human ritual, always transfers the center out of the center of the human consciousness to a transpersonal center. You got to study Iliadi to get that. In other words, chaos, and death, and evil are associated in the human psyche. It doesn't mean it's not there structurally. That's a theoretical question. Do you think there's an archetypal shadow or not? Do you think that there's some principle of disorder in the psyche, in the hardwiring? That's a theoretical question. A lot of people argue about that. If you've heard my lectures on psychology of Satan, I think there is an archetypal shadow in the hardwiring, which if it gets constellated, will hasten your death fast.

But do I think that's good? No, I'm a shrink. I see what it does to people. I spend my time making war on that shit. I don't romanticize it. I see people's life going right down the tubes of chaos. But that's my personal opinion. I could be wrong. Let's take a break. We need to- Yeah.

In regards to archetype, you mentioned that they were impersonal. Yes. Would that be the same as being pre-personal or trans-personal?

Both. Question. Is about the archetype. I said that it's impersonal. He says, is that pre-personal or trans-personal? It's both. That is to say, these things form the materials out of which you create a self with a little S. That's individuals. Individuals is the human self emerging in its beauty and balance. In a sense, the archetype of structure out of which you create this is pre-personal in a sense. It's also trans-personal. Because these things transcend any individual. You can just study. There needs to be a lot more work done like Jung did it, the cross-cultural studies. There are too many Jungians today that don't do any cross-cultural studies. Let's see. In my view, to be a Jungian, you go to the cross-cultural materials.

Otherwise, you think that doing dream interpretation makes you a Jungian. Everybody does dream interpretation. You know what's the difference between a Jungian and a Gestaltist? With a lot of them, there's not any difference. But if somebody's doing it like Jung did it, the person who's a young in gets into the cross-cultural, historical, and comparative study, so you can see the structures. So that when you look at a dream, you know what structures you're seeing. You have some sense about what they're for. But anyway, that's some more, to honor Gestalt, that's some more elephant shit, as Fritz Perls would say. It's very appropriate to mention Fritz, and tonight we're talking about the archetype of the lover, because Gestalt psychology is a psychology that operates under the archetype of the lover. You think about that. You think about different psychotherapeutic approaches, and they tend to be in one or more of these configurations. But let me jump in now. Let's just get a sense for... Try to get some sense for this particular space. I want to start out, let's invoke some saints, which if this was on the Cunion Teo, we would talk about the female lovers.

We'd get Janice Joplin and all these folks. But let's stick with the male side. Now, let's talk about men who have been priests and high priests of this energy and who are now not with us. I'm going to name a few. Remember, I'm not saying balanced. I'm saying high priests of this energy, and I'm going to name a couple, and then let's have you name some that you think would be this: Richard Burton, Jimi Hendrix, Jim Morrison, Elvis Presley. She's going to be that? The King of love. You think about these folks. Louis Armstrong. He's still alive, thanks be to God. Chuck Berry, they said. Let's just stay with people that if you're going to invoke the Communion of Saints. See, each one of these configuration has a Communion of Saints to go with it. John Lennon. Just folks that have passed. No, I don't think that... That's King energy. Let's stay with people that are deceased. Vincent Van Gogh. Casanova. Casanova. There are a lot of us think about it, be thinking about it. Oscar Wilde. You can think about one of the things you want to do. This gets us ahead to the last week, when you start thinking about ways of accessing this energy.

You need to have your community of saints. Thank you. You need to have your own community of saints.. As I said earlier, Hank Williams is one of them. Robert Browning? Browning. Yeah. You just work on your list this week of your science, people that connote that for you. Because what was connoted for me won't connote it for you. But one of the things we'll talk about the last session is, imagine on techniques, price, among other things, of accessing this energy as well as others. One of the things you ought to develop is your list of saints of the archetype of a lover, priesthood, this type of thing. You will notice—we'll get into this a little bit—that historically, this is affiliated with music, dance, and the arts a lot of the time. It's no accident that we get into pathology of this. There's no accident that so many creative people mainline this thing, and have difficulties that are related to mainlining the lover stuff. Let me start a little bit with talking a little bit about mythological sources. You can see this in world mythology, and you can see it in all the world's mythologies.

I'll just mention a few here. Of course, the one that Jean Bolen has picked up, and if you haven't seen her God's in every man book, you ought to look at this. It's a really useful book to think about masculine psychology. Her discussion of Dionysius in Greek mythology is an excellent discussion of a certain aspect of the Lover archetype in men. I'll be talking a little bit more later about the way in which this Dianesian motive reflects some of the difficulties that men have when they're really in touch with this energy, when they don't just completely split it off and project it on somebody else. But when you really get in touch with the archetype of lover energy, you start having some issues come up that are like the issues that the Dionesian man has that BOLDin talks about. You look at Dionesius in Greek thought. It's very interesting when you look at Hindu mythology. Hinduism, in many ways, is the cultural tradition, which has a rich, rich development of this Lover motif, this Lover archetype of material. It has not been cleaned up in Hindu thought and culture. In fact, many of the very things that make Indian culture, not Native American, but Indian culture, difficult to get a handle on.

For example, the socialist. People go into Indian culture and they try to get that rationalized. They try to get all that warrior, king, organizational energy going, and they find that someone once said something about wishing that the Chinese communists would come in and try to take over India and see what would happen. And their implication on what they said, they didn't think they would do too well. Very probably, it's one of the reasons for that, if it's true. Who knows if it's true. But I think what that person was feeling when they said that was the richness of the Lover archetype in Indian culture. I mean, if you're familiar with Indian culture, you see it in the way the foods are presented, the subtlety of the smells in Indian cooking. There is an incredible richness in Hindu teachings about various yoga traditions. It's very interesting that, for example, look at Wendy Doniger's book. It used to be Wendy Doniger or Flaherty, but we know her now as Wendy Doniger. Her book, Shiva, the erotic esthetic. Speaking of the great, powerful God of the Shaivite tradition in India, she makes it very clear in there that Shiva is so full of himself erotically that he's tempted just to be erotic all the time.

But he also is so full of the the magician, what I would call a magician energy, that he's tempted to be esthetic all the time. There's this enormous tension in the person of Shiva, this Hindu God, that is never resolved in any of the myths. It's always a tension, this tension between these different sides of his nature. The lure of delight is so powerful for this God that it never is domesticated. It can never be domesticated. If you look at this stuff from the point of view of masculine psychology, you really get a sense of the Hindu experience of phalic, male phalic, transpersonalenergy. Because the symbol of Shiva is a great phallus. If you go to the great Shiva temples, as I have off the Coast of Bombay, and go in the temples and see the enormous Shivalika in these caves, and see the reverence with which the Indian people will treat this particular energy. You see the incredible reverence for a non-domesticated, masculine, erotic power. In the Shiawite tradition, this is the most fundamental energy in the universe. How high is this great phallus? It is so high. It is so high that all the other gods try to fly up to get up to the top of it, and they've never been able to find the top of it.

It is so high. Somebody's been taking cocaine. It is so deep that none of the gods have been able to find the bottom of it. And so all the other gods can do when confronted with this great phalus of Shiva is they fly up and down it. The worshiper can just bring a little butter and rub on it. You get a little sense. They don't have this Christian problem with that. I'm going to get to some Christian hymns that get at that a little bit in a minute. But the other tradition that I want you to look at, I really wish you would look at some of these myths during this course, so you can get a feel for this. But the traditions about Krishna are rich with this type of thing. In my Hyde Park Consulting room, I have an Indian painting of Krishna and the Gopis, in which they're all doing a Krishnan of the God comes to all of these souls, represented as females, the Gopis, the Kalmaids, and he's dancing with all of them in a circle dance, and you see the mandala there. The thing that's so wonderful about the Krishna traditions, and if you know any of the Krishna people here in Chicago, or if you've studied any of their sensibilities, you get this sense that they have.

They have this incredibly beautiful sense of the beauty of this God. That's the thing that strikes them the most, the beauty of this God. This God is so beautiful. This God may not be particularly moral sometimes. Or any of the other things that people in the Judeo-Christian, Islamic traditions tend to associate with the God. But this Krishna is a lover, par ex salons. If you get into trying to understand the mythology of Krishna, you must understand that he is first and foremost a lover. And that when he plays his flute and you hear that music, he's got you. Get that? You hear the music and he's got you. You're enthralled by him. What you're enthralled by is just the beauty of it. And you want to dance with him. This... If you talk about the Lord of the dance, I mean, Krishna is the Lord of the dance. The book I wanted to recommend that you look at is a book of medieval Hindu poetry. I put it in the catalogof the book, Jayya devas Gita Govinda, called The Love Song of the Dark Lord. It is all of this wonderful poetry, erotic poems between Krishna and Radha, the goddess, his partner.

You want to look at that. I think of all the world's traditions. The Hindu mythological and religious tradition is the most accepting and celebrated of this. You see this very clearly. You've heard of the Kama Sutra, right? Well, the way is a yoga. It is a yoga of love. In the Hindu tradition, you have the way of devotion, you have the way of the householder, way of work, all these things, all these other ways, but you have the way of love. It is a yoga equally prized, at least with all the other yogas. It is a way of liberation, just as these other more esthetic approaches to yoga. There are all sorts. If you go to one of these New Age bookstores, you'll see these books, Sexual Secrets. What that's about is the way of Kama, K-A-M-A. Look at that stuff as you're beginning to look into this mythology.

I'm sorry, when you're in period, music that goes along with the.

Yeah, I've had some nice fantasies about playing music for you guys to set the tone of these things. One of the things I thought about was maybe getting some of those Krishna Bajans that the people that dance this play.

If I can get a hold of one of those tapes, maybe one of the sessions, we'll put that on a little bit before the session, so you just get a feel for these Bajans, this praise of the Lord Ramadan. You go to places in the world where the Lord Ramadan is alive for people mythologically, and they sing to him all the time. They sing this praise to the Lord, Ramah. You get this feeling for the beauty of Ramah. I'll try to find some of that. I don't know if I'll be able to do it. Let me talk a little bit now about Christianity. What you ought to do is to try to get a hymnal, a Christian hymnal. It can be Catholic or Protestant. It doesn't really matter too much. But go down through there and look under the section on love and read the hymns on love, and you get all sorts of clear expressions about Christ, the lover, and the Gospels. Ireveles, particularly the four Gospels, present a lot of images of Christ as the divine lover. Going so far, even in some texts talk about God is love and that thing. All of the songs around Christmas, around Advent, the Christmas mythology is about the birth in the world of love.

It would be impossible to get a feeling for Christian mythology without seeing this side of the Christ of the Judeo-Christian tradition. It is one of the very most central things. Now, this side, the archetype of the lover, is really not highlighted a lot in some traditions. For example, if we take the Roman Catholic tradition, now, if you're a Jesuit, you don't highlight Jesus the lover all that much compared to the more martial motifs, the more warrior motifs. If you're a Franciscan, however, there's a lot more permeation of this archetype of the lover in the spirituality. It's very interesting to look at different denominations, different religious orders, and think about which archetype of configuration tends to dominate in that order. In Protestantism, for example, in the reform tradition, you get a downplay of the archetype of the lover. In the evangelical Christian traditions, you get a little bit more of a puffing of the archetype of the lover. For example, in gospel traditions, in gospel music, you get a lot of emphasis on Jesus, the lover. There are a lot of old gospel songs where you see this very clearly. I like to tell the story about the editor, actually of a major hymn book who back in the early '60s, they just come out with this new hymn book.

I will not name the denomination.

audo_enhanced_The Lover Within 03.mp3

[00:00:00.170] 
This editor of this hymnbook was to have a celebration of his new hymnbook at this theological seminary. His students decided they would have a little roast. One of the very attractive young women music students dressed up in a very, very Peggy, Lee, torchie, red dress, red cabare, sing, or dress. He had back at the back and they were having this presentation service. They had brought him down and sat him down in the front row. At the right time, one of the local jazz pianists came up, sat down at the baby grand and started playing some bluesy jazz licks. Then she started down the aisle in this big, solemn assembly. She came up toward him and she sang, Have thine own way, Lord. (audience laughter) Have thine own way. Thou art the potter, I am the club. Mold me and make me after thy will, while while I am waiting, yielded, and still brought down the house. If that editor is hearing this tape right now, his face is a little as red as it was that day. I mean, that was quite a scene, brought down the entire house. But that's not the only one you could do that with.

[00:01:50.980] 
If you know anything about those old evangelical hymns, they're very erotic. The reason they're erotic is that this lover stuff is right there. It's just that in our manochion tendencies in Christian, our dualistic tendencies in Christianity, we tend to want to deny this has anything to do with sex and the body and all that good stuff, we think it's all real spiritual in some disembodied way. But if you understand this archetype, you can feel the embodiment of that stuff in these hymns. Today, we're much more capable of speaking of sexuality and spirituality in the same breath. Back in the 19th century and even earlier 20th century, we couldn't really do that. I've talked a little bit about Hindu motifs. Let me just say a word about love in the Buddhist tradition. It's very easy to miss the motive of the archetype of love in Buddhism, but it's very, very powerful. The reason it's easy to miss it is because of all that emphasis on asceticism, particularly in some of the traditions, Henianna traditions, and the dominance of that Magus configuration, that monk Magus, sorcerer configuration tends to obscure the power of this lover stuff in Buddhism.

[00:03:36.510] 
But if you look very closely, you really see emerging, particularly in the idea of the compassionate Buddha. In fact, you look at Kans's book, The Teachings of the Compassionate Buddha. You look into those Bodhisatwa traditions where they talk about the persons like Kua Nien, who is the female representation of the Bodhisatwa of compassion. But there are many masculine embodiments of that. The idea of coming in and being a blessing, being a river of compassion to all creatures is the lover archetype manifesting itself in Buddhism. There are many, many rich forms of Buddhism where you can see this very clearly. Now, yeah, Steve.

[00:04:39.990] 
In terms of Judaism, for this archetype, are you familiar with Hasidism?

[00:04:47.090] 
Yes. Oh, yeah. The question is about this archetype in Judaism. You can say a lot about that. He's saying that you see that clearly in the Hasidic tradition. It's absolutely true. But you see it in a widespread manner in Judaism. In many ways, Judaism is much more comfortable with this archetypal configuration than Christianity has been in many of its forms, certainly as it has to do with ordinary life. For example, the sensibilities that you get, if you've been to Fidler on the roof, if you go to Fidler on the roof, and you'll get a feeling of the lover modality as it's expressed in the tradition.

[00:05:37.650] 
And that's richly expressed in lots of different forms, the love of ordinary life, the sanctification of ordinary life, the joy, the dance, the blessing of so many aspects of an enjoyment of ordinary things in life. There's nothat, for example, it's very interesting, see, can you imagine a rule for Christian clergy and priests that you have to make love to your wife on the Sabbath? In the Jewish tradition, sexuality and this configuration is integrated in so that it's understood that there is a sanctification that is making holy, that this aspect of life is very holy and lifted up. You could do a lot more with that, but we don't really have time. Let me talk about folklore, fairy tales a minute, and then let's talk a little bit about popular culture some more before we run out of time. In fairy tales, this motive is very rich, the archetype of lover. You see it, I think, most clearly in all of the motifs around the kiss in fairy tales. For example, if you look at sleeping beauty, the image of the way in which the kiss awakens, brings to life is a servant of life. You ought to be thinking about what is there about the kiss that is related to this archetype.

[00:07:36.660] 
After next week, you'll be able to get a feel for it, I think. That is, the kiss is a capacity to awaken through a a gentle valuing. That is something that is presented all throughout folklore, the magic of the kiss. But it's an embodied form. The kiss brings an end to enchantment or bondage. The kiss is a way of liberation in folklore. And if you look in your fairy tales, you will see all sorts of motifs around that. And you should particularly look at that fairy tale and think about the liberation brought by the lover who comes, yes. It's the same thing, yes. If you look at mythology, you kiss frogs, you kiss hags. In a lot of the myths, you read through Joseph Campbell's mask of God, and look at all those. See, Joseph Campbell did a lot of things with the mythology of the lover. And if you look through his set, the mask of God, you'll see a lot of his elaborations about this motive and the transformative effects of the kiss for the person who's courageous enough not to run. We'll be thinking about that as we go. Yes. Not to make too big of fun on it, but where does the kiss of death feel?

[00:09:28.860] 
Well, there's a thing in this archetype. The question is, well, where does this kiss of death business come in? That's where we get to that Dionysian energy. And—b. Allen—love and Woody Allen, Love and Death. I mean, there's something in this archetype that in male experience, there's a linkage in there somewhere between love and death. And what's one of the things we want to be thinking about as we look at the positive potential of love and then it's the pathology of love. Just briefly at this point, there is a sense in which in ecstasy, one experiences a death of the ego, the separated ego, so. In other words, this archetype is going to try to get you so into somebody else or somethe thing else that you lose yourself. And that's a death. Excuse me? Are you talking about a projection or- Well, we'll get into that a lot. The question he's saying, Well, is that a projection? We will talk about these lover projections and what the self-psychologist today talked about is self-object transferences or self-object relationships, fusions that we get into with other people. That's related. But whatever you want to psychologize about it all you want to.

[00:11:28.840] 
Tonight, we're not psychologizing it so much. We want to just get the feeling of it. When you're into this thing, you just want to get into things. You want to get into it. You want them to get into you. You want to lick it. You want to find all its amplitudes. And the more esthetic and erotic the experience, the less the concern for boundaries. And see, if you're an artist, when you're doing some of your best work, you're losing track of where you stop and the creative act begins. One of the things that I will talk about when we get into talking about the pathology of the lever, is the problem that you get when you really start connecting with this of overstimulation. I mean, that's the way they talk about it today in psychoanalysis. It's a calm word, overstimulation. But if you're dealing with this thing, as many of you are probably, the more creative you are, the more you deal with this, you get into something or someone so intensively that you cannot shut it off. Like that country's song, Whoever turns you on forgot to turn you off. I'm not in need.

[00:13:22.410] 
It's that you just can't stop. It's like the Rolling Stones. I mean, I can't get no satisfaction. I try, though, and I try, and I try, and I try. Okay, which gets us into drug, sex, and rock and roll, which is The Locuste's archetype. I mean, I wasn't kidding you when I said I would have played Give me some loving for you because… You would have a lot better sense for this archetype than me talking about it. You hear that song, and I'll try to arrange to be able to play you some of this raw energy. See? If you get, Bach, Jesus, joy of man's desiring. Now, that's the Lover archetype, but it's real refined. It is real balanced. Bach had all these things, serving it, serving that, Yesu, Joy, Man, it's his iron. He even turned on Bach. Now, what we'll have to play for you is some of the Stones or you country music lovers, Hank Jr, when he's on a roll, you start looking at the music side of this thing. See, it's no accident that so many rock stars burn up and die on. This is the energy they get into.

[00:15:19.840] 
You don't want to live to be old. In fact, you can tell somebody that's really shooting up with this thing because they can't imagine themselves 40 years old if they're a young person. That we're still alive and kicking. That's right. Anytime you see any of these, like this recent book on the stones that came out, this aging faces. Anytime you see aging rock stars, you say, Oh. There's some structure there helping them balance that stuff. Because the ones that burn up just didn't have the balancing resources to try to help them maintain their selfhood in the face of all that energy. If you haven't been to a rock concert, that's the temple of this God. It's true pretty much of practically any really powerful popular musician in concert. If you go to these concerts, if you haven't been to one, if you read about it and study about it and all that stuff, but you never go to any of these concerts during this course, you ought to try to go to some live music, get the reader Thursday, and this weekend go out, hear some live music, and try to get a feeling for this energy, because that live music context is the space of this archetype.

[00:17:17.430] 
Now, we are out of time. I want to talk a little bit about films. There are a lot of films that deal with this thing, and I want you to try to look at some films as you're trying to immerse yourself in this energy. Your family is going to wonder what's going on. But I'd like for you at least before next week to see Zorba the Greek and see if you can get any of the films done on DH Lawrence's works, Women in Love, Sons and Lovers, even The Rainbow. A lot of other things about The Shadow Lover. Think of other films, positive and negative aspects of this lover stuff that you think people ought to see to get into this energy. Play Misty for me. Play Misty for me, that's Shadowy Lover. Last tango in Paris. Last tango in Paris. The Shadow Lover would be also someone who has such a good course without any feelings of love. Yeah. Anything treating a lot of promiscuity would be an imaging of the compulsive lover. Dangerous liaisons. Dangerous liaisons is a good film. The movie, did you see the Pacino film, Sea of Love? Go to see Sea of Love if you can.

[00:19:07.460] 
Nine and a half weeks. One that I'd also like you to try to see as soon as possible is all that jazz story of Bob Fossey. That's got so much of this energy in it. And if you just look at that all that jazz movie, you will see the beauty of this thing and the death right there with the artist. Just starkly portrayed as if they were trying to teach us about the archetype of a lover by making that film. What else? Somebody in the realm of the census. Any others? Felini is eight and a half, Angelheart. That's really the archetypal shadow there. -arabian Nights. -arabian Nights. -arabian -Arabian Nights. It's very interesting, the Arabian Nights. Think, be thinking about this, and we'll do this again next week, about things you ought to look at. That gives you plenty to start with. When you go home tonight, put on some rock and roll and turn it up loud.

[00:20:37.380] 
For about the last 15 years, I've been working on trying to get some sense of the deep structures of the masculine psyche and working on trying to understand the configurations of potential that are within the human self.

[00:20:56.550] 
I've been working on trying to lay this out in some schema that is understandable and which people can see the way in which these potentials interact and mutually support each other in a maturing male psyche. Now, as you know in Jungian psychology, we see masculine and feminine in the psyche balanced in the deep self. I've talked about how Jung, image that in the... Can you hear me back there? I'm all right. Image that in the image of the sacred marriage or the hyrus gammas. Well, in the introduction to this and other places I have gone into the way in which I believe when you decode the structure, the archetype of structure of the psyche, you see there are four couples within, a king and queen with their own particular space that they generate, which is a just order, which is a hospitable order, which makes room for and empowers all of the royal family that emerges between them. If you study mythology, you'll see this image everywhere, from Native American to Hindu culture to others. Of course, you don't see it in patriarchy. In patriarchy, you get this idea that a lonely God is better than one that is not lonely.

[00:22:45.150] 
Kind of a weird idea. It's amazing how it's lasted so long. But anyway, then there's a warrior couple which is in the space of struggle to the extent that one is living in the warrior space, and many of us workaholic types are. We call it just being serious about our careers, but it's really a pathology, a sickness. I'm going to get into that some tonight. We'll get into it even more next week. But everything is struggle. Everything is action. If you're really good at this warrior business, your motto is the same as George Paton's. Attack, attack, attack. That's that energy. It has a lot of very important contributions to the psyche and to human culture, and it does not deserve the slandering and misunderstanding that that particular configuration is received. Then there is the magician couple known in the Occult as the priests and the priestess. If you want to see this acted out, find a neo-pagan group of which there are many here and around the country, and go to one of their rituals, and you'll see the priests and priestess act this archetypal pattern out. They are the stewards of transformative space, what Victor Turner called liminality, the space of death and rebirth, which is the space that we need.

[00:24:32.170] 
This is the archetypal configuration of going inward and becoming aware of waking up. The whole philosophy of Gordiev was based on waking up. The archetype of the magician in men and women is that archetype of waking up, coming to. When he came to himself, he... It's the image of doing away with enchantment. It's breaking the spell, the enchanted enclosure of consciousness. But in this course, we're dealing with the lover couple. This couple tends to be heavily in the shadow in Judeo-Christian, Islamic culture, but it's in the shadow in a very widespread way throughout human experience. It is very difficult to integrate this potential into life. It's very slippery. It tends to slip out. It tends to move across boundaries. Well, as we will get into it in a minute, you can't domesticate this at all. It's hard to domesticate any of these. You can't really domesticate any archetypal energies, but this one, this scares people. Yet, as we'll see later this evening, tonight I'm not going to talk about it, shadow side. I'm going to be an advocate for this energy tonight. Next week, we will be dealing with the shadow side. I started out with thinking about the structure of the psyche, thinking about some of the expressions and myth and then folklore, of which there are many.

[00:26:29.070] 
You could have a multi-session. You could have many courses just on the mythology of the lover. Read Joseph Campbell's Creative Mythology to get at the mythology of the lover. But next week, we'll look at the pathology of the lover, the boy lover. Then the final session, we'll talk about ways to heal and connect with, access this energy in a way that can feed your life and give you the qualities and potentials that we'll be talking about tonight. Tonight, we're not going to try to give a balanced treatment of anything. We're going to try to represent, try to talk about this energy, what it's in there for, what it does, and what it's for, and why you dare not ignore this energy, not just because if you ignore it, it will sneak up on you and come at you from the back door and through the shadow, but for the things which it has to offer a human being in life. Let me get started here and just begin by... We really should have dedicated this whole class to Robert Blyth. Because he's carrying the the lover for men around all over everywhere today. I mean, people project men that have trouble with this aspect of their personality tend to project this on the poets and on the writers and on the artists and so forth.

[00:28:16.630] 
Then one of the things that's hard about being a poet, or an artist, or a musician is because people are so ready to dump this on you and expect you to carry it for them. It tends to make you a little crazy. I will see why. But this is really, as I said, not in gest last week. This is the archetype of drugs, sex, and rock and roll. It's not just the archetype of refined music and sublimed poetry and all these things. You get a sense of the energy of this thing when you get a lot of volume and a lot of passion and a lot of bass guitar. In fact, it's really sacraligious in terms of the God and goddess of love for us not to have some hell-raising music to start this off. I try it again, but we couldn't get that. Some of these Apollonian deities are interfering, but anyway, we'll see. Next week, you can come as your shadow lover next week, and we'll see how many of you got the guts to do that. But Robert Bly is always talking about in his in imitable way. I'm going to try.

[00:29:50.630] 
Robert, I'm going to try to imitate you one of these days when I get the courage up. I'm still practicing my Norwegian. There you go. Okay, he can do it better. But Bly is talking about the wild man. He's always talking, This is a service people. What is this? This is a sly going around talking about the wild man, trying to get these men to get in touch with their wild man. Well, what is that all about? Well, to top it off, he's not just talking about getting in touch with your wild man. He's always saying to groups of men, A man is supposed to be getting into trouble. He's about to think about that. He said, If you're not getting into trouble, something's wrong. Now, you're going to have to get a feeling for this archetype if you're going to get a sense for what he's talking about. Now, I like to clean it up. I try to say, Well, Robert doesn't really mean that. He really is talking about the archetypal self. You can't domesticate the archetypal self, and that's part right. But he really does mean. If you're a man, you ought to be getting in a little trouble.

[00:31:05.640] 
And so more specifically, what he's really getting at, and what he comes out of so beautifully so much of the time is this lover energy, and it does not respect boundaries. It's one of the things that you got to get real clear about. Remember, you got to study this archetypal stuff because archetypes aren't nice. None of them are nice, and they're not balanced. See? They are full, and they pressed their case imperialistically. That's why people tend to stay away from archetypes as much as they can and be bland and boring. Because if you get in touch with any of the archetypes, it tends to want to take over and possess you and use your body to do its thing. This is not just true of the lover archetype, it's true of all of them. But this particular energy, one of its characteristics is it doesn't respect boundaries. There's a lot of talk today about shame. There's a lot of interest in psychoanalysis now and in psychotherapy and family systems and all that thing about shame. Well, shame, they say that, well, such and such culture is a shame culture, but this culture is a guilt culture.

[00:32:47.990] 
But if you really know the truth of it, all cultures are shame cultures. That is, one of the ways they get control over you is by teaching you to be ashamed of yourself, teaching you to be ashamed first of your body, and to be ashamed especially of your enthusiasm. You want to be real careful about showing anybody your enthusiasm, because if you do, you're likely to get a very stiff, what fraudians would call, anal response. Your you can feel that in your body, living in your own.tighten those finkers, folks. But what you get in this archetype is you get a pressure toward shamelessness. The archetype of a lover doesn't understand that shame crap. It's not into hiding. It's not into not being seen. It's not into being nice and not making anybody uncomfortable with your body. The archetype of lover pushes you—and I get this, and if you can watch your own bodily response to this, if you get in touch with it—it will push you from your shame reactions with other people to passionate play and display. Passionate playand display. That is, this is located in the area of your exhibitionism. There's a lot of talk now about shy people, people who are shy.

[00:34:56.960] 
There's people getting to be experts in shyness today. Well, I just wrote a book on shyness. Well, they're talking about what the psychoanalyst have always talked about is capacity to be exhibitionistic. One thing that I really love about the Freudian School of Psychoanalysis is that they understand that there is a healthy exhibitionism. One of the things we'll talk about as we go tonight is the capacity to get to the place where you can stand and contain your healthy desire to display yourself to others. I don't mean just in sexual contact, but your healthy desire to display yourself. Now, I want us to think about dancing in that context, and we'll get to it in a little bit, but think about the role of dance in this, and you can think about it. Healthy, shameless display. I don't want you to underestimate the power of a psyche that can do that. I want you to be thinking with me tonight about the strength of a personality that's the capacity of a personality that can shamelessly display itself physically as well as otherwise. That is a potential that very few of us are capable of letting come out without the help of some substance or another.

[00:36:39.510] 
Okay, now in the archetypal tradition, I mentioned a little bit about this last week. They talk about this as they locate this in the space. The space of the lovers is the garden. Throughout world mythology, the garden symbolizes the space where one doesn't have to worry about working. In other words, you leave the warrior at the gate. You don't worry about caring for others in some responsible way. Oh, my God, I got to be a good father or a good mother or a good whatever. That responsible caring is left out of the garden. In the garden, you're not making love to somebody out of the goodness of your heart. Well, I know she needs this. It's that time again. I'm sorry. The getting into the garden is a room in the psyche. It is a distinctive space. One of the things we'll talk about briefly, what passes for sexual therapy today, the last session. But the best things about those attempts to help people with their sexuality is the way in which they try to change the perception of space and time through various techniques, and we'll talk about that a little bit the last session.

[00:38:36.190] 
But all that stuff is, and they don't really understand it, they're trying to help people get out of a certain space, time, time. You want to get out of the space time of the King and Queen in their caring mode. Get out of the space time of the warrior couple with their struggling mode, struggling against chaos. Get out of the space and time of the magician couple who has to understand everything and get it all right. To get into the space of the garden where one is into being sensuous and experiencing and not being in a hurry, not being aware of clock time in the same way that you are in other spaces of the psyche. It is a distinctive space, a capacity to get into the garden where you can forget all that shame stuff. You can get into play and display and not experience the discouraging eyes, the disapproving eyes that you get in other kinds of spaces if you try to display yourself. Yourself. Think about the places in your life where you're able to be enthusiastic without running into that shaming looks, without somebody meeting you with adifficult thought. I'm going to go back like that.

[00:40:22.000] 
Now, another capacity that this particular potential in the psyche has is what I like to call, along with the great philosophical theologian Bernard Mayland, appreciative consciousness. If you want to read somebody who's aware of this perception and has talked about it in some depth, you want to read Norman Brown's work, particularly his books, Life Against Death and Love's Body. In that he talks about Aros and art, Aros and language. Aros, you might even talk about it this way in terms of the contemporary world of scholarship. You would talk about a whole erotic approach to interpretation, in which you can appreciate that which you come to. You don't try to distance yourself from it. You're not into having depreciation be your first movement of interpretation. It's very interesting today. A lot of the time when you get into people who study literature, what do we talk about the field in which you study literature? A lot of the time we talk about literary criticism, in which often a scholar's competence is determined on how much criticism of the text or of the narrative and so forth they can provide, rather than their capacities for appreciation of an artistic creation.

[00:42:21.970] 
I mean, if you go into university departments, it's very interesting. A lot of people go into the study of literature expecting to be with a group of people who are appreciating epiphanies of the soul. What they find is a lot of people into literary dissection tables. So this capacity is not... This archetypal configuration does not come at the world that way. I've said that if you're coming out of the king and Queen, if it moves, you bless it. You want to nurture it. If you're coming out of the war, you want to fight it. If you're coming out of the magician, you want to interpret it. You want to understand it. When you're coming out of this one, you want to appreciate it. It's a unique consciousness. To get a feeling for it, you really have to get into reading, say, something like Leaves of Grass by Walt Whitman, or you have to get into something like the work of William Blake and look at Blake's paintings and read his poetry and get some sense about the way in which he felt that if you really were in touch with this energy, that the world becomes luminous for you.

[00:44:13.700] 
It's not just… The world is not just vast expanses of darkness and depression and boredom with a few little hyrophonies here and there. Well, there's a hyrophony over there. Let's travel over there and see if we can build a little shrine to it. I mean, imagine that now. Think of the difference between the person that is living are really in touch with this circuitry and the experience of the world which views it is chiefly dead and depressing and an expanse of emotional desert with a few oasis here and there. It's a radically different perception of the world. For someone who is into this perception, fueled by connection with this archetypal potential, the entire landscape tends to glisten. This is a very interesting thing here. One of the ways to get at this and to test how you're doing with regard to this one is you're what I might call a boredom quotient. That is to say, just take a little note, how much of the time in your life are you bored? If you find yourself bored very much of the time, you're out of touch with this particular configuration. See, it's very interesting. You can be bored and be a workaholic.

[00:46:06.820] 
We'll get into that a good bit later. Yeah. Let me restate your comment for the tape. He's saying that this sound, this appreciative consciousness sounds like the wonderment that one has spontaneously as a child. Then he raises the question about how do you stay in touch with this? He says it's like hearing a joke more than once that you think it becomes stale. There's a concept in literary criticism that talks about that. It's the concept of sedimentation. It is a treatment of human perception and human consciousness. That is to say, there is a tendency for us to become enthusiastic about some experience, and then it tends to go dead on us and we can't find the enthusiasm for it anymore. There's a lot of thought. People have given a lot of thought to that thing. I think that that's one of the reasons why people tend to romanticize childhood. People will often come up to me when I'm lecturing on the lover, and they'll say, Well, now you're really talking about the child within. Then they go into the the child or the natural child or the magical child and all that thing. Sure, that is the energy that's being talked about here.

[00:47:39.250] 
But what is really sad is the way in which we are so cut off with the adult lover within that we project that onto the child and then envy the children. We envy the hell out of children because they haven't been separated from that part of themselves yet. They haven't been shamed enough yet to learn how to be nice. What I like to say to people is that there is nothing that a healthy child has that a healthy adult lover doesn't have in greater portion. That is to say you can get in a hell of a lot more trouble as an adult than you can as a child. Think about it. There's a lot more varieties of trouble you can get into as an adult. Why put all that envy on the children and then if you envy the children that much, you'll make them want to take their toys away. As an adult, if you can get in touch with this energy and learn, we'll talk about getting to where you can stand it. Think about that now. I want you to think about that tonight. That's what you really got. The difference between somebody's really getting into trouble with this thing we talk about next week and somebody that can really get into it and not burn up and go down in flame is being able to have the resources of personality to be able to stand it, to stand the intensity of it.

[00:49:27.070] 
It's one of the things that I like to work with people on when I'm doing therapy and analysis with them, gradually helping them to be able to stand their excitement longer. We talked withtry me next week to talk about premature ejaculation because it's not just something that is a genital thing. Most of us who are out of touch with this thing and don't contain well enough have emotional, premature ejaculation a lot of the time. We are so afraid of the intensity that this archetype of configuration brings that we just defend against it like mad and make out like we don't even have it. You show me a man who feels dead inside or wooden inside or like he has no passion, I'll show you a man that's defending like mad against the presence of this energy. His problem isn't that he doesn't have it. His problem is that he's afraid he's going to get in touch with it, and then he's going to run amok. This energy is the energy and openness and enthusiasm and shamelessness that we envy in children and why we tend to give them a lot more toys than they can effectively play with.

[00:51:16.390] 
Because it's really our own shadow lover that we're trying to get to in that business. Yeah, somebody had their hand up right here. Yeah. When you talked about, one of the things you said, Lover energy doesn't respect boundaries. Yes. When Robert Fly tells the second part of that story about the wild man, and he talks... Well, actually it's the third part of the story, where he goes into the castle and the second part, he gets into the garden. He talks about the gardens being a place to set boundaries. Could you just- Yeah. The question has to do with the question of the garden being a place to set boundaries, and my comment that love or energy is not really a respector of boundaries. You got to understand that those stories are initiation stories. When they're talking about the initiation, a man coming into his maturity, it's not talking about raw archetype of Lover energy. See, if you're going to be able to deal with this energy as a mature man, you will have to be able to have boundaries, set boundaries. You'll have to put boundaries at the edge of the garden. You'll have to be able to protect the garden.

[00:52:31.940] 
This is what most people don't do. It's very difficult to find people who adequately protect the boundaries of the garden space in their lives. They let everything else encroach into it. You'll find people all the time. You talk to them, I got to say something, Well, when was the last time you went dancing? Oh, I know that we should go dancing. Yeah, I know that you know that we should go dancing, but when was the last time you went? Well, when is the next time you're going? Why are we just add that time? I mean, it's not intentional, right? Everything intruses. But you really have to actively be strong enough to protect that space, and that means you really have to have strong warrior energy developed. If you don't have a strong warrior, you won't ever have the garden protected, and it will be spoiled by every other demand on you in your life. But you're talking about a mature man. Blyth is talking about masculine initiation. He's talking about a man who's getting to the point where he can be strong enough to be with this energy without it burning him up, without it killing him.

[00:53:45.520] 
I'm talking about the archetype. I'm talking about the stuff before the transformer and the reason people fear it. People don't fear it because they've got boundaries. People fear it because this thing wants to get into everything and everybody. Ms. Getting into trouble. I'm wondering if you've done any exploring how many of the myths and fairy tales, including the Biblical creation story, there is the aspect of disobedience. It seems like it's in so many of the fairy tales and myths that somewhere along the lines there has to be disobedience. He's raising the question about the connection between this archetypal configuration, this energy, and all of these myths about disobedience. I think it's a very interesting insight. Why is it that in so much mythology, for example, I'm working on a course now in the mythology of Satan, why is it that Lucifer is the one that tends to be seen as having the fun? If you study the mythology of Satan in the history of the Christian West, he tends to be associated with all the naughty things that are fun. Lucifer doesn't get in trouble for things that are nice. He's always a rule breaker.

[00:55:24.410] 
It's no accident that the trickster archetype is associated with the Satanic and that both of those things are associated with rule breaking. So it's a really interesting point. Now, but what we got to get at is, well, now what is that? What is that energy in the lover that people will look at? See, if you're looking at it from the point of view of the King, now what's the King about? Well, they are about order, just order. But if you're just purely into that King, you don't want anybody messing up this great cosmic mandola you've made. You're up there, you get to come, Let me have my cosmic mandola here. Everything in its place and a place for everything. We're going to bless them all. The king is just not into this responsibility business. The Queen is the same way. Not now, honey, I'm taking care of the children. It's the same thing. Not now, honey, I'm busy earning a living for the realm. The same thing is true about the warrior. I mean, the warrior, if you're coming out of that warrior, you're on a mission, and you don't like anybody that's stopping off for R and R.

[00:56:57.730] 
Come on, Jack. We got work to do. No stragglers. No stragglers, yeah. You can really see once you start looking at the different archetypal configurations, Look, these things are not friendly to each other. That's why you got to get clear that the different archetypal configurations in your psyche, they don't particularly like each other naturally. Your job is to do that I told you before. Your job is to do a little cosmic or psychological family therapy in here. You have to help them relate to each other because they really don't like each other. This energy is just anarchic. The anarchists are into this. Nicolau and free beer, something like that. I'm just thinking about beer right now. Sorry, no keg tonight.. I was thinking about, we're in a lot of loyalty and a Catholic Church and the Kapa and the permitted disobedience for the Catholic is to go get a beer and get drunk. Well, he's saying that in some communities, and he thinks maybe in the Roman Catholic community, that one of the permitted disobediences may be to get a beer, have a drink. Well, it's interesting in traditional orders. Think about the way traditional cultures handle this.

[00:58:36.050] 
They all handle it something like this, except a little more elaborately. What about Marty Grah? You know what Marty Grah is? Marty Grah is a space of the lover. It's real interesting, though, in traditional cultures, it wasn't just Marty Grott, it was more like one of these black conferences when you have what Michael Mead loves, carnival. You have carnival. That means all hell breaks loose and anything goes. If you want to learn about shamelessness, you just go to a black conference and show up on Carnival. Sorry about that, Michael. But anyway, that's not that. But I didn't make that up. Michael Mead and Bly didn't get together to cook up carnival. That is an ancient cultural form and cross-cultural. What they did was they knew that this energy had to be honored. We say, I have to say and give the devil his due? Well, in the old days, they give all of them their due. We'll have a certain ritualized period of time when this thing can come out and be honored, and nobody's going to be shamed about what they do during carnival. You can be shamed about what you do right up before it, and you can be shamed about what you do right after it.

[00:59:57.870] 
But whatever you do during it, you're not shamed for it. You need to look at that. Look at the cross-cultural expression of that. That isn't just in one culture. That's not just New Orleans, folks. Some of my New Orleans friends with the... Some of my New Orleans friends would like you to believe that's a Cajun tradition, but it's wider than that. Well, he says, Is that like the office Christmas party? Well, it's the same space. That is to say that is the same psychic space that starts trying to creep in. It's the same. Once you understand these spaces, you begin to recognize them when you see them. It comes up there. It comes up at Carnival. It comes up at rock concerts, St. Patrick's Day in Chicago. That's right. This is a space which human beings have known about, and they've tried various ways of ritualizing it and integrating it. See, one of the things that shows you how hard this particular configuration is to get into any mature integrated form is the ubiquity of the institution of prostitution throughout history. There's this book called The sacred prostitute that you may want to look at, which gets at some of the historical sacred spaces in this area throughout history.

[01:01:42.440] 
You want to just look at that stuff anthropologically and just see in that how difficult this energy is to integrate, but how reluctant human beings are to say goodbye to it. They will pay a lot of money to stay in touch with this space. They will find sneaky, tricksterish, hermetic ways to stay in touch with it and still make out like they're nice. That's what young you like to talk about persona and shadow. Well, there are a lot of folks that don't know anything about persona and shadow, but they arrange their lives around the persona, and then they make sure they have ways of acting out their shadow in a trickster ways to stay in touch with the space. All I want to say is a young analyst here is that, Hey, look, let's just get clear about this energy. Number one, people aren't going to turn loose of it completely. Number two, it must be important we need to think about why. Number three, we ought to be able to do better at bringing this energy into our lives than we have up to now as human, as a species. But you can get a little feel for it.

[01:03:06.400] 
Other comments before we take a break? Yes. Someone sounds like the solution has a climate on it. I'm trying to think about it. Isn't there a different forms of labor? You mentioned earlier about the king and having his order and caring for people. Isn't he a test of this? Yes, he is. After the break, I'm going to talk about the way in which this energy functions when it's functioning appropriately in the other archetypal structures. I'm going to talk about necrophilia. You see, what you get, and we'll get into this after the break, what you get in all these different structures, if you don't have a connection with this archetypal energy, is you get a necrophiliac approach in all these other areas, a love-of-death approach in the other areas. This energy is essential. Your point is well taken. That is to say, this energy has got enormous positive benefits. But what you got to make a distinction about, you got to distinguish between the pure energy and its appropriate mediation and balance with these other forms. See, some of you are persons that have never really consciously gotten yourself into trouble with this energy. But others of you in this room have been shooting up with this thing.

[01:04:48.330] 
You've been real good at getting in trouble, and you know about the power and attractiveness of this thing, which you also know the way in which it really does dissolve your life in a way. We'll get into some of the ways in which you can see it imbuing these other configurations with a certain humanist after the break. Would you see the the archetype of drug-induced activity generally, you're going to say sex, drugs, and rock and roll? Yes, I think when you get into a sacramental use of substances, whether it's wild turkey or masculine or whatever, this is what's operating. Now it can be. You see, there are different ways after we break, we'll talk about the the Magus Lover, the magician Lover. Now that's the one that's going to probably get more into fine-tuning all the substance abuse. Well, let's see. Let's go down to the lab and see what else we can come up with. The drugstore, a cowboy. I really think this, I wasn't joking. This is the archetype of configuration underlying this passionate burning up with substances and music and sexuality. But help me here a bit. Historically, let's say, take the prostitution you mentioned, the historical, sacred, and other this, isn't it sometimes people who are obsessed by, let's say, the king archetype will manipulate those circumstances in order to control their population?

[01:06:46.720] 
Certainly. The question is, in terms of say, something like prostitution, isn't it someone that's in the king archetype or one of the other archetype of configurations that manipulates people in that life? Absolutely. But see, what we've got to look at is projection, mergers, psychological mergers, psychological using people for receptacles for our projected contents, psychomasochism. Next week we'll talk about psychomasochism, and the way in which in contemporary psychoanalysis we talk about this is self-object relationships and how we use other persons to complete us. There are a lot of people who are consciously out of touch with this configuration who are compulsively connected with somebody else that's mainlining it. You're talking about the pimp who's impotent, who runs a large group of prostitutes. When I'm through, you have to bread and the surface is to keep the mops quiet. Yes. You got to understand that these energies very seldom get balanced in an individual. When Jung talked about individuals, he's talking about something that's hard to attain, enormously difficult balancing they can develop in a mature personality. If you're not to that point, then you're either really dealing with one or more of these configurations and projecting it, splitting it off on someone else, letting someone else carry it.

[01:08:39.690] 
We'll talk about that in terms of the pathological forms next week. Any other comment before we take a break? Yes, back here. I think it seems like to me, because it's supposed to be out of control, so that in itself can scare people from becoming attacked with it. But during this catch-22 about the third plane, and so maybe that, how does it take the balancing of all those cells in order for someone to really be able to contain it? Well, she's asking does it take account of a balancing of all these different configurations for a person to contain it? I think ultimately that's the only way it will be contained consciously. See, a lot of the time we'll see in relationships, for example, say in a couple, one or the other person in the couple will usually carry the lover for the couple. That's not really what ought to be happening in a couple. Both of them ought to be sharing the responsibility for stewarding the garden. But most couples, that's not the case. In most couples, one or the other gets unconsciously assigned the responsibility for taking care of the garden space. One of the things that has to happen in good marital therapy is stopping that, getting both of them to take some stewardship of the garden space in their life.

[01:10:12.970] 
It's not easy to contain it consciously. It gets contained unconsciously by letting some relationship some... A lot of people keep dangerous friends. You got any dangerous friends? Think about your dangerous friends. Now, your dangerous friends contain this energy for you. It's a projection. It's a projection. The partnership between you and the dangerous friend is that they will carry this energy for you, and you will carry some more calm, centered energy for them, and the two of you together will make up a a homarphoditic union. It looks like a whole, but it didn't really. That's right. She's saying that she's emphasizing the fear of getting in touch with this because of the possibility of being overwhelmed about it. I think that she's right. I think you're right about that. It is a danger. It's more dangerous to the extent that one has tried to deny the power of this thing in the unconscious. This is what happens in so-called mid-life crises, largely with men, see. Some of the teenagers, that one is really coming up, and that's when it's really held down. Maybe if it could come out more at that time, then it would be continued to be suppressed after that because you're involved inappropriately later on.

[01:11:49.640] 
The reflections she's making is the importance of having an adolescence where this energy is at least allowed some play. If you had an adolescence, where it's less so today than it was in the '50s, can you imagine what it was like when Elvis and Jerry Lee Lewis came along? Yeah, you know? Can you imagine what... You got to get back and watch some of those films where they're trying to recreate what mom and dad thought when Jerry Lee came on the stage. Try the '40s or '30s. Yeah, right. Back further than the '50s. The repression of this energy in adolescence was amazing, as much less now. In fact, there are a lot of kids today who don't have enough help containing it by their families. But your point is well taken. I mean, this stuff is so powerful that if it's allowed to go into the unconscious fully in late adolescence, then it will come back with, as Jung would point out, it comes back with... The repressed always returns, the fraudian said. And it's true, and it will come out with a vengeance and often come out in forms that are hard to recognize as love or energy.

[01:13:12.700] 
Well, for example, we'll get into it next week, if you tend to have a problem over eating, that's love or energy coming out. I once saw somebody that had a bumper stick or something about fat people make better lovers. Well, in a way, fat people are more in touch with this. It's in a certain form, but it's a raw lover energy that they indeed are in touch with. It's not integrated like Marion Woodman would like for it to be, but a number of analysts working on eating disorders and addictions have noted that they think that this is lover problems. This is lover difficulties. I think we'll talk about that a lot more next week. I think that's true. It'd help you a little bit if you thought if you're having trouble with alcoholism or drug abuse or overeating or something, if you just say to yourself, This is because I got so much of this lover energy in me. You might look at yourself a little differently. You might feel a little differently about yourself, and you might reframe your problem a little and have a little different way of thinking about yourself. It's not that I'm too much out of touch with my love.

[01:14:59.760] 
I may have to learn to contain this and channel it in other things that don't hurt me so much. But I think you ought to think about that a little bit. Weaving. Yeah, not basket weaving. Well, I think maybe he laughs about basket weaving, but there are a lot of people who really have a lot of erotic energy in their artwork, including folk arts, basket weaving, and weaving of various kinds. I mean, you don't want to get to think that's too funny because there's a real erotic side to the folk arts. Let's take our break now and come back in about… I said we'd talk a little bit about necrophilia. The Freudians used to have a real sense back in the classical days of what Freud called phenitas, that is the what he calls a death instinct. Freud saw the tension between eros, love, which he would consider a life instinct, libido, a life force, and thanitas, a movement toward death. He tended to view sadism and masochism as expressions of erotic connections in which there was too much of this love of death, death drive, death energy, death instinct. Now we can look at what qualities someone who is trying to manifest king energy has when they don't have any sense of this love or energy.


audo_enhanced_The Lover Within 04.mp3

[00:00:00.000] 
I have enjoyed telling people to look at the movie King David, in which you get this distinction, this comparison between David, who was really a lover before he was a king, and Saul, who was really unable to return the love that David had for him. What you see in this king energy, anytime the king energy comes online when there's not enough of this lover stuff, the lover values. The lover energy sees the value of. It is capable of adoring and capable of seeing the innate worth and of something, wanting to lift it up and exalt it. When you have the king energy or if you're in a king position and you don't have enough of this love or stuff, then you will tend to want to dominate without any concern for the innate worth of that which you are in charge of. Here you get, without the lover energy emanating through this king configuration, what do you get? Well, you get a king who cannot bless. Think about it. Because the King without this energy has no heart. There is no heart of blessing in the King if he's not in touch with this energy.

[00:01:57.800] 
Is he Henry the fifth?

[00:02:00.110] 
Yes. She's mentioning Henry the fifth. In that you get an interesting struggle. I mean, that's a very subtle play, Henry the Fifth, and it's subtly done in that movie. You look at it. What you see in that is a lot of struggle about narcissistic wounding, an attempt to triumph over narcissistic wounding, get restoration of one sense of self-esteem. One of the things they say about narcissistic personality disorder, and we'll talk about this more next week, is they can't love. I've talked about the pathology of the king energy and someone. It's a king energy that cannot love, cannot care for. A king without this energy permeating him will not be able to care in a stewarding way. You don't steward things you don't value. Toward. You only steward those things which have worth. Otherwise, it's just a job. One that tires you out and one that you are bored with. See, boredom always comes in when this energy is not really in place. The king, without this, no sense of the value of things in the realm, boredom with the responsibilities, very little enthusiasm for it, very little sense of the capacity to cherish and care for and to empower those under his care.

[00:03:51.180] 
Yeah, Steve.

[00:03:52.600] 
It almost sounds like you're saying that the king is integration of the other three are.

[00:03:59.150] 
Well, in the highest sense, I think that's why, he's saying that, I'm saying that the King is the integration of the other archetypes. The fullness of the King that you see in sacral kingship would be that. That is to say that's why the gods in history, the gods have been represented as kings. The gods in their fullness can fully manifest all of these four energies. But the pure energy of the archetype without the other archetypes is always one-sided, it's always flat, and it always tends toward the pathological. That's what you got to understand about archetypes. This is why I really appreciate Jean Bolen's work. It's excellent work. It's the best stuff I've seen in helping people delineate these different patterns. But the problem that you have if you go Bolen's way is that every God is a personality. It may be a little one-sided, but it's a personality. If you're a personality, you carry more than one archetypal energy. An archetypal configuration is not a personality. It's an energy. It's an energy field and configuration. It is one-sided. It is not a person. So to the extent that a god has a personality, or a goddess, or a human has a personality, they are embodying a balance, more or less, of these archetypal configurations. And so if you're talking about King David, it's no accident that King David has held endless fascination for people throughout history because in some real ways, he did integrate a lot of these masculine energies. I like to say that David, if Jung talked about Christ as the archetype of the self, of the archetypal self, of the male self and so forth. Well, in some ways, King David is a far more adequate picture of the fullness of the male self. Than Jesus, as he's portrayed in the Gospels. Jesus portrays a lot of different aspects, but he sure doesn't have the lusty sexuality that is a part of the mature male personality. You got a mature male personality, you got a lusty sexuality. That's David, not Jesus. At least the Jesus of the Gospels. Now you get into the gnostic Gospels. Baby, you chopped the wood and I'm there.

[00:06:59.000] 
It may be a little different story in the gnostic Gospels. That may be why they got repressed. But anyway, so when you study King David, you watch the movie David, you really see the King who's in touch with a lot of this lover energy. It's one of the things I was sick when I first realized that they chose Richard Gere to play that part. But then if I watched that movie several times, I got to thinking, Yeah, that makes more sense than I thought. It may be a lousy movie, but it has a good sense of this archetypal configuration because Gere has a way of communicating some of this crazy lover stuff. Did you see the movie, Breathless? You want to get a little of that crazy lover energy, what Jean BOLDin would talk about, identify with an Aries personality, not the nice boy, Dionysus personality, Anna—the dreamy lover. But in breathless, it's the Aries power lover side.

[00:08:14.530] 
And we catch that a lot in the movie King David, so take a look at that this week. But anyway, let's get into the warrior now. See, the warrior without much of this lover energy, you get into the coldly efficient killer. And if you want to see the image of the warrior archetype without the lover get the movie Terminator. Because there's Arnold Schwarzenegger, the warrior archetype sans lover. Killing machine. It's going to carry out its mission. It doesn't care if it brings the world to an end. It hates all things human. Human things simply are too messy. See the movie? You see that it just can't… The machines decided they'd take over the world. Because in fact, what they were getting at, there's too much of this lover archetype crap in humans, always messing things up. So we machines will take over and we will clean it up and it will work right. The trains will run on time. Huh? Switzerland. Switzerland, don't say that.

[00:09:49.120] 
Some of the Jungians will have a fit if you say that. But anyway, so just look at that movie. You want to see the warrior without the Lover. It's real interesting. That whole movie deals with the Messianic redeemer motive, the birth of the redeemer. It's no accident that what the Terminator wants to kill in that movie is the little Christ figure who, of course, is the Messianic lover king that's going to come and redeem the world from the machines. You can think about that. It's a campy movie in a way, but if you think about it in terms of the arms race, maybe it's not such a joke because there are a lot of folks on this earth that function a little bit like that figure in The Terminator. They have so little a feel for the value of human life that pulling the trigger is not a problem. For a man that hadn't got enough of that warrior energy, he can't ever pull the trigger. He's going to study it some more. There are a lot of situations in which we ought to be able to pull the trigger. But in this place where the warrior archetype is dominant and there's very little lover, they love pulling the trigger.

[00:11:31.980] 
If it moves and it has any life in it, we want to kill it. There's where Jean Bolin talks in a very interesting way. Read that chapter on Aries in Bowden's book, God's in Every Man. Because she's got a feeling for the way in which even after the warrior begins to get a little lover energy and it's not getting it directly. It's not getting it direct it's seeping in coming in, the lover energy comes in through the warrior. And when the lover energy comes in through the warrior, the underside, then you get a real love of killing. Then you get the individual of which there are many in this world that love to watch you while they kill you. I mean, it's not a nice sight to see. The classical Freudians used to be real interested in trying to make us see the extent to which the sadist is a powerful human reality. Most of us turn away from that. But when you get a sadist, you get somebody whose experience of the lover comes through the warrior in a pathological way. It's not gotten to the point where they can value the other very much, but they've got enough of that lover energy in seeping in through the warrior that they enjoy the killing, and they enjoy the torture. I mean, if you talk to people that know about torture, torture is a very widespread thing on the planet. It's very interesting. You let a bunch of men get in a place where they have total power over other men or women, and this shadow thing comes out, and it is a not-pretty thing, and they get erotic gratification out of inflicting pain. Now, that's something that exists, and it exists a lot more than we'd like to think of. What's going on there is when this lover energy has not been given its own space in life.

[00:14:10.690] 
If it doesn't have its own space that's carefully protected in your life, it will start moving into the other spaces in a shadow way. It's very interesting the way that works. You start getting the presence of sadomasochism, which we'll get into more next week. But with, let's talk about the positive side of this thing.

[00:14:38.530] 
When you get the warrior energy and a personality that's got a lot of this lover, then you will fight for something. You're not just killing to be killing. You're not just fighting just to scratch your warrior itch. You know. You have a sense of the value of human life, and you're willing to do something about it. Now, see, it's very interesting today. There are enormous numbers of things that need to be done because of the value of people, and forest, and oceans, and all sorts of things. But we either don't have any warrior energy or the warrior energy we've got is not infused with enough of the capacities of the lover so that you get those things operating together so that there is a fighting on behalf of things of value. It's the when you get a person who has got a real sense of value, the lover is online. This is what makes a rainbow warrior a la rainbow warriors in Greenpeace. Your ecology types are loaded with those two energies. Your ecological activist, I'm not talking about the ones that talk about it. I'm talking about those guys and those women in Greenpeace.

[00:16:35.000] 
They go out there and they take on those that are poisoning the world head-on. What's the name of that other group that's even more radical? Well, there's another group of ecologists who are even more radical than the Greenpeace types.

[00:16:54.560] 
You mean the Green Party?

[00:16:56.460] 
No, I'll think of it and try to mention it next time. But anyway, you're right. This is the person that has enough of a sense of the value of the ecosystems of the Earth and who are willing to fight for it. So it's really at the heart of every true knighthood tradition on Earth. Every traditional culture has a knighthood tradition. And in terms of the male psyche, you could talk about this in the female psyche. I think it's there in the female psyche too. But in terms of the male psyche, up until modernity, you had a clear representation of the warrior who understood value. You see it most clearly in the medieval traditions around chivalry. Those people today who want to make fun of that don't even understand what they're seeing. Because when you get a warrior energy that has no sense of honor and has no sense of a code of ethics and values, then you've got a terminator.

[00:18:27.390] 
You've got somebody that will be a good soldier at Mei Li, and kill women and children without batting an eye. And think that that means they're being a good warrior. That's a soldier, folks. That's not a warrior. A warrior in terms of traditional culture, and every tribe had an understanding of this, was someone who knew what value was, the value of life and was willing to fight for it. It's hard to find that in the modern world. It's hard to find that. But it's not dead. There are a lot of people.

[00:19:09.270] 
I have trouble as a student of ethno-centrism, I have to look into that. Tribes next to each other who derogate. One another.

[00:19:19.300] 
Oh, yes.

[00:19:20.350] 
Who make themselves less than human.

[00:19:22.690] 
That's the meaning of tribalism.

[00:19:24.320] 
Right. I think about Mei Li. If they're all soldiers, families. That is, we're built in, in a sense, to derogate and take away the humanity of those with whom we're fighting.

[00:19:42.600] 
That's the combat myth. He's saying that he sees as a study of ethnocentrism and tribalism. That. That tends to be something that's built in in the history of human race. I think that's clear. You study history and you see that that's what tribalism does. But you see, you got to understand what tribalism is. Every tribe exists in a little cosmos. It's a microcosmos, and you have to understand it archetypally, that is their world. Now, we ought to be able to do better than that. The challenge of our age is to get beyond tribalism. For the first time in history, we have a chance to do that. But the archetypal structures are still there, which make the warrior comes up, the enemy comes up, and it tends to get projected on the other race or the other sex or the other nation.

[00:20:41.270] 
But see, the problem is, and in my lectures on the warrior, I point out that there really are enemies of the human race. Anybody that doesn't see that there are not enemies of the human race needs more warrior energy because one of the pathologies of the warrior archetype is when there's a real enemy and you can't see it. The planet is in a great deal of trouble, and they're real enemies of the planet and enemies of the human race. They're enemies of the children in this city. You got to be able to be able to have some sense of what the real enemy is and what it is that's worth fighting for. Part of what it is meant to be a man in tribal culture was to fight for the best values that you know about. That's a problem for men today. Men have a real difficulty with that, yes. He's saying, Is Malaya a problem of the lover of the king? Well, see, when you're talking about mature personality, whenever you have a failure like that, it's a failure in all of these configurations, in a sense. But if you're in connection enough with this type of thing, this type of energy we're talking about in this course, you're not going to be a good soldier and make out like life is not of value so quickly.

[00:22:20.450] 
You're not going to be able to ram shovels up the vaginas of women no matter what race they are. If you've got enough feel for this thing in a healthy way, you're just not going to get off on that. When you see people who can actually do that, I mean, you need to study the accounts of the Vietnam War by people that were there, people that participated in a lot of things. Not just the Vietnam War, all these wars. There's something that happens with people that are very narcissistically wounded and have been abused, which is most of us, that when given a chance, when you got a lot of firepower, you will abuse those who you have power over, and that's a wounded lover that will do that. It's the wounded lover who is an abuser.

[00:23:22.980] 
I don't disagree with your point about not enough good king stuff there. I mean, you could use LBJ for a textbook on the Shadow King. But anyway. Let me talk a little bit about the magician. What time is it? Let me talk a little bit about the magician without the lover energy. The magician is the most introverted of archetypal configurations. It. But when it doesn't have enough connection with the lover stuff, it's just plain downright detached. When you're into the magician and you don't have enough of this lover energy, you just don't feel connected. At the same time that you don't feel connected with the other, you don't really feel anything of their value. They're not very interesting either. Imagine this is the magician I've said to you many times is the archetype of the therapist. Now, imagine the therapist who is not closely enough connected with the lover energy directly and consciously. Now think about it. What will they be like?

[00:24:59.780] 
Rapist.

[00:25:00.740] 
Say it again.

[00:25:03.190] 
The rapist.

[00:25:04.070] 
The rapist.

[00:25:05.080] 
You got to think about what that connotes in all sorts of forms. What it will be, the therapist will be real interested in diagnosis. Think about it.

[00:25:24.820] 
There are good reasons to be good at diagnosis. You got a lot of this magus energy in you. You're going to want to be a diagnostician. Then, boom, because I'm going to diagnose it. Let's see what is that? That's DSM 3R 300.40. But the point of it is that you will get into dissecting. You'll know what the pathology of this person is, and you'll be so clear, Well, this is really a borderline, a very, very disturbed borderline. Let's refer him for medication. He's not going to get better.

[00:26:01.540] 
I can't believe it.

[00:26:04.770] 
It's like when you have a person entering therapy and there are many that get into the field out of the Magus archetype. The Magus archetype doesn't make you a healer. That's the dumb fantasy some people have. You got a lot of Magus archetype makes you a shaman. If you just got this stuff, it's, I'm a shaman, right? Well, the Magus is not a shaman. The Magus archetype doesn't make you a shaman. It just makes you in this pattern. Makes you want to know, makes you want to interpret. It doesn't necessarily make you want to heal. It's the lover energy in someone who is into this pattern that makes them care enough to want to be a healer. You can look at that. It's like there are even people that will train you to be a therapist that will tell you, and they'll tell you this with a straight face, or you shouldn't want to cure them. You don't want to be too invested on getting better. It's not professional. It's not profitable, he says.

[00:27:17.770] 
There are a lot of people that are training supervisors in schools of analysis and psychotherapy that really will sit there with a straight face and you're going over your case with you, and if you look too concerned about the person, they'll scold you for it. They have the best of reasons. They give you 100 great reasons about your countertransference, this, and the overstimulating of the patient, that, and all that thing. But you look at it in this context of this configuration, a lot of people go into therapy because they have trouble with relationships. I mean, become therapist. Look at Alan Wheeler's book, The Quest for Identity. Look at Alice Miller's work, drama, The Gifted Child, in which she talks about her work doing therapy with therapists. They all tend to be people that have been wounded narcissistically and have trouble loving. So if you get into this magus archetype and you don't have enough connection consciously with this lover energy, then it will make you perhaps a good scientific psychologist, quote-unquote. Maybe even a really great diagnostician. You can pigeonhole people with the best. But in terms of making the connections, empathic connections that today in self-psychology, we know is the key to helping someone get better, you will flunk empathy.

[00:28:51.980] 
Because without the connection with this lover business, you can't feel your way in. The empathy is a capacity to feel your way inside the experiencing of the person. That's where that disrespect for boundaries, see that? Look at that. It's a disrespect from boundaries, the boundary between me and you, but it enables me to get into your feelings and feel what it's like in there. If I have enough ethics that I don't abuse that trust, that lover in the Magus can make you a shaman. Let's see. It's the shaman. It's very interesting to study shamanism in the light of all this because the shaman, back to your point, back here about the king energy, it's that shaman healer who combines all these energies in a material way for healing. They've got the sacrificial willingness of the king. They've got the centeredness of the king. They've got the interest in just order, right order of the king. They've got the courage of the warrior, the willingness to fight the disease entities. Reed Casteanada, he's got that stuff down about that. But most of all, it's got that capacity to care enough to suffer with someone, which being a healer, requires. You really can see how without this lover energy, all of the powers of the other forms become one-sided, and they don't really serve life. They get into serving death in various forms, exploitation, abuse.

[00:30:59.140] 
Becomes abusive. This energy, while in its raw forms, it looks so scary and is scary. Without it, you really do become a caricature of a human being in all of your functioning. To top it off, you don't have any fun. Let me stop there, and we've got about five minutes. Let me open it up for any comments or questions. Remember, next time we're going to get a lot more into the pathology of the lover.

[00:31:40.410] 
You mentioned about the use of personalities to describe a lover.

[00:31:48.310] 
Being wounded in this lover configuration, yeah.

[00:31:54.360] 
My way of thinking that a lot of the reason why people are like this are to care back. On love.

[00:32:01.510] 
Right.

[00:32:03.410] 
And often times I get a solution to love yourself. How does one love oneself?

[00:32:12.050] 
Easy question. He says that he noticed this, that a lot of people have been abused or have really not had any experiences of love in the home, and that they will say that the solution is to learn to love yourself. How do you do that? Well, sure, it's important to be able to love yourself. One of the things that when you connect with this thing in a positive way, you do. You begin to not be so ashamed of yourself. You do like Bernie Segel says, and you get out and you take your clothes off in front of a mirror and you say, There, I love you. I'm serious. You ought to do that and see what happens. Take your clothes off tonight in front of the mirror, get in there, and just stay there. Don't indulge your shame. Just be in there in front of the mirror. That's right, you do get to learn to love yourself. But the thing about it is, is look at that shame issue. Just think about shame a lot before next week. Think about shame. Because the shame separates you from people. The more shame stuff you got, it's a defense against the sense of your own beauty.

[00:33:37.440] 
When you got the shame, you can't even let yourself see your beauty, right? Much less anybody else. Even the thought of being beautiful, especially if you're a man, it makes you feel funny. You have to get away from that. You can be all kinds of things, but not beautiful or not luminous in some way. But you see, you get into a sense of this configuration, and it helps you knock the shame in the head. You know, it's like you declare no quarter with your shame, and you start learning a little bit about being shameless. I think that's what Robert Bly is talking about, is getting a little bit, getting the capacity to be a little bit shameless sometimes on behalf of yourself and rediscovering what Norman Brown calls love's body. Yeah.

[00:34:44.180] 
I've been onme, if you have enough for enduring ecstasy.

[00:34:47.490] 
And what.

[00:34:47.950] 
Are the dance? Yeah.

[00:34:50.230] 
The enduring ecstasy thing I'll talk about a lot more next week. I really want you to think about one of the most interesting discovery. I call it because it's so fresh, the insights that they have are so fresh that I think it's almost fair to call it the discovery of the self-psychologist. Psychoanalytic, self-psychologists talk a lot. They have this really wonderful sense of being overstimulated. What happens when you get overstimulated? This week I want you to think about when you get overstimulated. See, you can always tell when you get overstimulated, you start getting a little crazy. That's when you get your migraines, that's when you can't sleep at night, that's when you start overeating, that's when the trickster gets to you. But you got to get a little feel for what this being overstimulated is. What is that anyway? Well, that's ecstasy trying to sneak into your life. You haven't made any room for it. You're lying there, and at three o'clock in the morning.

[00:36:04.600] 
You wake up, and you think, Oh, my God, I must be getting a flu or something like that. You may just need to make love and doesn't accrue you. Hey, when was the last time I had sex? Now, some of you get up and go down and get a drink, right? You got to think about all this stuff. There are some wonderful… I'll try to remember to bring you the title of some literature next week on this. But the self-psychologists have a way of thinking about addictions that if you put it in the context of what we're talking about, you can really get a feel for the addictions because you get overstimulated. You get a little intensity, the intensity starts to build, and you can't stand it. You got to do something to deal with the intensity. And so you split off in some way. Well, what we got to do is to have you work on staying with the intensity longer, getting to where you can endure the intensity, endure the ecstasy longer. That's what is the goal. It sounds easy, but when you're working with somebody on this in healing, trying to work on it in therapy, it takes you got to work very carefully and helping them understand that when they split off into their boredom. Maybe they're not as bored as they think.

[00:37:45.040] 
Maybe their boredom is a defense against the intensity.

[00:37:50.670] 
When I think of being what we stimulate, I think of working too much, too many demands. I think of it as that.

[00:37:59.010] 
Right, absolutely. He says when he thinks about being overstimulated, it's more in the realm of work. He's a good workaholic like me. But we workaholics. We're a little addictive too on that stuff, see? We're bootlegging some of our passion and our intensity through the work. There's a sense. Let's face it. Let's say, like Sammy Davis Jr, I talk about this. He was being interviewed by Arcelio Holly on that, and he was sitting there talking to me. Well, the answer is we talk about all this stuff, addictions and everything. He says, Well, the secret is I just love to drink.

[00:38:41.120] 
I loved him when I heard him say that. Right, okay, here's one person that just loves to drink. It's not denying any of the rap on allergic to this or allergic to that or tendency to this, but just love to drink. Now, that is also in somebody that loves to work, and you'll love to work up to a certain point. You really get off on your work to a certain point, but you get hooked on it to the point that it drives, it just drives you and drives you, and then it starts bleaching you out. We workaholics. You can't tell anybody we don't love what we're doing in some ways, but then it gets you bleached out, drives you out. We got to get a feel for that ecstatic side to that, which is addictive. Why is it addictive? Because it puts you in touch with this ecstasy stuff. You got to learn to get it more directly. This week, I want you to think about when you're looking at some of these Lover movies and so forth. If you didn't get to see Zorba, look at Zorba. I looked at it again this week. It's really got a lot of this Lover stuff in it. But think about yourself when you get overstimulated. What do you do? Notice when you shut down. Whenever you start shutting down and splitting off, you're getting overstimulated, and you're having an emotional, premature, ejaculation. Guys.

[00:40:15.200] 
When we talk about healing the lover, you got to get to where you can stand more intensity without splitting off. So I'll meditate on that a little bit. I'll stick around a few minutes. I'll see you next week and we'll talk about the shadow lover, shadow side.

[00:40:29.780] 
In previous sessions, we've talked about the manifestation of the archetypal lover and myth, folklore, and religion, trying to locate the archetypal lover in the geography of inner space. And the second week, we tried to talk about the positive potential of the archetype of the lover, looking at the role of the lover in masculine selfhood, talking about the Garden of Delight and sorrow, talking about the appreciative consciousness, the task of incarnation for every man, or you might call that liberating loves body, following Norman Brown. We talked a little about the dance as the body being capable of play and display. The essence of full engagement with this potential within the psyche is the capacity to both play and to display yourself. We talked about the way in which this archetypal configuration contains the potential for every one of us to be liberated from the, as Bradshaw puts it, the shame that binds us. Then we talked a lot about the challenge, and you'll see this a lot tonight. I mean, the challenge of getting to where you can endure ecstasy, be able to stand it, and not get into what we talk about is premature emotional ejaculation, which is a typical problem when it comes to experiencing passion and living, not just in co-itis, but it's a problem throughout the entirety of a person's life.

[00:43:10.580] 
Now, I invited you to come as your shadow lover tonight. Did anybody do that?

[00:43:18.740] 
My shadow wanted to bring the bullwhip, but I told him no. I did let him wear his boots.

[00:43:31.880] 
Tonight I want to go into, in the first half, I want us to go through and look at the way that this energy gets expressed pathologically if you're not giving it space consciously, firmly in your life. Remember, you don't get out of the necessity to deal with these energies, all of these archetypal energies. The news about that is it's going to manifest itself in some way. The problem with us is that we typically, whatever archetypal configuration in our psyche, whatever space that we're either locked out of or afraid of, we try to make out like it's not there. Of course, the unconscious being what it is, it will press and it will make itself felt. What it does is it contaminates the other energies. I want to show you tonight, in the first part before I break, I want to spend our time tonight showing you what happens when the energy of the lover is not dealt with directly and does not manifest itself in the way that it was designed to manifest itself in the psyche. Then after the break, we'll come back and we'll talk about what that energy would look like, what would happen if that energy was coming out more naturally directly with conscious engagement with it.

[00:45:18.830] 
Let's just look at this and see the way in which you can think about a lot of things which are difficulties with love come out according to these different configurations in these different spaces. Now, remember the diagram I put up about the different spaces. Let's just start with the king energy. One of the things that the feminists, theorists have quite rightly noted about the masculine psyche is how quickly it tends to eroticize domination. Now, these feminists have not made this up, folks. This is what I'm here to tell you, that these are uniquely masculine kinds of problems, much more. There are women that have difficulties in these areas. But these are, if you just study the epidemiology of this, this is a masculine geography here, Eros and domination, getting off on domination, on being the Dominator. You can see very clearly in the erotic enjoyment of domination that the king configuration in the psyche is having this love energy come in through the back door. You remember we were talking about the king, energy being there for caring, nurture, stewardship, blessing, all those positive traits of a mature man. But you can't be a mature man if this lover energy is not related to consciously, because what will happen is it will come out in the other configurations and contaminate them. It's very interesting. It turns you into a necrophiliac. It turns you into somebody that gets off on things that bring death. The popularity of torture in the world. You need to know how popular torture is. You need to get aware of this. Talk to the people in Amnesty International. If you're serious about being a mature man, you probably ought to be a member of Amnesty International. Because what they do is they try to ride heard on all those men around the world who are getting off, who are getting their erotic satisfaction by torturing men that can't blow their brains out. It's amazing how brave and macho men are when they've got you to where you can't defend yourself.

[00:48:53.830] 
That's why there's so much abuse in jails around the world. That's why there are so many Australian Aborigines that are suddenly discovered, hanged in their cells. Of course, the police say, Well, that's suicide. Well, it's somebody that's getting off on having total power over another person. I really mean that delight. It is an ugly thing about human beings, and it's particularly an ugly thing about men that when they remain uninitiated, they get off on dominating and abusing others that are totally defenseless. Now, the classical Freudians have been the most honest and the most fearless in documenting the extent of this behavior. Not your ego psychologist, and even more recently, not your self-psychologists, they tend to get in, they tend to do what we Jungians do, you spiritualize everything, avert the eyes. But the classical Freudians have a tolerance for looking at what Eros going awry does. We should go back to a lot of their older studies to look at the phenomenology. It's about one of the few places you can get a clear look at what people do to each other to get a necrophiliac joy. Yes.

[00:51:00.400] 
Is this the same energy as the Inquisition?

[00:51:05.280] 
The question is, is this the same energy as the Inquisition? I think that that would be a good argument. You could make a case for that, and you could make a particular case for it because it's sexually-frustrated people who love to torture heretics and who love to burn witches.

[00:51:28.900] 
I think it's an even stronger case because the Inquisition started out as a way of trying to correct theology of improving society.

[00:51:45.480] 
Well, you got to understand that the Inquisition is... Well, we're getting ahead of ourselves here, but talking about the Inquisition, because the Inquisition operates a lot out of warrior energy. Well, meaning we're going to defend the right order against you people that are threatening it. But you see this shadow lover always there. If you're a graduate student and you've got a graduate professor or advisor that's making it extremely difficult for you to get your proposal finished, there's probably an erotic component in that relationship that either they have not acknowledged or you have not capitulated to. This is a very common energy, and this is the energy, of course, behind sexual harassment in business.

[00:53:02.850] 
And in other organizations. The amazing thing to me is that we've got all these supposedly grown men that think this is really manly behavior. I mean, once you start being able to read between the lines of this stuff, you can see what incredibly immature behavior this business is. But one of the things that will happen when we get a better sense for psychological maturity is this thing will be exposed for what it is. That is a man who is not fully capable of actualizing his lover energy in a mature way. He's got to manipulate people who he's got power over to gratify his erotic drives. You could just talk about that, give example after example after example of that. But what you've got to get clear about, and here again, the Freudians are brilliant. This is why a lot of people don't like Freudian psychology. Because the Freudians are not afraid to tell you right up to your face that there's a part of you that would like to dominate somebody and take pleasure in it. Who? Me. Not me. But this to the extent that the energy of the lover is not dealt with consciously, directly upfront with a protected space in the life of the individual, that energy is going to contaminate other spaces. It is not going to enhance the other space. It's not going to help the individual use it morally. It's going to contaminate it and not be dealt with consciously. Yes?

[00:55:28.760] 
Is this the shadow side of the lover or the shadow side of the case?

[00:55:31.810] 
You see what you got to understand is when you do not have an adequate disidentification from these, any time the time you're identifying with one or neglecting one, it will distort all the others. So it's impossible really to be disordered in the lover and not have it affect, distort the relationship to the other configurations. I'll try to think of some ways that you can image that. One way that Jung thought about the self, and I think it fits here, I've been working on trying to figure out ways to communicate the structure, the image, the structure of the self. Douglas Gillette, my co-author of this series of books on masculine psychology, and I were discussing this when we were trying different images, and we were discussing various geometric shapes in which this stuff may be seen. Finally, right in the context of that discussion, it hit me that there's a pyramidal shape to this. And that you can think about each of these planes of a pyramid as one of the configurations. You can think of the individuation process as bringing the accessing of those things together. The higher up the pyramid, the closer they are.

[00:57:24.460] 
Are you saying it's like a dialectic?

[00:57:26.670] 
It is a Hegelian dialectic. That's another course. But we do have a book on Hegel and Jung coming out, which points out that your comment about it being a dialectic is not an empty comment. It is dialectic. It's no accident, I think, therefore, that in the traditions around the world, from the Aztecs to the Egyptians and so forth, pyramids are associated with initiation processes, and that often there are temples at the apex of the pyramids. I think that that is a way of imaging. Now, if you use that image of a pyramid with the king energy on one side, the magus energy on the other, the warrior energy on one side, the lover energy on the other. And you ask yourself, what would happen if one of those sides, if it was, say, made of plastic, what would happen if one of those sides was undeveloped? All of them would distort you see?

[00:58:45.840] 
So you can't have an undeveloped side without distorting all the others. You can use that image. I thought I was so original on that. And then I turned to volume 9.2 of the collected works. I suggest, folks, that this week you go to volume 9.2 of the collected works of Jung and look at his way in which he has diagrammed the archetypal self, two pyramids. I think he was almost right. It's really two pyramids like this. Male and female. That's why they never got that. See, that's your masculinity and your femininity. Play with those images, but do look at the volume 9,2, and look at all those diagrams of pyramids as the structure of the cell. I think that he was right. My God, he was right. But that's the way to think about this. Let's get back to our image. This energy comes in the back door if you don't relate to it upfront. You got to remember ritual process. You got to protect the spaces.

[01:00:19.200] 
All these spaces are different. You don't want to try to mix them up into a stew. You mix them up into a stew, you have nothing. Chaos. You've got psychopathology in a grand scale. You want to be able to get into these spaces and get out of them and to use them for what they're for. Next quarter, I'll be lecturing on the magician. He's the one with the keys to the kingdom, to the spaces. St. Peter, keys to the kingdom. In my father's house are many mansions. Well, these are different rooms, but you see, if you try to make out like there's not a lover room in there, the energy from that space gets into the others and you start trying to get your lover experiences, your desire met in the back door. Now look, see what this means about the king. When you're in the king, the idea is that you're giving. That's why the king and sacrifice, that's almost a tautology. Kingship and sacrifice, you shouldn't have to say both. They mean the same thing. The same thing is true of the queen.

[01:01:55.950] 
But when you're getting your lover energies, your lover needs met through that configuration, you begin to take when you should be giving. Think about what Alice Miller says about a narcissistic afexis of a child. That is to say, when you use the child, you need the child to love you. That's what we have a child for. I need somebody that loves me and can't get away. Yeah.

[01:02:28.120] 
These men dominate their own lives, they're not men that are still children, so they can kill their child.

[01:02:35.330] 
Well, see, the statement is that men that dominate are still children. That's the important thing to get, see. The thing that people need to realize, and this is a hard distinction to make, that is, you got to understand you shouldn't hate people like this because there's a deep sense in which they cannot help this themselves. There's a sense in which this easy, superficial, moralizing at people like this is really misplaced and misguided. I mean, one needs to learn how to deal with folks like this and try to limit their power. But you got to understand the point that you're making that these people are not adults. Yes.

[01:03:26.370] 
We all have that. We all have in us.

[01:03:29.820] 
We all have got it. It's like the evangelical Christians used to say about sin. You don't ask, Am I a sinner? You say, How am I a sinner? You want to form a dialogical relationship with your shadow king. He's into fucking people for fun.

[01:03:53.170] 
So is your shadow lover your dark side?

[01:03:56.750] 
Well, it is the side which is getting off on people in ways it's probably not fully conscious, except in the most flagrant sociopath. Now, your flagrant sociopath knows what he's doing. See, he knows what he's doing, and he doesn't feel guilty about it. But most of us, it's hidden more. Let's talk about the way in which the shadow warrior has this energy coming through it. Somebody has had a question. Yes.

[01:04:40.040] 
We have a parent, male or female, who belittles verballythink it's psychologically a child. That's that same energy, even though it's not maybe physical.

[01:04:51.160] 
Yeah. She's saying that when a parent is abusing a child, even if it's verbal, that it could well be coming out of some of the same energy. Well, it makes you wonder, doesn't it? Because parents seem to get off so much on humiliating children often. There seems to be it's hard to stop it. There's probably other ways in which this comes out. But one of the ways that I think you need to think about in this is child sexual abuse, clearly. I think it's probably true in that particular example you're using, but in child sexual abuse, you can really see this very clearly because think about pedophilia. I mean, what's going on with all of this child sexual abuse? There are so many people today who are who are just devastated by the extent of pedophilia among priests, among teachers. You need to understand archetypally how this would work with priests. You see, when you're in the priesthood, you really can carry an enormous amount of the king configuration. You got to understand there is the Pope who is in the image of the Roman Emperor. The organization is an organization very similar to the Roman Empire. When the priest performs the Mass, archetypally speaking, he is the King who sacrifices himself. It's not the priest. It's an image of Christ, the King of the universe, who sacrifices himself and then gives his body and blood to feed the world. That there may be cosmos, world. Now look at that. That means that when celebrating the Mass to the extent that I've got ritual genius and I'm priests with ritual genius, I'm not just doing something. I'm the king, psychological, and I'm sacrificing myself and feeding with my body. Now, if you think archetypes, if you're in the archetype a lot in a lot of your work, hard to get out of it. If I'm in the archetype of the king a lot in my work, and I'm not getting laid very often, it's awfully easy to have the lover come in the back door through the king. Instead of nurturing, I'm back into my old ape self, bend over, boys. Go to the zoo. This is primate behavior. Read a little ethology, a little socio-biology. You just need to understand that, and you need to see this as an unconscious acting out. You need to have empathy for not just the victims. You need to have empathy for the person who is so wounded in their lover that they have to act it out in this way. This is the thing that you can't see. There are a lot of people that think like, and there are a lot of people that use psycho-analysis for other purposes. There was a recent book published in which there was a discussion of this aspect of masculine domination. One of the authors made this comment something like, Men have no excuse. Well, I can see that statement coming from somebody that's coming out of a fundamentalist Christian point of view that doesn't know anything about the psyche. But the fact is, the sad fact is, the horrible truth is that human beings have an incredible struggle on their hands for consciousness. From my point of view, in many ways, they're all excused. There's amazing grace, as far as I'm concerned, that abounds on this. It doesn't mean that I don't think you have to stop abuses just about any way I can. But in terms of moralizing about it and hating them, I think that's just to throw out the whole truth of psychoanalysis in all of its schools. Anyway, pedophilia, there's a lot of things going on there. Sometime I may be able to get these lectures on child sexual abuse that I did at the institute ready to be put out. But in that you can see the projection. You project the little abused child that you were onto another child. There is, at the unconscious level, a terribly misguided attempt to connect with that child in sexual abuse. Truly, it is domination. Truly, it is abusive. Terribly abusive.

[01:12:01.380] 
But what you got to see is there is a wounded lover in there that's trying to make connection with the wounded child. It's all very crazy. But there is Eros in there. You've got to see the Eros or you don't understand the phenomenon. Yeah, back here.

[01:12:25.010] 
You're saying it's a connection. However, dead people and children are easy to dominate. Other people getting wounded are easy to dominate. It's not seen and proved through research that if, for instance, a woman, rape victims, are usually what not, they're stopping down the street like a fiend or like, You're a fucking dude, buddy. You're already dead. Women that are like, Hey, did they have a really bad day, or something's happened today, and they're not on top of it. No one's ever been of that.Are so deep. It seems like to me, I'm just me, I get angry about it. This connection thing doesn't make as much sense to me. As it's to me.

[01:13:10.930] 
Well, of course, it doesn't make as much sense to you. It's more easy to demonize it for all of us. But what you got to understand if you're looking at this, if you're looking at the wounded lover in people, you got to say, Yes, it's time. But think about what it is. What kind of a soul is it that is so wounded that the only way they can even begin to try to make connection with another human being is in a situation where they have total control. You don't need to condone it. There's no condoning it. But you do need to understand it. You do need to understand it. In this room, most of us in this room have a sector in our psyche that would understand this. To the extent that you've ever wanted somebody to be totally still, shut up and listen to you. To the extent that you've ever really gotten angry at your spouse or lover when they did not act as if they were extension of your body. Your the self-psychologists have this neat little phrase, self-object relationship. They often will not make that two words. It's self-object, one word. To the extent that you have to be as controlled by me as my hand in order to be in emotional relationship with me, that's how wounded I am in the lover.

audo_enhanced_The Lover Within 05.mp3

[00:00:00.330] 
And you will notice, you get familiar with this self psychology literature. The more wounded you are, the more. In control you have to be. The more you have to act as if. You like, I love you, but I have to have you like I have my hand. Anytime I want it.

[00:00:25.140] 
Well, you know, it fits in a lot of different. The question is something about what about this love death transformation thing that Robert Johnson talks about. Robert Johnson tends to think a lot out of a magus archetype. And you need to read everything Robert johnson writes, as if you're listening to somebody that looks out through magus lenses, magician lenses. And we'll get to the magician approach to sex or lack of approach to sex, which is what we. In a minute. Yeah.

[00:01:01.350] 
I always had a goal in the picture. It always felt like, and I've read his stuff, it's like the lover doesn't belong. It's just, oh, you have a perfectly satisfactory relationship. So what if there's no passion and no excitement? Just stay with it and hang in there. I just could not, I couldn't quite get in. It was like something was lacking and it was just so dead. That was my impression.

[00:01:25.360] 
Well, I think Robert Johnson's stuff on he she, we ecstasy, all that sort of thing ought to be read.

[00:01:32.310] 
It contains brilliant insights.

[00:01:35.920] 
You're probably not going to have an orgasm when you're reading it. No. But you're going to learn a lot about it. You're going to learn a lot about it. It's like reading Masters and Johnson. It's the megas approach to sex.

[00:02:01.320] 
You got all these therapists that we're.

[00:02:03.730] 
Going to send you to a sex therapist.

[00:02:06.840] 
We're going to have little seminars and techniques. We get into that more next week. Seminars and techniques and which button to press and this, that and the other. And you got to understand these different people in different configurations, and you always got to ask yourself, who seems to be more in touch with this energy or that energy?

[00:02:31.360] 
Well, if you've seen the video series.

[00:02:35.770] 
On Joseph Campbell, Campbell carries a lot of magus energy. He also carries a lot of lover energy. And you just look at the twinkle in his eyes and through that series, watch Campbell's eyes. And now this is a man, when you read his creative mythology book and he's talking about the mythology of love.

[00:03:06.380] 
You know, this man is, this is not hearsay.

[00:03:15.360] 
All right, now I've got to go.

[00:03:16.800] 
On Eros and aggression.

[00:03:23.680] 
Now, here you ask this question about.

[00:03:26.090] 
Love and death thing.

[00:03:27.530] 
See, well, see, you get the love and death thing. You also get the love and transformation.

[00:03:33.200] 
Thing, but they're not in the same space so much. They're related. But this eros and aggression is what.

[00:03:43.480] 
You get when you get somebody that's.

[00:03:45.570] 
Carrying a lot of warrior energy, tends to be kind of dominant in them.

[00:03:52.780] 
More than any other energy. And then the lover comes in the back door on that energy. This is where I really love Jean Boland's work, because while she doesn't use this typology, you can read what she.

[00:04:11.040] 
Says about the Ares male in that book, gods and every man, and you'll.

[00:04:18.190] 
Get a real nice elaboration of what.

[00:04:19.970] 
I'm talking about here. Aries, Mars, the Ares man, is this warrior lover.

[00:04:37.180] 
I think I said last week, this is the one that really loves to fuck.

[00:04:40.740] 
I make love.

[00:04:43.500] 
Well, Aries man doesn't make love a.

[00:04:46.160] 
Lot.

[00:04:48.700] 
But.

[00:04:51.280] 
He can be an olympic fucker.

[00:04:56.800] 
And in that chapter, Bajine Bolin, she captures that energy really beautifully. I mean, you've got to read that chapter because then she gets into talking about how this is the kind of.

[00:05:10.600] 
Personality which really gets into loving war.

[00:05:19.080] 
Who eroticizes the battle scene.

[00:05:22.840] 
Now, if you haven't seen this clearly.

[00:05:27.100] 
Then get apocalypse now.

[00:05:31.180] 
The movie apocalypse now.

[00:05:33.230] 
If you haven't seen that in a.

[00:05:34.320] 
While, watch that movie for this course. And look at all the erotic contamination.

[00:05:44.570] 
In the warrior in that just.

[00:05:49.910] 
It's just so infused with it.

[00:05:55.780] 
And there are several scenes in that movie where you really see it clearly.

[00:05:59.390] 
I mean, remember that scene where Robert Duvall is this aircal commander playing Wagner.

[00:06:09.300] 
As they bring in the choppers on their raid. And I mean, just think about that now. Turning up the volume on Wagner as you're coming in on your raid with all your napalm and everything. I mean, just try to get a.

[00:06:25.770] 
Feel for that now, because that's this energy.

[00:06:30.940] 
And just think about the way that character in there, his teeth get set.

[00:06:35.680] 
On the edge by this.

[00:06:38.000] 
God, I love it. And he gets out there and they land after the village is burning. And what do they want to do?

[00:06:46.280] 
They want to surf.

[00:06:49.220] 
The boys are going to get out there and surf while the firefight is still going on.

[00:06:54.180] 
Now, there's this Aries energy there is getting so high in that context that.

[00:07:02.520] 
You feel more alive. I get this passion, am I alive or am I dead? Well, I'm alive and I'm right on the edge. I may be dead at any minute, but I'm going to really be alive right now.

[00:07:16.540] 
See, you get it real clear in that.

[00:07:19.360] 
You also get it. There's another scene in which the guys are on the motorboat.

[00:07:23.510] 
Remember that scene, the patrol boat and.

[00:07:29.360] 
That heavily armored patrol boat with all the machine guns bristling and they're going up river.

[00:07:37.700] 
Remember that scene? And they turn on the Rolling Stones.

[00:07:42.260] 
I can't get no satisfaction. It's one of the greatest insightful scenes in the cinema. And they turn it up and it really gets. They boogie and they boogie and they boogie and they boogie. And shortly afterwards, they're machine gunning a whole boatload of vietnamese people. I mean, the juxtaposition of those scenes.

[00:08:07.260] 
Is capturing this eroticization of killing the.

[00:08:12.580] 
Mayo, getting off on shooting things up.

[00:08:15.840] 
Yeah. Somebody back here? Yes.

[00:08:18.320] 
I just wanted to say that this matter of playing Wagner from the chocolate. They actually did that when they invaded. Grenade. When the chocolates came in off the troop carriers of 50 troops.

[00:08:32.730] 
See it captured. See, why would they do that? See, what people have got to understand.

[00:08:37.590] 
Is that men particularly.

[00:08:42.840] 
I think that men. This warrior energy in men is so strong in the hardwiring comes online, I believe, first.

[00:08:53.100] 
And when that is not, as Robert.

[00:08:57.490] 
Bly makes it very clear.

[00:08:58.700] 
I mean, if a man is not a poet.

[00:09:03.680] 
And if he is not really in.

[00:09:05.700] 
Touch with his heart directly.

[00:09:11.860] 
This energy, this warrior energy is going to get eroticide. And it's a very common pattern. Just study history, folks. I mean, history is the greatest psychology.

[00:09:27.360] 
Lesson you can possibly look at. Because men get off on raping and pillaging through history. You just look at it. That didn't just happen.

[00:09:44.700] 
What you got to get a feel for is the difficulty of integrating the.

[00:09:48.940] 
Lover into personality and culture.

[00:09:56.480] 
And you ought to be able, from what we talked about already last week, you ought to have a feeling for why that's so hard.

[00:10:02.250] 
Because it doesn't respect boundaries. It dissolves. It crosses boundaries. You love everything. Lover loves everything, wants to lick everything. See, think about it.

[00:10:21.000] 
Freud said it was polymorphous perverse.

[00:10:24.060] 
I say polymorphous perverse. That's a victorian thing to say. It's polymorphous, appreciative. Put your tongue in anything.

[00:10:36.140] 
Serious.

[00:10:37.350] 
Get off of your negative response to that.

[00:10:40.410] 
I mean, that's the way the lover is. That's the way the wiring is. That's what that energy is. And, you know, the human beings have.

[00:10:47.950] 
Been a little nervous about this, trying.

[00:10:51.220] 
To build your civilization. And you got this energy coming around. It's kind of sneaking in the back door and going all these things. So human beings have always had a.

[00:10:59.410] 
Terrible problem with this.

[00:11:02.100] 
They created an institution. What do they always joke about saying?

[00:11:06.840] 
The oldest profession.

[00:11:10.840] 
Well, prostitution. Well, I want you to think psychologically about this.

[00:11:17.180] 
Why institutionalize that? Well, because it's very unruly.

[00:11:24.380] 
That's what we'd call in psychoanalysis a compromised formation. What is a compromised formation? Well, it's something you do when you don't know what else to do.

[00:11:32.880] 
It's not really very good.

[00:11:36.960] 
But it's.

[00:11:37.540] 
A sort of a half solution for some folks.

[00:11:43.600] 
You've got to understand that there are reasons in the psyche for some of.

[00:11:48.290] 
This craziness that we've seen throughout the.

[00:11:51.170] 
History of human culture. And you can see the enormous task.

[00:11:54.570] 
Of human maturation, the challenge of human.

[00:11:58.550] 
Maturation, to deal with this.

[00:11:59.940] 
I mean, this is a widespread energy.

[00:12:02.500] 
Just read Gene Bolden's chapter on Aries. You'll see what I mean.

[00:12:07.010] 
It's very interesting, too. She's very subtle. She makes this very interesting distinction between Aries energy and Mars energy.

[00:12:21.280] 
Ares energy is where it's a lot.

[00:12:23.610] 
More contaminated with the erotic.

[00:12:28.080] 
Mars energy is much more disciplined and.

[00:12:30.880] 
Clear, what we, I think today would call warrior energy.

[00:12:36.040] 
Mars energy is much more clear. It's very interesting why that might be.

[00:12:42.900] 
If you have an emperor, there can be more differentiation of these energies. No emperor. A lot of confusion down here in the psychic.

[00:13:02.300] 
Okay, let me go on now. I want to finish this before we take our break and then we come back and discuss it and then talk about the positive expression. Okay? This magus lover stuff is fascinating.

[00:13:20.800] 
You know, this.

[00:13:26.100] 
Magician energy is the.

[00:13:28.230] 
Most introverted that there is.

[00:13:32.500] 
It is the archetype of awareness and inner work. I mean, Robert Johnson's title of that book, inner work is wonderful.

[00:13:42.110] 
That's magician task.

[00:13:47.020] 
And it is in.

[00:13:48.880] 
Its purest form very detached.

[00:13:53.660] 
15 years ago, when I was doing field studies around the country on the occult to try to understand the magician.

[00:14:00.330] 
Archetype, I was really fascinated to find.

[00:14:04.830] 
That there are many, many people in our culture today who are practicing solitaries.

[00:14:14.660] 
Do you ever hear of that?

[00:14:16.420] 
Practicing solitary?

[00:14:17.950] 
These are occultists.

[00:14:19.050] 
These are magicians, not stage magicians, real.

[00:14:22.170] 
Magicians, who practice their magic in the tradition of the old hellenistic magic, and they do it alone in their home.

[00:14:38.040] 
Well, it's the kind of magic that you read about when you study hellenistic greek culture. So there's all this talk about Hermes Tresmagistus and all that sort of thing. The tradition that Alastair Crowley developed and claimed that he was initiate in and all that sort of neo paganism is the most widely practiced and widely growing movements in religion.

[00:15:07.690] 
Now.

[00:15:10.180] 
You can get a bibliography that Gordon Melton, one of my friends and colleagues, has published just on all of the stuff that's going on in neo paganism now across the country.

[00:15:21.070] 
This is organized under this magician archetype.

[00:15:26.040] 
But what's fascinating about is, you see these people that are solitaries practicing alone.

[00:15:31.020] 
That'S the movement in this thing.

[00:15:34.300] 
That is, to the extent that the magician archetype is dominant in you, you don't relate. You think about relating a lot. You think about a lot of things.

[00:15:55.290] 
And you kind of get off on thinking, sort of eroticize your cognitive processes. Us good old boys call that mental.

[00:16:08.990] 
Masturbation and metaphysical moonshine.

[00:16:14.680] 
Only half ingest.

[00:16:18.200] 
Because one of the interesting things that psychoanalysis has shown us in recent research is that there are a lot of people, and you may know some of these, they're probably not in this room, but people whose relationships were so bad.

[00:16:33.040] 
In their childhood, the object environment, was so depriving and toxic.

[00:16:46.660] 
That you turn to your cognitive functions? They say, technically, here's what they say. One catheds one's cognitive functions instead of other people. Translated, that means you get into your thoughts instead of into somebody else. See, this is a very typical pattern among academics in general.

[00:17:23.280] 
And there's some of this.

[00:17:29.200] 
You missed that, she says, some theater directors, I'm sure we could compare stories.

[00:17:37.040] 
For a long time now if we had time.

[00:17:39.860] 
But a lot of therapists, Alan Wheelies and Alice Miller and a lot of people have pointed out that one of the reasons people become therapists is because they haven't got the passion they need to live their own life.

[00:17:56.510] 
So they're going to become voyeurs, watch other people.

[00:18:02.060] 
And one of the things you notice.

[00:18:04.690] 
When you get in trouble, you guess.

[00:18:07.980] 
The question, well, why is all this sexual acting out on the part of.

[00:18:11.040] 
Therapist and clergy, so forth? Well, it's because if you tend to.

[00:18:16.560] 
Operate out of this magician archetype, as.

[00:18:18.620] 
All clergy and therapists tend, to some degree, it makes you very vulnerable to a back door coming into the Lover, coming in through your shadow. And this is also the pattern behind voyeurism. You've heard of voyeurism where people, they.

[00:18:40.630] 
Don'T want to do it. They just want to get you and somebody else to do it while they watch.

[00:18:46.600] 
And that's magician contamination. Yes.

[00:18:50.940] 
Can it also be said that if these people do not use this energy in a creative way, that they try to repress this sort of manipulative stuff, they'll turn around and destroy them.

[00:19:05.600] 
You mean the lover energy or any.

[00:19:08.880] 
Energy dark side of it.

[00:19:10.500] 
I've been talking about, like, a creature or someone who's in power. And if they did not in poetry, could it not?

[00:19:23.970] 
Oh, yeah. Well, his statement is that. Our question is, isn't it. That if you try to repress this lover energy. That it will come out in some way that will destroy you?

[00:19:37.580] 
Well, you see that in Jimmy Schwegert.

[00:19:41.020] 
And you see that in a lot.

[00:19:42.250] 
Of these other people.

[00:19:45.340] 
But it's a very common pattern. I mean, we need to realize this is very common pattern. When you do not attend to this. And I think the fact is.

[00:19:55.680] 
We'Ve got a pretty big differentiation in the community of men. We got a lot of men who get in trouble because they're shooting up.

[00:20:09.570] 
With this energy all the time. And if you're one of these, we'll.

[00:20:14.780] 
Get to you shortly.

[00:20:18.760] 
But you really can't understand these men that can't get into lover energy.

[00:20:24.440] 
It's hard to get your mind around that. Because you're so eaten up with it.

[00:20:29.900] 
You can't figure out what to do.

[00:20:31.440] 
With all of it.

[00:20:32.940] 
So you get an addiction to help you handle it.

[00:20:38.300] 
These other folks, though, which is by.

[00:20:41.250] 
Far in the way the addictions are gaining. Folks with that solution in that particular issue are gaining. But still, most men are real out of touch with this lover energy directly.

[00:20:55.840] 
Yeah.

[00:20:56.290] 
Is it possible to be celibate and to be organized?

[00:21:02.020] 
Oh, yeah, I think so.

[00:21:04.420] 
The question is not whether you're having.

[00:21:07.450] 
Coitus all the time.

[00:21:10.520] 
There are a lot of people that.

[00:21:11.510] 
Have a lot of coitus. And are not very well in touch with this. Yeah, see.

[00:21:21.020] 
Well, the thing about it is that the question has to do with celibacy. And the question is about, is it.

[00:21:29.180] 
Possible to be celibate.

[00:21:31.590] 
And have this thing integrated in an organized way?

[00:21:34.180] 
I assume, and I would say, certainly, I think it's possible. Have you ever seen it?

[00:21:43.140] 
He says, have you ever seen it?

[00:21:45.450] 
I think so.

[00:21:49.940] 
Well, we could do a whole course on celibacy. And what that's about psychologically.

[00:21:56.200] 
But see, in order to be celibate in a serious way.

[00:22:06.120] 
You would have to be really heavily integrated in the warrior configuration. And be using that for what it's for. Maybe we can talk a little bit, because that's a positive expression. I'm trying to talk about pathologies now. And I don't see celibacy as a pathology.

[00:22:26.640] 
It often is one expression of somebody's pathology.

[00:22:31.840] 
Just like people choosing the career. See, I don't want to single out the celibate people for special attention on this, because people can go into being a therapist for the same pathological reasons that you can go into being a priest, but there are positive reasons to do that as well. And we can get into that a little bit later. Yes, one more, and then we need to finish this. Take a break.

[00:22:57.070] 
Yeah, she's talking about people that have.

[00:23:00.720] 
To sit behind consoles of computer consoles or sit at, really, it might make you more vulnerable to living a life of detachment. But I think, for example, when a teenager is watching a video of Michael Jackson, they're not practicing magician energy. See, you need to get the latest Michael Jackson video and watch that. See if that's practice, it's going to get you to be a magician. The magician energy. This is somebody who gets off on. Thinking they know all the esoteric knowledge.

[00:23:39.800] 
You see, there are three things that have to be combined in this magician space. It's an understanding of initiation into esoteric knowledge. You got to have a special space, sacred space, transformative space, liminality, and then you got to have somebody that's going to be the ritual elder. And so when you get a solitary Magus practicing like that Rembrandt painting Faust in his study, looking at the magic disk. This is somebody that feels that they're doing important work on the inner planes to keep the world going. And they'Re very invested in it emotionally. So that's not a passive thing in a way.

[00:24:29.690] 
It's not passive. It's an erotic investment in a mental world. Mathematicians, you know, any mathematicians, any really hotshot mathematicians, you ought to get to know, know somebody like Einstein, Bertrand Russell.

[00:24:58.160] 
I mean, those mathematicians, if you don't know anything about math, you may think those folks are just kind of doing without nothing.

[00:25:14.100] 
But, but if you. But if you get into the world of a mathematician, they're right on. They're in ecstasy a lot. I'm not kidding you. They are seeing things that are so intense and so exciting that it's almost all they can stand to get up there. I'm not kidding you. You have to get to know a mathematician and talk to him about what it'S like for him to be in those places, seeing all of those things that a non mathematician cannot even begin to know exist. Now, that's Eros.

[00:25:57.060] 
And talk about how mystical numbers are.

[00:26:01.190] 
Well, that's one. She says they mysticize numbers and talk about how mystical numbers are. Well, that's one thing they do, because that's the magician side of them, mystify. But they're also loving those numbers and they love those shapes. I'm not kidding you. You got to get a feel for that. A physicist is like that. A high energy physicist is like that. You got to understand these people if you'Re in their world this is not an era, a world lacking in Eros. These people are turned, on and tuned in, but it's going in that space. So the thing that you got to.

[00:26:45.880] 
See, though, is that if your relationships when you were a child were real toxic for you, the chances are higher that you're going to be one of us intellectuals. Because your Eros is going to tend to go toward mental worlds instead of flesh. Got to think about that. Let's see.

[00:27:21.900] 
Well, let's come back to the addictions after the break. I got to go have some caffeine or something.

[00:27:28.880] 
You see the, I think it was Newsweek this, this past week cover on addictions. There's a lot of interesting thought now on addictions that relate addictive behaviors to narcissistic pathology. I passed out this stuff on Cohut and Kernberg and so others on this.

[00:28:10.100] 
Interview with Oto Kernberg, why some people can't love, which is about pathological narcissism, and this interview with Heinz Cohut called narcissism empathy and the fragmentation of self. And I wanted you to look at this in the context of our discussion tonight, because there's a lot of exciting work being done now by the psychoanalytic self psychologist on the psychology of addictive behaviors. And let me give you a reference to a book. There's a book by a man by the name of Jerome Levin Levin, and it is called treatment of alcoholism and other addictions. A self-psychology approach.

[00:29:09.840] 
Relating the narcissistic wounding that a person can have in early childhood, the disappointment in their relationships in early childhood, to the tendency to turn to substances as a substitute self object. Now, one of the things I want us to think about tonight a little bit is how that you got to think about this stuff subtly about what turning to a substance is. Now, I don't want to disturb any of the dogma around addictions. So you can just bracket all that dogma around addictions. But I do want you to think about it archetypally and think about it in terms of what happens when one is disappointed in love very early. When your first lovers really let you down and hurt you a lot and abuse you a lot emotionally, either physically and or emotionally, you are at risk in almost every case I would say every case. Now, remember the principle of compensation. In Jung's thought, if you get hurt in a certain area, a certain part of your human self has not been supported and blessed. Then the great self I call it the archetypal self within, will compensate that weakness with grandiose energies in that configuration where you're wounded.

[00:31:22.860] 
Well, let's take the warrior example, and we get to the lover. My experience is that men who easily get into violent behaviors are men whose warrior is not consolidated, is not developed enough. People get a little freaked out. What I say is that man needs to go into martial arts training. If you got a violent man, you need to send him to a real good sensei. And after a few years, that man will not have a problem with acting out violently. So in other words, it's not the same thing. A soldier is not a warrior. Let's get clear. Well, I think that there are undoubtedly soldiers that are warriors. But you got to understand the two words do not they're not synonyms.

[00:32:42.180] 
A warrior is an emotional reality. It's a spiritual reality. It's a psychic reality. It's something that requires an achievement of character and personality development. It is a capacity to bring that archetypal energy into full, responsible stewardship. And so if you get a violent man who acts out against people who are defenseless and weak, you've got a boy in that area who's not matured. Same type of thing in this lover sector. You get reaching out when you're a child to your first love objects and they shame you, they humiliate you, they reject you, they freeze you out, they abuse you sexually or in other emotional ways. Your lover side of your human self is very, very hurt, very wounded. That will be compensated by the archetypal lover energy. And what you will have coming on very strong in you is powerful lover energies to compensate the weak place in yourself. Little less self.

[00:34:03.920] 
Now this will be extremely intense energy. It always is. Ecstatic energy. Enormous, powerful arousal states. Be hungry for these states of excitation. It'll be like the stone song. I can't get no satisfaction. You won't be able to get enough. You see this in persons going after alcohol. You see it in people going after various drugs. You see it of people in what's. Known today as sexaholic, synonymous. You see it in terms of overeating. Eating disorders. Particularly in the kind that is manifest in just binging. Now, there are a lot of people that simply do not look at the lover energy underneath that sort of thing. I'm happy to say that Jan Bauer, for example, a very bright, creative Jungian analyst in Canada, has written a book about alcoholism in women in which she points out the way in which this is related to a disorder in Love. And she's got a very subtle treatment. But I think she's right about that. I think she's on the right track, and I think it's very important to see.

[00:35:44.960] 
Some of the interesting things about remember what this lover energy is like.

[00:35:48.560] 
It doesn't respect boundaries. It's shameless. If you're mainline in this stuff, you're not worried about somebody embarrassing you too much. It's that goddamn your eyes energy. You know? And you got to think about this, this Lover energy. It's shameless. It breaks the rules. Very anarchistic. It's so intense that even if you've got a strong ego, you glow very hot. You glow at least red hot when you're in touch with this thing. I'm going to give you your assignment for next week. Read a little William Blake.  The marriage of heaven and hell. Blake says you go to heaven for the form and you go to hell for the energy. There it is. There it is. This energy is so powerful, even when you're integrating it well. And your ego structures, your little less self, your human self, is cohesive, and you're really in Touch with this. You glow. And if you've been real wounded in yourself, you haven't had the Nurture and help in developing a Solid, strong ego or cohesive self, then this Energy is so powerful, you are going to need to ritualize it, to contain it. Think about this in the Context of ritualization.

[00:37:52.480] 
Eric Erickson, you know, was the first person to bring us back into beginning a new sophisticated understanding of Ritualization. Freudian interpreters pathologize Ritual too much. They tend to think the only reason you would ever do any Ritual is because you haven't dealt with your problems. That's not my position. We'll get into creative uses of ritual to deal with lover energy next week.

[00:38:31.080] 
But the Freudians are right about this too. That is, you got to look at addictions as ritual Practice. It's not very conscious ritual practice in a way, not conscious in a psychoanalytic sense, but it's clearly Ritual practice which.

[00:38:57.630] 
Helps an individual try to contain and bind this energy.

[00:39:04.240] 
Doesn't do it too well, but you.

[00:39:07.940] 
Have to ask yourself, what would the individual have to deal with if they didn't have their addiction?

[00:39:16.600] 
One of the things you got to always, when you're thinking about any form of psychopathology. You got to think about this psychopathology as a kind of a creative compromise. It stands between me and worse, craziness. And you see, if you are this close to the flame and these people that have addictive problems flying real close to the flame, everybody wants forget. I'm sure it's important to talk about the disease side of this, but you've got to also be aware of the ecstatic side of.

[00:40:05.160] 
Mean. If you don't understand sort of the lover side of drinking, then you need to hear Willie Nelson's song, whiskey river. Take my mind. Just get that song. Listen to about four or five times. And Willie Nelson knows about the relationship between the lover and drinking. Whiskey river, take my mind, don't let her memory torture me. Whiskey river, don't run dry you're all I got. Take care of me. Think about that. Think about it. Drinking problems are lover problems.

[00:40:57.960] 
I mean, there may be a few country music fans here. You just think about the drinking songs and how closely related. Drinking and loving are in that culture. Old whiskey if I were a woman, I mean, if you were a woman, I would be able to take him back. It's all this insightful poetry about the lover archetype and drinking or drugs.

[00:41:39.540] 
And so we really have to look at this stuff and really have to understand that if people do not have conscious ritualization in their life, in a spirituality. In other words, if you have no spiritual practice that you take seriously to help you maintain cohesiveness while living with passion. And when you were a child, you had no containment in your family. Your family, which should have provided you. Provided you with containment and a space in which to grow an ego. If it was a dysfunctional family, they didn't provide you with any structure to internalize. You were probably having to provide some of the structure for the family. So in other words, dysfunctional family, your inner structures are probably defective because you had no structure there to internalize.

[00:42:51.540] 
Mother was a child and father was a child. So you're going to have to have ritual. So why do you think working hard and being taking AA seriously helps people get control of this business? Because AA and related groups are serious frontline ritual process. AA and all of these related groups are the most serious, death defying spiritual practices and disciplines that we've got. Get a person that's been AA and has 15 or 20 years of sobriety been working in an AA sponsor for a while.

[00:44:07.570] 
If you want to meet somebody that has a magnificent bullshit indicator. Serious magician energy. Serious magician energy. Talk to somebody that's. That's been. That's had about 20 years of sobriety, in AA, and been a sponsor.

[00:44:34.220] 
They can't bullshit a bullshitter.

[00:44:37.500] 
That's right. But you see, that person has worked the program and has learned enough about the trickster. See, the trickster, that kind of gets you into trouble when he grows up, he is a sorcerer. The trickster is the immature magician. And when the trickster grows up and gets a little maturity, he's a shaman or sorcerer. And the practical ones are the ones that are doing. People ask me, well, are there any mature people? Well, they ought to get out of their dining rooms and they ought to. Go out, get out of their classrooms. And they ought to go out to. Deal with some people that have been serious leaders in AA for about 20 years. And I tell you, you compare what. Goes on in this kind of group among the serious folk in it to what goes on in most congregations, and you get a stark comparison. You got to understand, it's ritual. What is ritual? Serious ritual process. It always includes containment.

[00:46:18.560] 
You're containing numinous energies. Well you get a bunch of addicts together they help each other contain this. They don't gussy it up real pretty. They know what they're dealing with and they know it's life and death.

[00:46:51.270] 
Is that why honesty is part of their programs, to form the congruent?

[00:46:56.110] 
Yep. She says, is that why honesty is part of the program? What you need to do, just get the big book, the AA's big book, and study it to learn something about what I call liberation spirituality. We want to talk liberation spirituality. Look at the program. It's no accident, I think, that Jung.

[00:47:22.180] 
Had a connection in the very early days of alcoholics Anonymous, and it's because of that understanding of the spiritual core in the program. But let me just say another word. They talk today about turning to an object as a self object. Well, what is a self object anyway? Well, it's somebody that is always there for you.

[00:47:56.090] 
Remember in my king lectures, if any of you were in the king course, in the early days of kingship, you know what they did with the king? They shut him up in his hut so he couldn't get out. You always knew where he was when you needed him, which was all the time. See, that's a self object, a self object relationship. We're all looking for that. That's a center cosmic tree, axis mundi. Something I can count on.

[00:48:36.070] 
All right. The recent research says you turn to the substances to provide you with a self object experience. Well, what is that sacrament, folks? This is the mass. Only it's a mass when you're an addict. It's a mass where there's no containment and there's no ritual elder running to show it knows what they're doing. Might have a wise bartender, but if he's pushing that stuff at you, he's a shadow magus. So you got to get into, you got to study Victor Turner, one of the things we haven't done enough of, we're still tone deaf on this stuff. We've got to study anthropology and do an anthropological study of addictions. We do not understand addictive behaviors until we understand the paucity of ritualization in our culture and the fact that if you don't have rituals consciously and you start flying close to the flame, you're going to have them created in your life unconsciously. Or you going to be psychotic? Or you going to commit suicide? So if I say you got to choose between an addiction and suicide, addiction is a little slower. So if you don't have a better ritual. I would like to warn addicts, don't let anybody take your addiction away until you got something better. Yeah.

[00:50:20.330] 
What do you regard as a ritual process in AA? Is it seriousness or. He is working twelve step?

[00:50:32.670] 
Well, you have to study ritual. You have to study about what are elements. The question is, what is the ritual process in AA? You've got to study the structure of liminality. You've got to look at Victor Turner's book with the ritual process. And you got to look at, for example, the essay. Look at the essay that I did in that book, Jung's challenge to contemporary religion.

[00:51:01.510] 
And there's a book that Murray Stein is editing right now that'll be published with Chiron Press very soon, that's on psychoanalysis and ritual. And I have an essay in there about this, but. Let'S see. And I also have a volume on the magician that will be coming out for too long with moral press but anyway, you got to understand vessel. Containment, the group, you got to go to meetings. If you don't go to the meetings, you're not ritualizing. You got to go to those meetings regularly. You got to understand, just like a devout Catholic goes to mass every day.

[00:51:51.750] 
You go to your meetings. You don't go to your meetings to be nice, right? You got that? A devout Catholic doesn't go to mass to be nice. There are people that do go to mass to be nice, but they're not working the program. You understand me? If you know what the mass is about, you don't go to the mass to be nice. You go to the mass to survive. You go to the mass to deal with the chaos that's trying to kill you in your life. You know, what? If you got chaos trying to kill. You, try going to mass. Whether you're Catholic or not, try to go to mass. Let it help you contain the stuff that's lurching around in you. See, if Jung is right, you got a lot of big animals in here. They all want out. You gotta. You need to contain that until you figure out how the gates work, all that sort of thing. Yeah back here? Yeah, sure.

[00:53:11.390] 
What's being contained? The lover archetype?

[00:53:15.430] 
The energy. What you got to understand about archetypes. Is not a word. It's a transformer. An archetypal configuration is a transformer that mediates energy. It's just like, think about it, like electricity or atomic radiation. And what you're containing is that energy so that it doesn't become toxic.

[00:53:42.170] 
Study, for example, study Mary Douglas's book. Purity and danger, about taboo and ritual and taboo. You got to get a feel that. The people in premodern cultures understood this stuff. They thought it was all mana or Orinda or Wakan. It had as many names for it. As there were tribes.

[00:54:18.790] 
But they knew that you didn't want to get it on you. I'm serious. You study this stuff, you get it on you, you die. The principle of contagion operates in the psyche. It operates in your psyche, whether you believe in it or not. And what happens? Haven't you ever noticed? Say you're really kind of out of it and kind of depressed and tired after working yourself half to death all week. And you come home where you live. And the music's turned up and people in there are having a good time and partying. Maybe it's a bar, maybe it's just a place where you live. But it's very interesting what will happen if they're really into it the chances are that's going to be contagious. It's going to kind of sweep you. That's why people go these happy hours. You want to connect with that energy that's there because it will push a lot of this other stuff out of the way, out of your mind. But you got to understand that archetypal energy is very powerful. It's very numinous. And if you're loaded with it, it starts making you do kind of weird things.

[00:55:51.730] 
Like if you're really kind of jacked up with a lot of intense ecstatic energy. You know, one of the things they're doing now, we don't have any high bridges here in Chicago have you heard about this bungee jumping. Where you take this little bungee cord. You know, and you tie it to the bridge and then you just dive off. And you. Now that somebody is trying to get a little containment. You think about it. But you know something? They don't want very much containment, do they? When I just look at that energy, that's merger energy. That's that lover energy. See, that's just wanting to know. I want to go right to the edge. Of what? Death? The great merger. Freud was right about that. The great oceanic feeling, the great union. But that's getting right out there on the edge. Well, see, if you've got an addictive problem, you got a lot of that energy. And you got to ask yourself, well what is this edge? To just drink so much of this stuff that it kills me.

[00:57:33.570] 
If I've got a serious drinking problem and a serious liver problem. And I know that if I get to drinking again, I'm going to die. Bore along. And there is that urge to do it. Well that's this shadow lover energy it wants to erase all the boundaries. Going to fuse back into the great one, the ultimate mystical trip.

[00:58:11.150] 
You got to understand that that energy has to be contained. And in the premodern world, they used to have a lot better ritualization. We have practically none. Now, these people that are trying to figure out. There was this article, this this article about addictions, and and toward the end of the article, they say something like and we're trying to discover the biology of addictions. It's like. It's like the entire psychoanalytic movement never existed. And, of course, the entire psychoanalytic movement they never heard of Freud. They don't understand about primal energies in the unconscious that are real.

[00:59:14.920] 
These are not just ideas, and they overwhelm individuals from within. And if the individual doesn't have any structures in their family in which they're growing up that they can internalize so they can have some controls over it, then they're going to have to act out in predictable patterns. Addictions are predictable patterns. That means there's a predictable ritualization process in it. Now, what you got to understand is Jungians think we ought to get conscious about our ritualization, take responsibility for it. See, that's the next agenda. Well, if you start doing that, then you move into a postmodern culture, because modern culture pathologizes all ritual. See I like to say to groups of men. That there will be people who will try to get you not to participate in spirituality and ritual because they can't come up with an adequate intellectual apprehension of the realities which you're dealing with in your ritual practice. And I say to these folks, I say, well, you know. What I would rather say is somebody, if they have problems about what I'm doing to stay alive, they can just have a problem with it.

[01:01:06.070] 
What you got to understand is that there are a lot of people that are finding resources in channeling this energy and staying alive without all sorts of medication and other things. I mean, the spirituality. We'll get into this a lot next week. But you got to have containment if you're in touch with this stuff. And if you're a very passionate, creative person, you're in touch with this. And it's going to be dangerous for you.

[01:01:47.750] 
So then the question comes, well, what do you do to try to provide yourself ritual vessels and containers. To steward and channel this energy, this lover energy. So that you don't have to deny that you've got it. A lot of people just handle it by denying they've got it. I'm just dead inside. Somebody tells you they're dead inside, they got a glow on inside. Yeah. The question is, if one is going to be spontaneous. And access these lover energies for his life. Then how does he do that if he's going to be conscious of that all the time? Well, this is another place where martial arts is a good example. There are stages of development. Incompetence. Unconscious incompetence.

[01:02:55.140] 
Conscious incompetence. Conscious competence. Unconscious competence.

[01:03:13.080] 
A kindo black belt. That is, one who is a master in the art of swordsmanship. Does not think about where his sword is going to go. The sword knows where to go. Now, is that spontaneous? You bet. Is it disciplined? You bet.

[01:03:41.460] 
That's the level of maturity that you're looking for on all these fronts. And that comes out when a person has got the development on the other. And the other aspects of the psyche. Particularly the king energy to give the centering and calmness and that warrior discipline.

[01:04:10.200] 
But it's not doing without the maturation in the lover does not mean that you just become. You see, that's where the Freudians get this. You know, Freud's book, civilization and its discontents. Well, there's one reading that people give to Freud that it's kind of like. Well, if you're really mature then you have to realize you have to be into renunciation.

[01:04:45.780] 
I don't really think that's. I'd agree with Norman Brown's reading instead of that kind of reading. That really maturation means that you get comfortable enough with this energy and structured enough in your personality so that you can contain and channel a lot of this energy. And you don't have to be away from it.

[01:05:09.200] 
So the real task is to befriend this energy and make sure you're making space consciously for it in your life. And you have to will it. You have to will the stewardship of this space. Because if you don't, all these other agendas will fill up all your time. And next week we're going to talk about some of the things that you need to do to make sure that the garden aspect of your life is respected and protected. Because it really takes will. You've got to assume conscious responsibility over this side of your life. Because if you don't either, you'll be like the addict, addictive personality, and it will just sort of run over you and try to burn you up and out. Or you'll be like the compulsive and you'll try to make out like, you don't have this. I'm really a nice guy and I really wouldn't do that. It's a passionless existence. That's the rule of necrophilia. So next week we need to talk about accessing the lover energy in a way in which you can learn to turn the heat up and get a real nice glow, but not be at the point of burning out your circuits or burning down the house all the time. See, we need to stop there for tonight. I'll stick around for those of you that can chat for a few minutes and next week we'll work on trying to understand how to steward and access this energy in a healthy way. Thanks a lot.

[01:07:08.900] 
I said to you last week that what I've been trying to do is.

[01:07:13.740] 
To get more and more clear in.

[01:07:17.160] 
My work for the last 15 years about the way in which these four different configurations, I like to think of them as circuits or programs in the psyche, have to be related to get us much more clear about what they.

[01:07:39.410] 
Are for what they are, to resource.

[01:07:44.800] 
What is a specific task in the psyche, and what does this contribute toward wholeness? You need to think about these things.

[01:07:53.270] 
As bringing a gift to the total psyche.

[01:07:56.400] 
Each of these configurations, king, warrior, magician.

[01:07:59.370] 
Lover, brings its own gift to the larger psyche.

[01:08:04.680] 
And if you receive all of the gifts of these configurations, then you have.

[01:08:11.100] 
A shot at individuation and wholeness. If you refuse the gifts of any.

[01:08:19.390] 
Of the aspects of these configurations. Then you really don't just lose out on the particular configuration you're refusing. What happens is that that very refusal.

[01:08:35.100] 
Distorts all of the energies of the other configurations.

[01:08:40.980] 
And I said to you last week.

[01:08:42.650] 
That in discussions with Douglas Gillette.

[01:08:47.710] 
That's working with me. On trying to get all this material in print. We were trying to think of images. And it hit me in the course of our discussion. That probably the most adequate way to image this. In terms of a concrete image. Is that of a pyramid shaped structure.

[01:09:10.150] 
Or.

[01:09:12.700] 
The archetypal self itself.

[01:09:14.430] 
Is, say, two pyramids, base to base.

[01:09:18.400] 
One representing the feminine, one representing the Masculine. And that if you just think about the masculine psyche. That think what would happen if you had a pyramid.

[01:09:30.200] 
And you build two sides of it, or three sides of it.

[01:09:39.380] 
And try to think about. Try to imagine that in your mind. Imagine leaving a side off of it.

[01:09:47.060] 
What does this do to the rest of the structure?

[01:09:50.760] 
You get a feeling. If you start playing with images like that. You can get a feeling for the.

[01:09:54.790] 
Weakening of the other structures. And the eventual distortion of the other.

[01:10:00.890] 
Aspects of the psyche. If you do not pay attention to all of these configurations.

[01:10:06.620] 
And I want to just review a.

[01:10:09.630] 
Bit with you before we go. Last week we were talking almost totally about distortions. Tonight I want to emphasize to you.

[01:10:19.840] 
Again the necessity of this lover energy.

[01:10:23.640] 
If you are going to fully develop. Be a fully developed masculine personality. So let me just jump into that.

[01:10:36.360] 
Then we will start talking about resources.

[01:10:40.510] 
How do you get at this? And I'll be talking a good deal about active imagination. Along these lines. And some other resources.

[01:10:50.780] 
But last week we talked about the.

[01:10:52.560] 
Way in which the king archetype. Without this lover energy functions in terms of tends to get erotic about domination.

[01:11:04.960] 
That is, if the lover space and energy has to come in the back door. Then you will get off on domination of others. If you neglect the lover space directly.

[01:11:26.260] 
You don't develop that consciously.

[01:11:29.240] 
The warrior will really get into destruction of life.

[01:11:39.020] 
And there will be a sort of.

[01:11:41.360] 
An erotic pleasure in devastation and destroying value.

[01:11:49.040] 
Destroying whatever is in your field of fire.

[01:11:55.600] 
If you are coming out of the magician without adequate connection. Directly, appropriately to the lover.

[01:12:05.710] 
You will tend to be very detached emotionally. And you will be very voyeuristic.

[01:12:13.560] 
And you will not be able to think adequately. About the moral and human meaning of things you invent. In other words, you will be a scientist without a heart.

[01:12:34.220] 
You will be a.

[01:12:37.420] 
You will be a physicist. Who never thinks about the moral implications of your discoveries in high energy physics, et cetera.

[01:12:51.050] 
I mean, you can apply this to.

[01:12:52.740] 
All the different scientific disciplines.

[01:13:00.260] 
Just another example of Madison. The people that use the most insight.

[01:13:04.910] 
From archetypal psychology today and history of.

[01:13:08.760] 
Religions and comparative religions, comparative mythology, are.

[01:13:12.360] 
Not your schools of religion. They are not your theological seminary.

[01:13:19.880] 
They are not even your graduate schools of psychology. The people who are putting the most.

[01:13:26.130] 
Money and time into this type of thing today are people in advertising and marketing. They are buying magicians right and left.

[01:13:40.480] 
To help them use archetypal images and the understanding about the power of images to manipulate people through marketing. All you have to do is look.

[01:13:54.760] 
At commercials today and get a feeling for that. It's brilliant.

[01:14:01.140] 
I mean, spend an evening looking just at commercials.

[01:14:04.530] 
Forget the programs, just look at the commercials, and then go to a church the following weekend and see who you think is using the archetypal imagery most subtly, most capably so.

[01:14:21.280] 
That's this magician business without any sense of public responsibility. And then we talked about the difficulties that an individual who tends to mainline love energy has. We talked about the addictions and so.

[01:14:38.180] 
Forth, problems with boundaries, problems with adequate.

[01:14:44.670] 
Ritualization, attempts to try to contain this energy when it's in very raw forms. And tonight we just need to look at the other side of that so you can get clear in your mind.

[01:14:59.000] 
The necessity for this lover energy and.

[01:15:03.980] 
How we leave this out, or we.

[01:15:05.980] 
Repress it to the human race's detriment. So let's go through it.

[01:15:15.360] 
If you're adequately accessing and protecting the space of the lover, and that's one of the things I want to really emphasize a lot to you, the necessity.

[01:15:23.140] 
To protect the garden.

[01:15:27.220] 
Just think about a garden space.

[01:15:31.460] 
If you really protect the garden.

[01:15:36.580] 
And.

[01:15:37.130] 
Protect the lover aspect of the psyche, so that it is not constantly under attack without any kind of cover in your life.

[01:15:52.030] 
If you form that kind of space and you protect it adequately, and you.

[01:15:56.240] 
Ritualize it adequately, then what happens? Well, the king energy in a man transforms. No longer is that power of the.

[01:16:13.380] 
King energy and the commitment to leadership.

[01:16:17.780] 
Obsessed with domination of others. What happens is what Eric Erickson, the.

[01:16:26.200] 
Great freudian analyst, talked about as generativity comes online. If you have not read Eric Erickson's work, let me suggest that you begin with an overview that a really outstanding.

[01:16:45.760] 
Person, Robert Coles, a Harvard psychiatrist, has written about Erickson.

[01:16:53.210] 
It's just entitled Eric Erickson the growth of his work. It's a sensitive summary of Erickson's work. And then that would get you into Eric Erickson's work. But the other book that I would recommend that you look at would be.

[01:17:11.650] 
Don Browning.

[01:17:15.780] 
An important book called Generative.

[01:17:18.960] 
Man, Generative man, in which he goes into the foundations of this capacity in a mature man. Well, generativity comes online for this aspect of a man. When the lover is test adequately and a man is comfortable with this side.

[01:17:48.470] 
Of himself, the king energy is transformed and in fact, enabled to be what it was meant to be in the first place.


audo_enhanced_The Lover Within 06.mp3

[00:00:00.520] 
The warrior.

[00:00:01.610] 
Instead of compulsive attacks on.

[00:00:08.600] 
Values, human values, human rights.

[00:00:12.610] 
Anybody that's.

[00:00:16.330] 
Vulnerable, attacks on life.

[00:00:23.010] 
The warrior energy. And a man, when it is adequately.

[00:00:28.480] 
Informed by the lover.

[00:00:31.530] 
Begins to assume.

[00:00:34.480] 
Its true role as a protector of life.

[00:00:42.880] 
That motto that you see so often.

[00:00:48.180] 
On police cars should not be a joke.

[00:00:52.100] 
We serve and protect.

[00:00:55.020] 
That is the image of what happens to this warrior energy when it's informed by the lover as it is supposed to be informed. For example, when you get this green piece concept of the rainbow warrior, that's somebody who has gotten connected enough to the body and to the life and to physical world to care about it. So you do something about it. This is the origins of the rainbow warrior. The magician moves from that kind of.

[00:01:51.610] 
Schizoid detachment we were talking about earlier.

[00:01:54.180] 
That sort of fantasy of value free theory.

[00:02:01.910] 
Anybody that's into this fantasy of value.

[00:02:06.220] 
Free theory is a magician who has not connected enough with the lover energy.

[00:02:13.010] 
Because anybody see, when you're value free, that means that you're out of touch with this LoveR energy in an appropriate way.

[00:02:22.340] 
You have no real appropriate connection with it. When the magician configuration in the psyche is balanced appropriately by the lover energy.

[00:02:37.080] 
This detachment goes away. And what do you start to get in human culture? You simply look, comparatively in the various cultures of the human race in history, what you begin to get is the.

[00:02:53.030] 
Healer and the man who assumes his responsibilities as a ritual elder.

[00:02:59.940] 
In other words, what people talk about today as the functioning role of the.

[00:03:08.310] 
Shaman or the medicine man, or as with the mescalero Apache, the singer.

[00:03:17.340] 
One.

[00:03:18.740] 
Who is not at all detached from the people. In fact, it's fascinating to me. There are so many psychotherapists and psychoanalysts that are into these detachment fantasies.

[00:03:38.690] 
The fantasy that to be professional, you're really detached. And in a lot of training schools.

[00:03:48.060] 
They teach that.

[00:03:49.820] 
Kind of the fantasy that, well, when you have worked with someone and you terminate with them, you should not ever have any kind of.

[00:04:02.610] 
Other relationship with them.

[00:04:03.460] 
Now, you can honor that kind of.

[00:04:11.350] 
Position until you get an education in cultural anthropology.

[00:04:16.480] 
And when you do get a little.

[00:04:20.220] 
Education in cultural anthropology and ethnopsychiatry, you begin to notice that in traditional cultures.

[00:04:29.420] 
Your healer wasn't the one who never.

[00:04:33.080] 
Saw you again after he healed you. You lived with these people.

[00:04:38.620] 
They had known you from the time that you were little. And they probably know you throughout your entire life cycle. All this fantasy of detachment, what is that? That is a fantasy of a point of view. That is a shadow magician.

[00:04:57.040] 
Who is inadequately informed by this LoVe aspect. And you can tell why is it.

[00:05:05.210] 
That love and sexuality is so much.

[00:05:07.050] 
In the shadow of psychotherapy, all psychotherapies, all schools? Well, it's because of this particular difficulty.

[00:05:15.460] 
People who are drawn into becoming therapists.

[00:05:17.570] 
Have problems with this. And that's why you got to beware of psychotherapists, period.

[00:05:24.580] 
But you got to make sure that whoever you see for therapy has had.

[00:05:32.450] 
A lot of therapy. Don't go to therapists who have not had first question you ought to have when you interview a therapist before you decide to see them, find out how many years of therapy they've had for themselves. That is the only way a therapist can deal with this problem. So they don't need to be a voidure for your life. Okay. But not just the healer aspect, the ritual elder aspect.

[00:06:12.220] 
A man who is inadequately related to.

[00:06:16.070] 
The Lover will not be able to care enough to serve as a ritual elder for those in his life that he needs to serve as a ritual elder. There's a group of men in Chicago.

[00:06:35.330] 
Area that offer an experience called the New Warrior weekend. One of the things that I'm very impressed with this group of men about is that after they have an intense.

[00:06:49.490] 
Weekend working on men's issues, they have follow up, small groups, and these men take time to be there for each other, and they're not getting paid for it. That's a very impressive thing to me. It's very hard to find men who.

[00:07:16.070] 
Will be there for you and help you address and deal with your male.

[00:07:20.490] 
Issues without wanting money for it.

[00:07:24.670] 
And that's why I want you to think about the importance of this kind of experience of men. Because men who will take the time in their lives, in their busy lives.

[00:07:39.700] 
To spend some of it being there.

[00:07:44.660] 
Serving as ritual elders for other men.

[00:07:46.770] 
That'S very impressive thing.

[00:07:48.230] 
It used to be something that men.

[00:07:51.320] 
Assumed in the premodern era, that wasn't unusual. If you were a man in a tribal culture, there were times that the men took to be with you and.

[00:08:04.270] 
To help you deal with how difficult it was to be a man.

[00:08:08.580] 
Not in modernity.

[00:08:11.490] 
Most men today live their lives year.

[00:08:15.430] 
After year after year without having any time, serious time with another man or men to talk about the serious issues of their life as men. That is, unless they pay for. And that's the tragedy could be stopped. And there's a lot of movement on this now around the country. Okay.

[00:08:47.800] 
The lover side of the psyche, for.

[00:08:49.920] 
Those of you in the room who.

[00:08:51.060] 
Don'T have a problem that the rest of us guys have got. You don't have a problem getting into this and integrating it. What you got a problem of is trying to find your way out of it.

[00:09:01.420] 
Sometimes you sort of are embarrassed.

[00:09:07.540] 
By all the riches of the lover energy in your life. And so you spend a lot of your time. Trying to figure out. Which one of your addictions you will use today. To try to kind of bind some of this energy. And I've been very serious in my.

[00:09:25.310] 
Discussions in previous weeks. That we've got to look beneath this popularity of addiction today. To the powerful energies that fuel it.

[00:09:39.980] 
And understand that these passionate energies.

[00:09:43.900] 
The intensity that so many people who.

[00:09:49.050] 
Have had problems with addictions.

[00:09:50.220] 
Experience that energy is not in itself pathological.

[00:09:55.670] 
And you should never let anybody convince you that it is. The energy itself is not pathological. That's energy. That, even though it's manifesting in some self destructive ways.

[00:10:06.420] 
That is life energy. That's life energy.

[00:10:10.140] 
And again, like the problem with so many of these other things. The problem is always one of stewarding. How does one steward this energy. Keep it from wiping me or somebody else out? How can I get out of this energy?

[00:10:24.040] 
What it's there for?

[00:10:26.340] 
So when a person is able to.

[00:10:32.090] 
Heal the psyche in this lover aspect.

[00:10:36.350] 
If you're in that category. You get an ability to move from this kind of desperation.

[00:10:44.490] 
Anxious desperation.

[00:10:46.770] 
That a person often lives in, in that state. And moves from fragmentation. To get to the point where one.

[00:10:54.670] 
Has a capacity to hold that energy better.

[00:10:58.160] 
One develops a capacity to contain and channel that energy better. So that one doesn't have to completely.

[00:11:06.240] 
Isolate oneself from it.

[00:11:09.620] 
One doesn't have to feel bad about the energy. But one can actually experience it more and benefit from it. In the way that it was designed to be used. So let's talk about. First of all, let me just stop there. Do you see how all of these things are interlocking?

[00:11:33.100] 
You cannot heal one without reference to the others. Yes.

[00:11:39.800] 
In this process, I hear you talking about how the lover brings healing to the other three architects.

[00:11:48.560] 
Yes.

[00:11:48.670] 
Is it possible for it to move the other direction?

[00:11:52.580] 
It does move. Let me just say that we're going.

[00:11:57.390] 
To have to look now at how.

[00:12:01.080] 
It, in fact, does move the other. The question is, the lover heals the other configurations. Does it move the other way also? Yes, it does. And particularly.

[00:12:13.220] 
Well, let's just look at that.

[00:12:15.020] 
Let's deal with that right now.

[00:12:17.020] 
And let's deal first with this. If you have this problem with being overwhelmed by this lover energy. If you're an artist, you know.

[00:12:32.170] 
It'S very common for artists to have difficulty being overwhelmed by this intensity and having.

[00:12:43.650] 
A lot of trouble regulating it. What does the king offer to all of these that no other configuration offers?

[00:12:58.740] 
It offers centering.

[00:12:59.840] 
A tap root, which.

[00:13:06.240] 
Gives you a center that is not.

[00:13:07.830] 
The ego, which can help you regulate all energies.

[00:13:12.710] 
If you do not have the connection with the king, you will be full of anxiety.

[00:13:19.280] 
Out of all of these, you'll respond.

[00:13:23.600] 
To the anxiety differently. But the king, and to be, if you really were doing the full psyche, it's the conyunctio, the royal couple. If you're not adequately connected to that, you do not have the kind of.

[00:13:40.380] 
Axle axis, you do not have the center, the still point around which all.

[00:13:48.570] 
Of this energy can revolve.

[00:13:51.430] 
And so one of the first things.

[00:13:55.350] 
You have to ask yourself, if you have difficulty with emotional and psychological premature ejaculation, is, what kind of a connection.

[00:14:06.530] 
Do I have consciously to the Kenyoteo.

[00:14:09.380] 
To the archetypal self, as Jung would say? Am I working consciously upfront on what Edward Eddinger talks about as the ego self axis? If you've heard my other tapes, I'm constantly emphasizing that is a central issue.

[00:14:29.930] 
The ego self axis, in this case.

[00:14:33.260] 
With the king or queen energy.

[00:14:35.940] 
To give you a center which can. It functions for those of you that.

[00:14:42.320] 
Like I was as a teenager, into powerful engines.

[00:14:48.380] 
It's like balancing an engine. You balance an engine, you can run it up to 7000 rpm and doesn't.

[00:14:57.610] 
Shake itself to bits.

[00:15:00.060] 
You can generate enormous horsepower, but it doesn't shake itself to pieces.

[00:15:05.750] 
With the connection to the king, to.

[00:15:10.230] 
The conunctio, you have a centering that.

[00:15:13.590] 
Makes possible accessing a lot more energy without fragmentation. That is key. So you can see the contribution of the king energy without that. Whenever I see anyone in my practice, they come in and they're just oozing archetypal energy all over the place. And it's quite clear that they cannot really settle down in any area of their life immediately. My first thought is, well, what's this person doing in terms of some sort of spirituality connection with some images of the conjunctia?

[00:15:44.880] 
If it's a woman, I first think.

[00:15:46.690] 
Well, does she have any sense whatsoever.

[00:15:49.370] 
Of a connection to the goddess?

[00:15:51.260] 
Chances are, if a woman has got a very serious problem about eating disorders.

[00:16:00.930] 
Substance abuse, if you investigate, you will.

[00:16:08.260] 
Find that there may be an identification.

[00:16:13.380] 
With the goddess, but often there's not.

[00:16:16.760] 
A connection, a conscious connection. There has not been, as some of the books have put it, there has.

[00:16:23.610] 
Not been a dissent to the goddess.

[00:16:25.550] 
By the same token, if I run.

[00:16:30.030] 
Into a man that is glowing red.

[00:16:34.830] 
Hot when he comes in my office, I want to know what kind of.

[00:16:41.950] 
Spiritual techniques or disciplines he may be.

[00:16:46.210] 
Using or is not using. I assume that he's probably not using it to disidentify with the king.

[00:16:52.960] 
I mean, here's the rule. If you're not doing something to disidentify with the king or the queen, you've got an unconscious identification with it at some level, and that will make your personality inherently unstable.

[00:17:17.310] 
That is, you may get into a psychotherapy with somebody and have an idealizing transference, which means that you put that.

[00:17:26.980] 
Projection on that therapist. But do you see? Then all of a sudden I'm calm.

[00:17:36.290] 
If I'm able to idealize my therapist, all of a sudden I'm calmer. But that doesn't mean I've really gotten anywhere. You see that? Can you see that? It doesn't mean I've gotten anywhere until I get an internal connection to that thing which I'm projecting on my therapist.

[00:17:53.250] 
So.

[00:17:54.700] 
That'S what most people mean when they talk about spirituality, and that's okay with me for them to talk that way. The full ego self axis includes a connection, a conscious connection to all of these.

[00:18:11.720] 
But what you get when you're connecting.

[00:18:14.010] 
With the king, if you're a man and you're connecting with the king, what.

[00:18:17.580] 
You'Re getting specifically is that taproot that balances your engines and enables you to rev it up more without coming apart. Yes, well, what I mean very simply.

[00:18:38.720] 
The question is, what I mean by getting a connections, let's say, with the king.

[00:18:41.810] 
I actually mean that very simply in.

[00:18:47.560] 
Terms of a process of active imagination. You can read Robert Johnson's inner workbook for sort of an abcs of active imagination, or you can get Barbara Hannah's old classic on active imagination called encounters with the soul and read that. But it's a lot less important for you to get sophisticated in all the reading about active imagination than that you do it. I have a lot of people that read books on act, but it takes just doing it.

[00:19:26.630] 
And see, when you're writing a dialog.

[00:19:30.940] 
When you're writing a dialog with the.

[00:19:36.180] 
King.

[00:19:35.800] 
It'S a lot harder for you.

[00:19:40.840] 
To identify with it because the king will say things to you. And this is not speculation, folks.

[00:19:53.220] 
I have done this with men and.

[00:19:56.910] 
Women all over the country.

[00:19:57.530] 
And so I'm not recommending some mystical.

[00:20:01.330] 
Thing at all I'm just saying this.

[00:20:03.970] 
Is an empirical exercise. Experiment with it. If you're not experimenting with it, then you haven't really made any effort. See, we're not talking ontological issues or metaphysical issues. You can do that if you want to theologize about this. People throughout history have.

[00:20:21.930] 
But the real issue is if you will do active imagination with these imagos, it will have an impact on your psyche.

[00:20:33.360] 
And if you do active imagination and form a relationship with the king imago, or for you women with the queen.

[00:20:41.760] 
Imago, it will calm you down. You try it. I don't care how crazy you think you are.

[00:20:52.540] 
The crazier you are, the more you ought to be doing it. There are people that will say to you, oh, you know, if you're really crazy, don't you do active imagination. You got to be seeing me if you do active imagination. Well, I understand that marketing is important, but if you're real crazy, do active.

[00:21:21.990] 
Imagination with the king and the queen.

[00:21:25.150] 
That will help you get real disidentified.

[00:21:31.680] 
With the grandiosity in your psyche.

[00:21:33.690] 
Now, if somebody asks you, well, now.

[00:21:37.030] 
Is that king God? Tell them, you don't know. You just talk to them all the time.

[00:21:42.420] 
You'll ask them. The next time you talk to them, say, are you God, sir? And then see what they say.

[00:21:51.710] 
Sometimes they say, see, most of the time they say no when you ask. But you have to ask the one in you. I don't know what he'll say, but.

[00:22:02.910] 
You can find out.

[00:22:04.410] 
That's an empirical, scientific enterprise. So we're not talking theology here or.

[00:22:10.110] 
Something mystical, you just scientific psychological experiment.

[00:22:13.710] 
Which you can do. But I am making an assertion based.

[00:22:19.900] 
On my clinical experience.

[00:22:21.560] 
If you're real crazy.

[00:22:24.720] 
Start your active imaginations with the king and the queen and get that relationship going first because it will calm you down and give.

[00:22:36.920] 
You a sense of calmness. Try it. See what I mean? Yeah.

[00:22:43.230] 
The question is that, say he had done an exercise in one of the classes on the king where he got in touch with a board king within my comment about this, this is very common when you first begin. A lot of people have a hard time finding a nurturing royal couple within. But that is, to me what you.

[00:23:11.230] 
Want to do is you talk to this shadow king.

[00:23:16.080] 
Ask him where you got him in your family. Where did you learn that the important persons were to be bored with you? And ask him how you treat other people the way he's treating you. I mean, there's always something to learn from these figures. And Jung's point always was when you're doing active imagination. You never become vulnerable to these psychic contents.

[00:23:41.010] 
That's wrong. You protect yourself from them.

[00:23:44.000] 
You form a firm relationship with these figures. But the point is you do need to keep going back to the throne room. Until you find the king who is.

[00:23:57.950] 
Not bored with you, who does wish you well.

[00:24:01.950] 
And my experience with men and women is that when they do continue going back. They do make that connection. If you're very wounded in your family experience. It will be harder for you to find a nurturing king.

[00:24:17.400] 
But people do it.

[00:24:19.160] 
And this is not speculation.

[00:24:21.030] 
People do it. But it is, as Robert Johnson says, it's not fun. It's inner work. It is work. You have to keep going back. Okay, but let me go on now to the warrior thing.

[00:24:38.410] 
There is a quality about the lover that we've got to get clear about tonight. It's key to get the point that we need to make tonight. And that is that poem. Something there is that does not love a wall.

[00:24:58.830] 
Well, that's the lover then. The lover does not love a wall.

[00:25:06.460] 
Remember we said that the lover goes.

[00:25:09.160] 
Across boundaries, doesn't understand boundaries. Is into union, participation, participacion, mystique.

[00:25:18.040] 
It's into being with unification. The christians have this fan at onement.

[00:25:24.530] 
Right?

[00:25:25.270] 
Atonement at onement.

[00:25:27.140] 
That's the lover, see?

[00:25:28.930] 
Well, that's wonderful. And that's the lover doing its thing. But you see the lover by itself. If you've got a lot of lover energy in your psyche. And it's really flooding you.

[00:25:40.760] 
What this means is that you're a very vulnerable person.

[00:25:47.110] 
Because a lover by itself is extremely vulnerable. And I want to make something.

[00:25:55.360] 
Stand.

[00:26:01.000] 
Out to you here. And that is, I don't think vulnerability is a virtue.

[00:26:05.080] 
Receptiveness is a virtue. Sensitivity is a virtue.

[00:26:13.870] 
Vulnerability is what you have when you are mainlining a lot of lover energy. But you have not developed the other.

[00:26:22.540] 
Sides of this thing. What is the role of the warrior in this? It is the warrior's job to protect.

[00:26:31.670] 
The garden of your life.

[00:26:34.270] 
That's got to be a clear assignment.

[00:26:40.440] 
Because if the warrior does not protect.

[00:26:45.480] 
The lover space in your life. There won't be any. Can you see why that is?

[00:26:53.130] 
It's only the warrior aspect of the self that can draw a line and.

[00:26:58.890] 
Say, step across this and I'll cut it off.

[00:27:01.430] 
So why do you think at the.

[00:27:07.720] 
Gate of the Garden of Eden they put down these guards?

[00:27:12.470] 
That's because without the guards there's no garden.

[00:27:18.560] 
Yes.

[00:27:18.940] 
The question is, what about people that build up walls all around them. He says they're not vulnerable at all. I say exactly the opposite. I say they are incredibly vulnerable. A person who cannot attain intimacy is.

[00:27:33.300] 
A person who is radically vulnerable.

[00:27:35.840] 
And if you do not have your.

[00:27:39.050] 
Warrior self constellated, you will not be able to sustain intimacy.

[00:27:42.830] 
That's what people do not understand. That is to say, how are you going to be able to sustain intimacy in a relationship?

[00:27:51.980] 
By having a dependable warrior. I want you to think about that.

[00:27:58.170] 
If you are a man who cannot sustain an intimate relationship, the chances are.

[00:28:05.180] 
That it is not because you plow.

[00:28:08.740] 
Off the handle and you go into your great rages and you raise hell and you may be even violent. That doesn't mean your warrior is developed. A man that loses his temper and gets violent is a man who does.

[00:28:21.750] 
Not have a consolidated warrior.

[00:28:23.120] 
The man who has a consolidated warrior.

[00:28:26.530] 
Does not lose his temper. He is able to contain this infantile aggression.

[00:28:34.740] 
He's able to use the warrior energy to protect life.

[00:28:39.630] 
His life, his love life. Now, the warrior isn't the lover. You put him out there at the gate. You say, now stay out here and.

[00:28:53.280] 
Don'T let me be interrupted. Do not accept any other appointments.

[00:28:59.990] 
Think about that. So many of us have so little warrior energy that we will fill up our calendars to the point that there is no time for the garden. This is a chronic problem in marriages today.

[00:29:20.280] 
I tell you, there are so many.

[00:29:24.470] 
Couples for whom both the man and the woman, all they do is work.

[00:29:29.650] 
They do not bother to set aside.

[00:29:37.380] 
Time for them to get into the garden. And, folks, if it's not set aside and protected, it will not exist. Yes.

[00:29:45.450] 
Why do you think so many men and women are like that?

[00:29:49.580] 
I think it's because they do not understand.

[00:29:54.500] 
The question is, why are men and.

[00:29:56.440] 
So many women and women like that? It is really epidemic now, and a lot of divorces are caused by this.

[00:30:01.200] 
Because we don't understand how fragile that lover space is.

[00:30:08.400] 
If you understand how fragile the lover space in your life is and how precious it is and how it has to be protected, then you will find.

[00:30:20.999] 
Your fifth army and you will say.

[00:30:25.170] 
Get over there and protect.

[00:30:27.410] 
Will.

[00:30:30.540] 
You will call up and you'll get your inner George S. Patton. And you'll say, patton, now, I want you to take your tanks and I want you to go here and I want you to take my weekend. I don't want any incursions into my weekend. I don't care how important it is.

[00:30:52.920] 
That I do something meaningful or something socially responsible.

[00:31:01.610] 
Because see, I mean, all this seductive. Oh, come on now. You've got to do this important job. It's very important that you see me. I know those other people are not important, but it's important if you see.

[00:31:14.340] 
Me schedule a little more time, take on one more job. After all, she married you. You can take her for granted, right? It's not just men do that.

[00:31:33.700] 
There are a lot of women today that they're married.

[00:31:35.760] 
This guy's married, he's father of children. And I'm going back to school now. I'll see you and watch. He's going to put up with that. Well, that's not easy.

[00:31:57.930] 
There's going to be somebody come along.

[00:32:02.540] 
That'S got the keys to the garden because they don't have any.

[00:32:06.960] 
And you're out there being the 190 proof warrior and somebody would come along.

[00:32:16.490] 
And say, hey, come on up here. You got the money, I got the time. I'm not kidding. It happens all the time.

[00:32:26.120] 
Well, so why does it happen so much?

[00:32:28.630] 
It's because people don't understand how vulnerable the lover is.

[00:32:32.490] 
And this garden space, that's why it's so fantasized as an oasis out there in the desert. It's this oasis, kind of magical oasis. Now you see it, now you don't. Well, the reason we have all those fantasies about that is because it will.

[00:32:50.390] 
Disappear on you just like that if you don't protect it.

[00:32:53.490] 
And this is why so many people.

[00:32:57.290] 
Think, what happens after marriage? Well, the lover's side disappears. Well, it disappears.

[00:33:06.290] 
Not because there's anything necessarily inherent about marriage. It's just that people stop putting energy into the garden space. When you're in that first bloom of love, you will pay any price, you.

[00:33:18.090] 
Will bear any burden to get into the garden with him or her.

[00:33:23.390] 
And after you marry, well, make an appointment. Well, you got to look at that because see, if the warrior in you.

[00:33:36.710] 
Has not kind of listened up to.

[00:33:40.590] 
This issue and it's not alert to.

[00:33:42.850] 
The task of protecting this space, then there won't be any in your life.

[00:33:49.870] 
And your life will become a desert. And that's the story for so many.

[00:33:57.230] 
People now, the mega stuff is obvious what you need with that, because as.

[00:34:05.490] 
We'Ll see next quarter when we're talking about this, it's the magician in you that has got a sense of the.

[00:34:12.540] 
Geography, all of it, and has a.

[00:34:19.650] 
Sense of being aware.

[00:34:22.730] 
When you hadn't been there lately, when.

[00:34:25.840] 
You hadn't been into this room lately or when you hadn't been into that room lately, and the magician part of you will kind of tug at you and say, hey, have you noticed anything?

[00:34:37.680] 
What do you mean?

[00:34:40.400] 
I'm doing great. I'm achieving this. I'm achieving that. I'm achieving this. I'm achieving that. Well, have you noticed anything else? Because when you get into a lot of these spaces, if you're into that generativity, caring for the world and everything, caring for the family, caring for the children, caring for the institution, whatever, you.

[00:35:00.310] 
Can just get lost in that.

[00:35:01.210] 
So the magician is your awareness.

[00:35:07.580] 
And.

[00:35:08.510] 
You really got to get to the point where you understand that that thing has to scan. You can't be without that. That thing has to be scanning. You don't want to have your magician turned off.

[00:35:20.530] 
It needs to be scanning so that it is aware.

[00:35:25.560] 
When you start really getting out of shape, when you start getting misshapen, when.

[00:35:31.620] 
You start turning into a monster, your magician needs to call you up, say, wake up.

[00:35:40.160] 
So you can see how these different.

[00:35:44.060] 
Aspects, all of them are necessary. All of them are necessary.

[00:35:49.380] 
But there is a mutually interdependent relationship between these four configurations. And when you start acknowledging them, when you start accessing them, when you start receiving each of their gifts, then you start moving toward what Jung talked about as individuation, because you start getting some semblance of that wholeness. That is the sort of dominant image in Jung's thought. Now, let me stop there for some questions. Comments?

[00:36:26.170] 
Yeah, this one, when I try active imagination with my lover, and obviously that's difficult for me. I'm not a man was at ease with that. A message that keeps coming back is, use me more in your work life. And I can see a sense that my wife and I are good friends and there aren't major things there, although it's fruitful. But it doesn't click with me as how the Lover would fit in the work life. My sense is, it's important.

[00:36:56.810] 
Okay. The question is, when he does active imagination with the Lover, the lover says, use me more in your work life.

[00:37:05.830] 
Well, you see, the lover is not.

[00:37:12.680] 
Just something that applies to the genitals. See, this is the genius of Freud and the Freudian tradition.

[00:37:20.370] 
They understand that when you mature psychosexually.

[00:37:25.650] 
There is a kind of an erotic.

[00:37:30.900] 
Quality that one can experience. That's what they mean when you hear this word sublimation.

[00:37:36.970] 
Now, for a Classical Freudian, that is.

[00:37:40.840] 
Not as negative a thing as we.

[00:37:44.690] 
Like when we're shooting at the Freudians. We like to make it sound as.

[00:37:48.130] 
Negative as possible, but that is not.

[00:37:51.690] 
Really, in their purview, a negative thing. It simply means that you can feel this energy, you can feel this life energy, this libidinal, sort of joyful involvement with life.

[00:38:05.170] 
It means you're overcoming your necrophilia and you are not bored. If you're bored with your work, you do need that lover energy infusing it. And it will do it.

[00:38:24.170] 
I will. After the break, I'll read you a poem by D. H. Lawrence which directly addresses this issue. I mean, when you start getting in.

[00:38:38.090] 
Touch with this poet within, which is.

[00:38:39.310] 
Really a form of the lover, I.

[00:38:42.300] 
Mean, things start getting more luminous.

[00:38:47.320] 
You could argue that when you're really.

[00:38:49.850] 
In touch with this, you're never bored.

[00:38:52.120] 
What is a mark of the narcissistically, really damaged personality?

[00:38:59.060] 
They are bored a lot.

[00:38:59.880] 
When you start getting healed, you're more.

[00:39:08.180] 
Passionate and less bored.

[00:39:09.680] 
You start having a lot more enthusiasm about everything you do. They say, well, that's manic.

[00:39:18.520] 
That's manic. That's a depressed psychologist talking. I'm not kidding you.

[00:39:28.250] 
There are a lot of depressed psychologists that envy the hell out of your enthusiasm and want to pathologize it. I'm not kidding you.

[00:39:39.570] 
Yeah, teenagers always say they're bored. Does that mean that they're just not developed or is that they just have vocabulary?

[00:39:52.660] 
Well, the question is about teenagers saying they're always bored. Is that related to some kind of pathology? Well, we wouldn't want to pathologize about adolescents in that way. But you would say that they've got.

[00:40:06.210] 
So much of this lover energy rolling.

[00:40:09.360] 
Through them in the hormone that in.

[00:40:13.360] 
That case, it's more of a defense against it.

[00:40:14.740] 
We defend against the great energies in our personality whenever we're not really sure.

[00:40:22.070] 
That we can channel them appropriately without fragmenting. So, in other words, if you're really.

[00:40:29.520] 
Having a hard time kind of riding.

[00:40:31.640] 
The horse.

[00:40:32.030] 
You'Re going to say you're sitting up on this big stallion, this big stallion that wants to run, and.

[00:40:45.040] 
You'Re saying to yourself, I'm not interested in horseback riding.

[00:40:48.160] 
In fact, I don't even believe in horses. A lot of people do that. In fact, you get somebody that tells you, I'm just wooden inside. I'm just real depressed. I'm wooden inside. They're sitting up there on big stallion trying to not know. I mean, that's what that movie equis.

[00:41:18.970] 
Is about.

[00:41:19.930] 
That depressed psychiatrist played by Richard Burton. That's kind of funny, Richard Burton playing a depressed psychiatrist, but trying to stay away from that big sensuous horse in himself. And the young boy, not as sophisticated.

[00:41:50.280] 
As the psychiatrist, is less afraid of the horse.

[00:41:54.580] 
Is there any particular reason why somebody would be afraid of that? A teenager? Or.

[00:42:01.760] 
Any particular reason why someone should be afraid of this great horse within? Yeah, because if it runs away with you, it's dangerous.

[00:42:13.760] 
And those big horses run away with you.

[00:42:16.160] 
Maybe I phrased it wrong. I was wondering why the teenagers. Common thing.

[00:42:23.670] 
Well, see, the development of your ego self axis, you can think about that as learning to ride. That's the way you ought to think about that.

[00:42:40.910] 
And I don't mean an old plug.

[00:42:44.320] 
When your ego self access is developed, then you can ride a real horse. When you think, if you know anything.

[00:42:59.260] 
About horseback riding, if you ever really.

[00:43:03.590] 
Rode a real horse, then you know.

[00:43:07.460] 
Why people are scared of it. You better be scared of a real horse until through your respect, you kind.

[00:43:18.100] 
Of build a relationship.

[00:43:19.020] 
You never master a real horse. You kind of befriend it.

[00:43:28.160] 
You teach him what he can get away with and what he can't. But you don't ever try to convince him that he's just an old plow horse.

[00:43:41.550] 
It won't work. Let's take a break and come back in about.

[00:43:47.350] 
Before we get going because we're going to run out of time soon. I passed out in one of the other classes copies of the Ally press catalog. And I want to say, and I haven't really made enough of this yet. We'll make a little more of it in a minute.

[00:44:08.730] 
But someone said to me last week.

[00:44:13.810] 
I think it was Dave Franchak, said to me, well, Bob, it said, this room is sort of. This is not lover space. This is more like mega space, magician space.

[00:44:23.690] 
That's right.

[00:44:24.460] 
And we need to be alert. That that's one of the reasons why I don't like large classes, because there's much less interpersonal contact and there's less real capacity for relating when there's so many folk. But it's also just in terms of the ritual nature of the space. This is a classroom elation. Last class we didn't even have any.

[00:44:55.530] 
Carpeting on the floor.

[00:44:57.890] 
If you go to a bly conference, the space can really include more of these archetypal configurations. I mean, you get a much richer combination of the masculine self, but not.

[00:45:20.360] 
The least of which is the centrality of poetry in a bly conference.

[00:45:30.890] 
It's no accident, I think, that the thing which men have found so empowering.

[00:45:38.960] 
And healing is being led by a great poet.

[00:45:44.280] 
And it's also interesting that this is not a 35 year old poet.

[00:45:51.120] 
Or a 40 year old poet.

[00:45:55.060] 
This is a poet who has come.

[00:46:00.750] 
Into his generativity and hence can carry.

[00:46:06.850] 
A lot of the projections of men of this energy we're talking about tonight, and also the king energy. So I think it's important to realize that a lot of the excitement that people experience through Robert Bly and his.

[00:46:30.170] 
Work is because men have such trouble integrating this lover energy in a generative way.

[00:46:40.660] 
Now, we're good at splitting it off. I mean, we can split off with.

[00:46:45.980] 
The best, but to integrate it into a full life in a generative way.

[00:46:53.250] 
Is a real individuation task for men. And I think that is why people respond so much to bly. And so I want you to have the address where you can get the Ally Press center catalog. Write Paul Farot Feroe at 524 Orleans Street, St. Paul, Minnesota 55107. Or you can call the Ally Press.

[00:47:23.750] 
Center at 1807 293002.

[00:47:31.150] 
They have an up to date list of men's events around the country where you can have a more rich experience of the presence and energy of men who are working on these resources. In that catalog that they send out is a lot of Bly's own work, but also selections of other poets that.

[00:47:54.920] 
He'S translated.

[00:47:57.550] 
One could say, and not be very far off the mark, that.

[00:48:05.360] 
A man who neither reads nor writes poetry has a long way to go.

[00:48:13.040] 
In his own development and certainly in.

[00:48:18.730] 
His development as a lover. So if we're talking about resourcing, so start working on the poetic side of yourself. Where to start? Start with Bly, and then start with.

[00:48:37.570] 
The people bly loves. And then when you get familiar with those, then you can range out, he will have introduced you to enough people through that catalog that you will be encompassing worlds.

[00:48:53.800] 
Then one of the things, a beautiful.

[00:48:58.350] 
Thing, and really was amazing to me at the first bly conference I ever.

[00:49:03.150] 
Went to was men offering each other poems.

[00:49:10.380] 
Now, I've been given a lot of.

[00:49:16.560] 
Things by men, a lot of grief.

[00:49:19.380] 
But I had never had a man give me a point. And one of the things that often happens at one of these conferences is that men are given the space, the.

[00:49:37.640] 
Ritual space, where they don't have to be ashamed. They can be shameless and give a point. And it is an amazing thing to be with a lot of very powerful men who shamelessly offer poems that they love to each other.

[00:50:12.070] 
So that is a big resource. And I could not emphasize the healing.

[00:50:20.440] 
Importance of both reading and writing poetry.

[00:50:29.320] 
I could not overemphasize it.

[00:50:33.460] 
Yes.

[00:50:33.740] 
Question is, is the reason for this because men are not in touch with the anima, the female part within? I think that's a classical jungian argument and I think that there's deep truth in it. But what I want to emphasize is.

[00:50:51.470] 
That men, when they become lovers, do.

[00:50:56.140] 
Not get that solely from the fEminine. There is a masculine lover within.

[00:51:08.210] 
Who loves the feminine lover. Now, it's very interesting.

[00:51:14.420] 
See, it is the lover within that.

[00:51:17.400] 
Cares about relating to the other.

[00:51:21.990] 
The Freudians have put so much emphasis on the capacity to develop an investment in a separate other being. And the classical Freudians make a lot of. They quite rightly emphasize how difficult it is to get to where you can.

[00:51:47.360] 
Separate enough to love. Very interesting. When you connect with a lover, you.

[00:52:01.290] 
Value everything, but it makes you capable of relating to the inner feminine and.

[00:52:08.860] 
The outer feminine as well.

[00:52:11.100] 
So it's like it all rises together.

[00:52:14.930] 
See those capacities rise together.

[00:52:17.600] 
If you're not really in touch with the lover part of yourself, you won't be able to value even familiar things, much less real, strange things.

[00:52:35.500] 
Right? Yeah. Somebody else back here.

[00:52:40.740] 
Got a little commercial here for the journal.

[00:52:44.590] 
Inroads in the men's movement.

[00:52:46.210] 
And Blythe's comment, a comment that gentleman was offering. Bly's comment about having realized in his midlife that he was not connected enough to his masculine.

[00:52:58.380] 
Clearly.

[00:52:59.620] 
Think back to what we were talking about before, the mean.

[00:53:01.630] 
It is amazing how much problems a man will have with intimacy until he.

[00:53:14.390] 
Can consolidate enough of his masculine identity so that he does not fear losing.

[00:53:19.970] 
The self when he is in relationship to a woman. Most men fear losing their selfhood if they get into intimacy.

[00:53:34.930] 
It is very difficult for women to understand this. Very often women ridicule men a lot about this. There's a lot of very humiliating ridiculing talk among a lot of women today about this thing about men. And, you know, the thing is that what women are seeing is there's a lot of truth in it. Men have difficulty with this, but it's.

[00:54:05.510] 
Not something that's funny.

[00:54:06.420] 
And it's not.

[00:54:09.190] 
Something that should be ridiculed.

[00:54:10.650] 
It is a part of the burden of becoming a mature man to be.

[00:54:20.350] 
Able to deal with intimacy without fearing.

[00:54:24.640] 
The total loss of self.

[00:54:26.430] 
In Kohut's sense of self, the little.

[00:54:30.210] 
S self or your human self, not the archetypal self.

[00:54:35.570] 
Well, how does a man.

[00:54:38.230] 
Get to.

[00:54:43.970] 
Where he can stand intimacy? Well, he gets to where he can stand intimacy by getting more deeply into his own masculine selfhood. That's a rule.

[00:55:02.110] 
If you're having difficulty in your relationships.

[00:55:04.350] 
With women.

[00:55:06.030] 
You'Ve got to get deeper into the masculine side of the conjunctio.

[00:55:12.460] 
Once you're rooted adequately there, and I think particularly in this king business, you will not fear losing yourself in relationship. It's hard for people to understand that. But this is the key.

[00:55:30.290] 
For the masculine problem with love and intimacy. This is why so many men would.

[00:55:40.460] 
Rather fight any war.

[00:55:45.760] 
Than to try to stick with an intimate relationship with a woman.

[00:55:51.480] 
Yes.

[00:55:54.870] 
In my opinion, I think that a lot of women also can talk about it a lot, but their justice trait as afraid of men. And I was wondering, you're familiar with the mermaid and Minotaur. Do you think that her philosophy. Philosophy of why that's so because of early caregiver and that sort of thing. I mean, what do you think about.

[00:56:26.760] 
It's a complicated question, but it relates to the same thing. I mean, the question is something about women having a similar parallel difficulty. But I think that the difficulty is.

[00:56:40.110] 
Caused in the parallel way. If a woman is not adequately grounded.

[00:56:46.710] 
In her connection with the queen within.

[00:56:48.230] 
She will tend to fear getting into intimacy with any male, particularly who has any personal power.

[00:57:03.730] 
If the man has any personal power, she will fear him. Well, she will fear him because she.

[00:57:11.730] 
Does not accept her own power enough.

[00:57:14.220] 
How does she accept her own power?

[00:57:17.250] 
A woman accepts her own power by deep grounding in the queen pole of the feminine psyche.

[00:57:25.220] 
She doesn't need all these people that talk about, well, get the animus developed. Get the animus developed. Get the masculine side of the woman.

[00:57:31.830] 
Well, that's fine, but if you really understand this messianic queen within, you don't.

[00:57:41.100] 
Need to get your strength and power from your masculine side of your personality.

[00:57:43.740] 
How do you think that relationship.

[00:57:46.450] 
I.

[00:57:46.980] 
Maybe you didn't want to deal with this, but how does it relate to early, the early character being the mother?

[00:57:54.700] 
Well, yeah, I don't want to spend my time working on feminine psychology tonight, but I would say that when a.

[00:58:07.310] 
Woman has a problem relating to the queen within the place, she got that.

[00:58:13.030] 
It's the caregiver.

[00:58:15.040] 
She got that in problems with her mother. Well.

[00:58:19.390] 
There'S a lot of writing now about the differences developmentally between men and women, and they're pointing out the radical.

[00:58:32.730] 
Differences in terms of what issues come.

[00:58:36.340] 
Up for men compared to what issues come up for women. And that's a very rich field. But I don't want to get into that tonight except to say that men in my view the way men, if you were to do a statistical run.

[00:58:52.170] 
On men across the world, the typical.

[00:58:56.040] 
Developmental sequence of their getting comfortable with.

[00:59:00.010] 
Their archetypal configurations goes like this. Warrior magus, lover king.

[00:59:11.940] 
And statistically speaking, the lover stuff in a man does not really start getting consolidated for great numbers of men until midlife.

[00:59:24.170] 
And the king, if it's ever consolidated.

[00:59:31.120] 
Often does not come online until the has a lot to do with why. If you have had a man treat.

[00:59:41.280] 
You well, it's much more likely that it was your grandfather or an older uncle than it was your father.

[00:59:52.420] 
And I think there's probably a parallel pattern in women's experience, but is not the same. It's not the same order. So if you look at it the.

[01:00:05.390] 
Way I look at it, men and women have to develop very similar potentialities.

[01:00:12.420] 
And in one deep sense are very equal in terms of the fullness, the potentials that they can develop, but they don't in terms of patterns. If you look at the patterns, they do not typically develop them at the.

[01:00:26.900] 
Same time in the same sequence. And for men, see, this lover business is hard. The only thing harder for men is the king energy.

[01:00:42.000] 
That's the only thing that's harder for men to develop. So anyway, let me talk a little bit more about resources, and then we can have some time for questions. But now you may think I'm joking.

[01:00:55.400] 
A little bit now, but dance is an important resource.

[01:01:01.090] 
You got to understand something about the archetypal lover.

[01:01:08.090] 
If it talks words at all, it's poetry or song.

[01:01:14.690] 
But a lot of the time, it.

[01:01:18.460] 
Doesn'T like to talk.

[01:01:20.560] 
It likes to move, it likes to dance. And you don't see this so clearly in modern culture, particularly modern middle class, upper middle class.

[01:01:35.590] 
Uptight culture.

[01:01:39.440] 
But if you travel around the world and you visit, as I've done, a lot of the peoples that are off the beaten track, if you go up.

[01:01:58.600] 
The rivers in Borneo and visit the sea, dyaks, the headhunters.

[01:02:02.580] 
And you're there after the evening starts and they begin to have their festivals, the women dance.

[01:02:16.620] 
They dress up their finery. It's really wonderful.

[01:02:22.110] 
And then the men dance. And if you want to see something.

[01:02:31.600] 
Spectacular in premodern tribal cultures.

[01:02:35.820] 
You wait around till the men start coming out.

[01:02:40.150] 
To dance because they know how to dress up.

[01:02:45.300] 
You, you. You kind of stay around middle class american circles, and you would think that men didn't, that they, men in their wiring didn't know anything about dressing up gray suits. But if you study premodern cultures and you look at men at play. They dress up and they are shameless.

[01:03:14.280] 
About it.

[01:03:15.740] 
And they dance, and the.

[01:03:23.230] 
Color is bold.

[01:03:24.140] 
And makes no apologies. And the headdresses are magnificent and.

[01:03:37.820] 
Go.

[01:03:41.560] 
To a bly conference and come to carnival. And you may have a little experience of some of these headdresses, but that is one of the things you got to get a sense for, that there was something that was there for men.

[01:03:57.510] 
In premodern cultures that is not present.

[01:04:02.740] 
In middle class, certainly not in middle.

[01:04:05.340] 
Class white culture for men. Now.

[01:04:08.150] 
Now, I take this a little personally, because when I put on my.

[01:04:16.370] 
Stetson.

[01:04:16.430] 
And I walk down the street where the folks are that don't understand hats, you get funny looks. You ever try that? But there are folk around who understand hats, but they're not middle class whites. They are still in touch with, much.

[01:04:44.940] 
More in touch with tribal culture. And I mean, this, around the world, you see this.

[01:04:51.590] 
But it's a very interesting phenomenon, men being able to dress up. Another thing I will say to men about this. I mean, dance is one thing, and if you go out dancing, if you're.

[01:05:06.210] 
Having trouble with your lover.

[01:05:07.010] 
Take dance.

[01:05:10.340] 
Lessons, any kind of dance lessons, and.

[01:05:13.450] 
It won't be long till you'll be a little better touch with your lover. So, I mean, everything from modern dance. One of the things I'd love to do soon is to take some african dance.

[01:05:35.170] 
Have you ever seen a zulu man when he feels.

[01:05:40.090] 
I mean, if you've been watching the news in South Africa, have you noticed the South African People's response with dance to Mandela's release? There's the feast of love in a mean. When you see that coming out, then.

[01:06:07.580] 
You can feel this lover energy come out.

[01:06:10.300] 
And these uptight males around, it scares them to death when they see that.

[01:06:18.510] 
Interesting how some religious groups suppress dancing.

[01:06:23.810] 
Yeah, a lot of religious groups suppress dancing. And the reason they suppress it is because they know that it will put you directly in touch. Do not pass go, do not go to jail. Directly in touch with the lover. What do you think happened when rock and roll came on, folks? I mean, when rock and roll came.

[01:06:46.580] 
In in the late 50s, we started.

[01:06:50.400] 
Getting wholesale invocation of a fairly primal lover. And there will always be rock and roll for this reason, once you're ever in touch with it, you're never going.

[01:07:04.920] 
To give it up.

[01:07:06.350] 
Long live rock and roll. Thank you, Chuck Berry, poetry and dance. And I'm not kidding you. If I'm working with a man that tells me he's out of touch with his lover. So you want to spend a lot of money, or do you want to get better? We can have a lot of sessions discussing this, or you can go take some dance lessons.

[01:07:35.790] 
So that's another one.

[01:07:40.580] 
Active imagination. You've heard my rap about that. You do active imagination with all these figures to kind of get some balance. But start talking to the lover within.

[01:07:51.640] 
Very directly, and start asking him what he wants.

[01:07:57.870] 
And don't be shocked when he tells.

[01:07:57.680] 
You.

[01:07:59.580] 
As Jung says, you don't have to give these inner figures everything they want. But you do need to listen, because it would be nice if you knew.

[01:08:11.440] 
What the inner lover wanted and who they wanted. You don't have to give it to them.

[01:08:19.220] 
But if you're not in discussion, you may find yourself acting out in a way that you cannot believe.

[01:08:28.690] 
Shortly, yes.

[01:08:32.400] 
Isn't there a fear of spontaneity too? Because I'm a street musician. When I play in a subway, I see it every day, people being horrified.

[01:08:43.400] 
You're so shameless, man.

[01:08:45.890] 
Tolerance. And then they get on the train, but they wait till everyone's not looking, and then they throw the money in. But it's just like an incredible fear of expressing how they feel and dance and music and all that kind of.

[01:09:01.000] 
This gentleman is a street musician. He's just observing on the threat levels of people that he meets in the subway when he's playing.

[01:09:10.960] 
And I think that, see, the troubadour.

[01:09:13.570] 
The musician always is a boundary breaker. If somebody wants to have neat boundaries and the musician comes along, they know that's not written anywhere. Very final. And so this is why people in all cultures have. They're a little afraid of this. You remember Plato? He wanted to get rid of the poets. Well, we need. Well, we need a society where we have philosopher kings and get rid of.

[01:09:52.650] 
These poets because of going over these.

[01:10:01.380] 
Boundaries, don't like these. And for those of you that really.

[01:10:08.930] 
Are into the scholarship of all this.

[01:10:10.670] 
Read Victor Turner's work on ritual process and look at the relationship between liminality and communitas.

[01:10:22.040] 
Communatas is what it is. That space which happens in the interstices.

[01:10:30.330] 
Of culture, on the boundaries, in the cracks, in the bars, on the edge, which is where the revolution always comes. The reform movements come through the cracks.

[01:10:46.210] 
And it is a blurring of boundaries.

[01:10:51.840] 
In communatas, which Victor Turner, the great.

[01:10:56.540] 
Anthropologist, pointed out is everywhere in the world. You see it.

[01:11:00.580] 
You see this communitas breaking boundaries, breaking status, rows. You think you know who you are. Communatos comes along, you got carnival. Everybody's statuses are reversed. Our status is wiped out. So the lover thing is frightening to people. And if you don't have a good.

[01:11:23.040] 
Clear sense of yourself, you can see why yourself will disappear.

[01:11:27.350] 
And all of a sudden you'll become an archetype.

[01:11:29.870] 
Do something a little bit troublesome.

[01:11:33.660] 
Okay, so active imagination. You've got some resources on that. The thing, you get in there and.

[01:11:43.630] 
You talk to the lover to get.

[01:11:46.880] 
A sense of what they're up to. You'll be amazed. Polymorphous perversity, what your lover may be into. But you need to know. Other questions or comments. Yes.

[01:12:03.470] 
The hat thing.

[01:12:07.160] 
Yeah, my father used to wear hats. Everybody used to wear a hat movie in the. Everybody had a hat on. What happened? Nobody wears a hat. Killed that Kennedy when he was an Irish. Incidentally, you have the hat stored wrong. You're going to lose the form and the thrill. It's all right. I work in a hat shop.

[01:12:35.110] 
Well, everything. Hats go right back in terms of culture.

[01:12:41.970] 
To crowns. To crowns.

[01:12:46.090] 
Hats are related to crowns. Culturally, they go back. They have always been emblems of authority in some sense, some sort of sense of power. Related to what? Yes, with the Yamaka, the issue is clear about authority.

[01:13:05.750] 
It's whose authority it is.

[01:13:06.880] 
See, the Yamaka is a part of.

[01:13:13.990] 
A cultural complex which includes the Sabbath and circumcision.

[01:13:18.540] 
So there's a different kind of thing in the Yamaka. The Yamaka is not so much a shameless celebration of an individual man's beauty as it is a statement about who.

[01:13:36.940] 
Is the one under whom all of.

[01:13:40.970] 
The creativity of that man is stewarded. See? So there's a different usage of that, but it still has to do with crown. See, crowns is something we ought to look at crowns archetypally and try to.

[01:13:53.760] 
Understand what crowns are.

[01:13:54.800] 
Crowns are extremely important for both men and women in mythology. And it has to do with full.

[01:14:03.850] 
Authority for all sorts of things. Well, the lover, see, for the lover.

[01:14:10.820] 
To be fully developed, there's got to be a capacity for shamelessness in a.

[01:14:13.830] 
Man about certain things.

[01:14:17.010] 
I mean, there are a lot of things a man ought to be ashamed.

[01:14:20.400] 
About, but there are some things that.

[01:14:23.510] 
He shouldn't be so ashamed about. He shouldn't be ashamed to appear.

[01:14:29.180] 
And.

[01:14:30.310] 
He shouldn't be ashamed of his body. And he shouldn't be ashamed to fill.

[01:14:37.080] 
Up all of his space.

[01:14:38.360] 
And that's what the lover is about. The lover. Remember, what did we say early on?

[01:14:44.510] 
The lover is about play a man's play and it is about his display.

[01:14:50.490] 
So when your lover gets more healed.

[01:14:54.750] 
You'Ll be a lot more interested in clothes and fashion.

[01:14:56.610] 
The state of men's fashion in our culture is a statement about the state of the men's lovers within. I mean, if a man has little.

[01:15:13.770] 
Enough interest in himself to pay no attention to how he dresses.

[01:15:19.650] 
Then you.

[01:15:20.980] 
Can tell something about where he's hurt.

[01:15:23.220] 
See, he's got a lot of shame issues. God knows I don't want to be seen.

[01:15:30.730] 
And if I dress, somebody's going to notice me.

[01:15:33.590] 
And again, if you got a lot of depressed therapists around, they'll tell you that any man that dresses up is manicky. See, if you show up in one of those thousand dollar long, gorgeous leather coats, they'll be sure you're sick. Of course, they really envy the hell out of you. Well, they'll charge you more, right. But they wouldn't be able ever to buy the coat. But anyway, this is, this is an issue, you know, men, men, a lot of men, when they're real undeveloped love.

[01:16:20.600] 
To make fun of women for women's.

[01:16:22.980] 
Attention to fashion and clothes and appearance.

[01:16:26.770] 
And things like that.

[01:16:27.200] 
And what that shows you is not, doesn't show you anything. It shows that women have, are in.

[01:16:32.340] 
Touch with a lover's side.

[01:16:32.880] 
Because when you're in touch with a.

[01:16:35.040] 
Lover'S side, you appreciate things, all things.

[01:16:38.260] 
You appreciate things and you're shameless about it. Nobody's going to shame you about appreciating things. And a man who doesn't understand how beautiful things are is a man who is not healed in his lover. Now you may not have the money.

[01:16:56.800] 
To buy them, but you know, it's very interesting. If you travel in cultures where poverty.

[01:17:05.090] 
Still reigns.

[01:17:06.310] 
More, even more than ours.

[01:17:10.300] 
You will notice that poor men dress up.

[01:17:15.350] 
They are not intimidated by this business. And it doesn't cost so much to dress up. See, what it cost is you got.

[01:17:27.270] 
To be able to be in touch with your lover. And you don't have to be rich.

[01:17:33.140] 
To dress up except in spirit. Got to be rich in spirit to dress up. Yeah.

[01:17:42.350] 
When we guys get to announce by the source and deals me.

[01:17:47.510] 
Well, I don't know that that's the opposite. The comment is something about what about men being turned on by women who are really turned out. I think that is probably a projection.


audo_enhanced_The Lover Within 07.mp3


[00:00:00.270] 
See, that's probably there's a lot of letting the woman carry the lover for the man. This is typical of a lot of relationships where the man expects his partner to carry all that lover energy for them. She's the one that's spontaneous. She's the one that has ideas of things to do. She's the one that has an eye for clothes. She's the one that has for going to plays. She's the one that has an eye, Well, let's go do something. There's a country song about that, but I won't go you. Yeah.

[00:00:43.920] 
I want to get back to what you were saying about being an artist and so on. You made a comment last week that we don't want artists who are masacres. If you're going out and you're breaking these boundaries, you're going to encounter a lot of conflict people.

[00:01:06.040] 
Well, you see, the comment is about my statement about hoping that artists can get out of a masochistic position so they don't have to carry the lover for the whole society.

[00:01:22.780] 
See, this is what happens a lot. Artists of all kinds, from actors and actresses to all different types of artists, carry in projected form. They are the receptacle for the disowned lover of the rest of the society. It's not just the artist. You could do a lot of psychology of deviance this way. Psychology of deviant behaviors, so-called deviant behaviors, is because of splitting in the personalities of the people in the dominant culture. All I'm saying is, I don't think you need to volunteer to be the goat. If you are an artist, you have to realize that there are a lot of people that would like to eat you up in order to connect with life so that they will feel animated. This is This is a simple archetypal pattern, and I'm just saying, let people get in touch with their own lover. You need to be able to have a warrior protect... The artist has to have a warrior protect them from being sacrificed by other people's agendas. It's a typical thing. It's nothing new.

[00:02:52.300] 
Yes.

[00:02:54.120] 
But men, during losing their self in intimacy in the I think maybe it was especially important. How do I relate that to the early discussion about the importance of a warrior in protecting us from being vulnerable?

[00:03:10.820] 
The question is about The different roles of the king and the warrior in terms of facilitating and protecting the lover. The king stuff provides centeredness and calmness. It is what gets you a tap root so that you don't get so frightened by your own passion that you have to shut it down. Now, that's an internal issue, right? Follow that? Yeah. In other words, You got several things that are problematic. Part of it is your own passion, regulating your own passion. The way you ground that is through the King. You get the tap root down so that you're not so afraid all this energy. The warrior has to protect you from other people and to be there so clearly for you that you know that when you open yourself to the other, someone asked me to talk a little bit more about intimacy, when you open yourself to the other, that you know when the abuse starts, that the warrior will intervene, period.

[00:04:29.100] 
I mean, against verbal abuse.

[00:04:31.240] 
Men absorb an incredible amount of verbal abuse. Men are real slow in understanding how to defend themselves against verbal abuse. That's when they're most vulnerable. Men have to learn to have their inner warrior put on the armor plate when the abuse starts so that they can still think. You see, if you have no armor and you're being verbally abused, and there's a lot of interest in the circles today about looking at this phenomenon of verbal abuse.

[00:05:12.720] 
See, there are a lot of abused men out here in this world. There are a lot of men who have been repeatedly beaten by their women in their relationships.

[00:05:25.740] 
They don't talk about this because it's so shameful. But I I have seen many men who have been repeatedly attacked physically by the women in their relationships. It's not something men talk about, but it happens a lot. But even more important is the verbal abuse, the sadistic verbal abuse that men often do not know how to protect themselves against. One man that I work with has a very creative imaginal technique, and I got permission to offer this to you. He's been trying to work on getting better armor against this so that he can maintain his sanity in the context where this is happening. So he goes and looks at medieval armor in museums. Think about it. A man who cannot imagine himself honored will not be able to continue contact in the heat of discussion. It's interesting. I hadn't thought about in that context. There's a comment about the relation of this to something that is in the parcelful Traditions. This is where we have to understand.

[00:06:54.300] 
Men must learn to protect protect their heart from anyone who would destroy it, male or female.

[00:07:07.910] 
Robert Blie is wise on this. He talks about this a lot. He's absolutely right. Because if you cannot protect your heart, then you know what you're going to do? You're going to be abused once, you're going to be abused twice, you're going to be abused some more. But you will start going away, and you will begin to go away, and no one will be able to find you.

[00:07:35.700] 
There are a lot of men...

[00:07:39.020] 
You know that song Desperado? Why don't you come to your senses? You better let somebody love you before it's too late. Well, how come that guy's a Desperado? It's because men don't learn to take care of themselves and learn. They don't have to Robert Blies got this clear. You don't have to have your feelings hurt just because somebody says something ugly to you. If you get your feelings hurt a lot, it's Because you're not adequately protected. If you're not adequately protected, you will be pathologically vulnerable. If you're pathologically vulnerable, you will not not sustain intimacy in any relationship. That is something that's hard for people to understand because vulnerability has been touted as this great virtue in relationships. That is the biggest crock that has ever been perpetrated on the American public.

[00:08:46.750] 
When you keep coming up with this image of Tafferree, and that's where to me, even though you said space between this cosmos, It's still how it's this idea of seeing the garden.

[00:09:02.940] 
Yeah, it's the center.

[00:09:04.440] 
If you're talking about the space of the garden work in which you say it's the center space, how would you talk about how the cream fits in the larger space? I think the idea I'm getting from you is that the image of the king that counts on these spaces.

[00:09:21.340] 
Well, see, you got to understand the question has to do with the iconography, really, of kinship and the garden and so forth. These mythic systems are all related. They're not separate.

[00:09:39.230] 
See, the tree in the garden is the king. The tree of life in the garden of Eden, it equates mythically to the king.

[00:09:57.580] 
You got to work Mercy Eliade's work on all this mythic symbolism and the way in which these images relate to each other. You can also look at Northrup Fries, The Anatomy of Criticism, and his book on the Great Code, where the relationship between these go. At the deepest level, mythically, remember in some of my other classes, I've pointed out that the image of God, the male representation of God combines all of these things in one in a person, divine personage.

[00:10:36.400] 
In that sense, right, the king is the lover, is the warrior, is the sorcerer, See?

[00:10:46.610] 
That corresponds at the mythic level to the individuated man who carries the king, and carries the warrior, and carries the lover, and carries the magician in a balanced way. That's subtleties there, but Iliadi will help you with that if you look at Cosmos and history and patterns in comparative religion and those books like that. Let's take another couple of questions. I want to read you a poem.

[00:11:11.660] 
Is there something about jealousy or around jealousy? In the picture, you're going to say, A jealous foot. A person may live in such a subject that is lovely, but it's off the gaucher.

[00:11:21.970] 
Well, jealousy is a very complicated topic and a lot more complicated than I can really address here. But it's always related to a sense of vulnerability and a sense of being in danger of being very wounded in oneself. If you're chronically jealous, that probably indicates some real narcissistic pathology, where one is who's just chronically vulnerable and has the feeling, see, if I'm related to you, we're in a relationship, and you're into really charming a lot of other men, in my presence. Now, if I'm very, very narcissistically vulnerable, I will have a sense of the shuddering of myself over that because see, then you're in a self-object relationship with I complete myself through you. If you left me, I would just die. I would not be able... People will say to me, I just couldn't live without her.

[00:12:38.530] 
I say, Give me a break. Give me a break.

[00:12:44.270] 
Come on. What is this? There's your narcissistic vulnerability. Because it's like if a lover wants to be with somebody else, you got to be be healthy enough to be able to say goodbye. That's one of the things about the lover side, the lover thing. When it's healthy, it doesn't own anybody. It does not possess other people. See, it's always amazing to me these people that would want to keep someone in a relationship with them against the person's will. That's not love. That's That is narcissistic pathology. When your self-hood is secure and somebody doesn't want to be with you, you give them a blessing. Let them go. Let me read you a poem or a couple.

[00:13:54.230] 
Now, I'm not going to read any Roberts.

[00:13:57.250] 
See, Robert Blie is because I'm practicing on my blah accent.

[00:14:03.820] 
I'll help you with that.

[00:14:07.030] 
But I wanted to read you a D. H. Lawrence poem or two to give you a sense about this question was asked earlier about the relationship between the lover within and work. Listen carefully to this, because Because Lawrence has forgotten more than most of us will ever know about the archetype of a lover. This is the portable D. H. Lawrence. For those of you who are like me, a little tone deaf about these things, it's a good place to start. But listen to this. This is one of his poems entitled We are Transmitters.

[00:14:59.920] 
As we live, we are transmitters of life. When we fail to transmit life, life fails to flow through us.

[00:15:15.050] 
That's part of the mystery of sex.

[00:15:18.160] 
It's a flow onwards.

[00:15:21.160] 
Sexless people transmit nothing.

[00:15:24.640] 
If as we work, we can transmit life into our work, life, still more life rushes into us to compensate, to be ready, and we ripple with life through the days. You get that? We ripple with life through the days. Even if it's a woman making an apple template or a man, a stew, if life goes into the pudding, good Content is the pudding, good is the stool. Content is the woman with fresh life rippling into her.

[00:16:09.870] 
Content is the man.

[00:16:13.320] 
Give and it shall be given unto you is still the truth about life. But giving life is not so easy. It doesn't mean handing it out to some mean fool or letting the living dead eat you up. It means kindling the life quality where it was not. Even if it's only in the whiteness of a washed pocket handkerchief.

[00:16:51.790] 
This man knows what he's talking about. It's called We are Transmitters.

[00:16:59.920] 
Whoever walks a mile full of false sympathy, walks to the funeral of the whole human race.

[00:17:18.180] 
In other words, you don't have the lover. You're going to be doing good works out of necrophilia.

[00:17:29.920] 
Whoever forces himself to love anybody begets a murderer in his own body. You know what I'm saying? All this duty business about our responsibilities. Without the lover, everything is cold and dead, and you don't want to do anything.

[00:17:57.570] 
He's saying, Don't do it. You'll cause trouble more than you're worth.

[00:18:03.410] 
But here's the point that I want to close with tonight.

[00:18:09.840] 
I want to say this is a poem that was one given to me at the first Bly conference I ever attended. It's one that gives you a different view. Now, I love to I talk about these Earth-first ecological warriors. I've said that it's a lover in men that makes them into people really concerned about the environment.

[00:18:45.250] 
Really concerned about it. It's interesting in the light of the whaling industry today, this particular poem, Doug Cost, the An artist and storyteller and man of many gifts that works a lot with Blie, gave this to the entire conference.

[00:19:11.900] 
Let me read this to you, and then we'll stop, and I'll stick around for some discussion afterwards.

[00:19:18.550] 
It's entitled Whales Weep Not. They say the sea is cold, but the sea contains the hottest blood of all, and the wildest and the most urgent. All the whales in the wider deeps, hot are they as they urge on and on and dive beneath the icebergs. The right whales, the sperm whales, the hammerheads, the killers, there they blow, there they blow, hot wild white breath out of the sea. And they rock, and they rock through the sensual ageless ages on the depths of the seven seas. And through the salt, they reel with drunk delight. And in the tropics, tremble they with love and roll with massive, strong desire like God's. And then the great Bull lies up against his bride in the blue deep of the sea, as mountain pressing on mountain in the zest of life. And out of the inward roaring of the inner red ocean of whale blood, the long tip reaches strong, intense like the Maldstrom tip, and comes to rest in the clasp and the soft wild clutch of a she-whales fathomless body. And over the bridge of the Whale's strong phallus linking the wonder of whales, the burning archangels under the sea keep passing back and forth, keep passing Archangels of bliss, from him to her, from her to him.

[00:21:20.390] 
Great cherubim that wait on whales in mid-ocean, suspended in the waves of the sea. Great heaven of whales in the waters, old hierarchies. And enormous mother whales lie dreaming, suckling their whale, tender, young. And dreaming with strange whale eyes wide open in the waters of the beginning and the end. And bull whales gather their women and whale calves in a ring when danger threaten, on the surface of the ceaseless flood, and range themselves like great fierce seraphim facing the threat, encircling their huddled monsters of love. And all this happiness in the sea, in the salt, where God is also love, but without words. And Aphrodite is the wife of whales, most happy, happy she. And Venus among the fishes, skips and is the she dauphin. She is the gay, delighted porpo, sporting with love in the sea. She is the female Tunnyfish, round and happy among the males, and dense with happy blood, dark rainbow bliss in the sea.

[00:23:10.730] 
That's why you join Greenpeaks.

[00:23:15.190] 
Thanks a lot.

